Missouri, session 2026, HB3000.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 29.230, 34.046, 48.020, 49.082,
2
50.327, 50.333, 50.334, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 54.261, 54.320,
3
55.091, 58.095, 59.120, 67.5060, 68.259, 71.012, 71.014,
4
71.015, 77.230, 79.080, 82.1025, 108.240, 115.127, 137.016,
5
140.010, 140.190, 140.250, 140.420, 140.980, 140.981, 140.982,
6
140.983, 140.984, 140.985, 140.986, 140.987, 140.988, 140.991,
7
140.994, 140.995, 140.1000, 140.1009, 140.1012, 141.220,
8
141.230, 141.250, 141.270, 141.290, 141.300, 141.320, 141.330,
9
141.360, 141.410, 141.440, 141.500, 141.520, 141.535, 141.540,
10
141.550, 141.560, 141.570, 141.580, 141.610, 141.620, 141.680,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HB 3000 2
11
141.700, 141.819, 141.980, 141.984, 141.1009, 141.1020,
12
182.711, 182.802, 190.050, 190.051, 190.052, 190.070, 190.090,
13
249.255, 251.034, 321.220, 347.048, 473.742, 486.735, 488.426,
14
570.095, 578.700, and 640.144, RSMo, are repealed and ninety-
15
one new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
16
sections 29.230, 34.046, 48.020, 49.082, 50.327, 50.333,
17
50.334, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 58.095,
18
59.120, 67.058, 67.311, 67.5060, 71.012, 71.015, 77.230,
19
79.080, 82.1025, 108.240, 115.127, 137.016, 140.010, 140.190,
20
140.250, 140.420, 140.980, 140.981, 140.982, 140.983, 140.984,
21
140.985, 140.986, 140.987, 140.988, 140.991, 140.994, 140.995,
22
140.1000, 140.1009, 140.1012, 141.220, 141.230, 141.250,
23
141.270, 141.290, 141.300, 141.320, 141.330, 141.360, 141.410,
24
141.440, 141.500, 141.520, 141.535, 141.540, 141.550, 141.560,
25
141.570, 141.580, 141.610, 141.620, 141.680, 141.700, 141.819,
26
141.980, 141.984, 141.1009, 141.1020, 182.711, 182.802,
27
190.050, 190.051, 190.052, 190.070, 190.090, 249.255, 251.034,
28
311.083, 321.220, 347.048, 473.742, 486.735, 488.426, 570.095,
29
578.700, and 640.144, to read as follows:
1
29.230. 1. In every county which does not elect a
2
county audit o r, t he state auditor shall audit, without cost
3
to the county, at least once during the term for which any
4
county officer is chosen, the accounts of the various county
5
officers supported in whole or in part by public moneys.
6
2. The state auditor shall audit any political
7
subdivi s ion of the state, including counties having a county
8
auditor, if requested to do so by a petition submitted by a
9
person who resides or owns real property within the
10
boundaries or area of service of the political subdivision
11
and such petition is submitted to the state auditor within
12
one year from requesting the petition from the state auditor
13
and is signed by the requisite percent of the qualified

SCS HB 3000 3
14
voters of the political subdivision. The requisite percent
15
of qualified voters to cause such an audit to be conducted
16
shall be determined as follows:
17
(1) If the number of qualified voters of the political
18
subdivis i on determined on the basis of the votes cast in the
19
last gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing]
20
requesting of the petition from the state auditor is less
21
than one thousand, twenty-five percent of the qualified
22
voters of the political subdivision determined on the basis
23
of the registered voters eligible to vote at the last
24
gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing] requesting
25
of the petition;
26
(2) If the number of qualified voters of the political
27
subdivisi on determined on the basis of the votes cast in the
28
last gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing]
29
requesting of the petition from the state auditor is one
30
thousand or more but less than five thousand, fifteen
31
percent of the qualified voters of the political subdivision
32
determined on the basis of the votes cast in the last
33
gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing] requesting
34
of the petition, provided that the number of qualified
35
voters signing such petition is not less than two hundred;
36
(3) If the number of qualified voters of the political
37
subdivisi on determined on the basis of the votes cast in the
38
last gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing]
39
requesting of the petition from the state auditor is five
40
thousand or more but less than fifty thousand, ten percent
41
of the qualified voters of the political subdivision
42
determined on the basis of the votes cast in the last
43
gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing] requesting
44
of the petition, provided that the number of qualified

SCS HB 3000 4
45
voters signing such petition is not less than seven hundred
46
fifty;
47
(4) If the number of qualified voters of the political
48
subdivis i on determined on the basis of the votes cast in the
49
last gubernatorial election held prior to the [filing]
50
requesting of the petition from the state auditor is fifty
51
thousand or more, five percent of the qualified voters of
52
the political subdivision determined on the basis of the
53
votes cast in the last gubernatorial election held prior to
54
the [filing] requesting of the petition, provided that the
55
number of qualified voters signing such petition is not less
56
than five thousand.
57
3. The political subdivision shall pay the actual cost
58
of audi t . The petition that requests an audit of a
59
political subdivision shall state on its face the estimated
60
cost of the audit and that it will be paid by the political
61
subdivision being audited. The estimated cost of the audit
62
shall be provided by the s t ate auditor within sixty days of
63
such request. The costs of the audit may be billed and paid
64
on an interim basis with individual billing periods to be
65
set at the state auditor's discretion. Moneys held by the
66
state on behalf of a political subdivi s ion may be used to
67
offset unpaid billings for audit costs of the political
68
subdivision. All moneys received by the state in payment of
69
the costs of petition audits shall be deposited in the state
70
treasury and credited to the "Petition Audit Revolving Trust
71
Fund" which is hereby created with the state treasurer as
72
custodian. The general assembly may appropriate additional
73
moneys to t he fund as it deems necessary. The state auditor
74
shall administer the fund and approve all disbursements,
75
upon appropriation, from the fund to apply to the costs of
76
performing petition audits. The provisions of section

SCS HB 3000 5
77
33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in the fund
78
shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of general
79
revenue until the amount in the fund at the end of any
80
biennium exceeds one million dollars. The amount in the
81
fund which shall lapse is the amount w hich exceeds one
82
million dollars. No political subdivision shall be audited
83
by petition more than once in any three calendar or fiscal
84
years.
85
4. Any person who allegedly signed or has signed the
86
origina l petition may submit a sworn statement to the state
87
auditor that the person did not sign such petition or that
88
the person wishes to rescind such signature. Such statement
89
shall be required to be made within ten days from submission
90
of the petition to the state auditor. If such statement is
91
timely filed, such signature shall be withdrawn and shall
92
not count in the determination of the number of qualified
93
voters necessary to compel an audit under subsection 2 of
94
this section.
1
34.046. The commissioner of administration may
2
contract dir e ctly with other governmental or nonprofit
3
entities for the purchase of supplies. The commissioner of
4
administration may also participate in , sponsor, conduct or
5
administer a cooperative purchasing agreement whereby
6
supplies are procured in accordance with a contract
7
established by another governmental entity or a nonprofit
8
entity, solely comprised of and controlled by one or more
9
political subdivisions, provided that such contract was
10
established in accordance with the laws and regulations
11
applicable to the establishing governmental or nonprofit
12
entity.
1
48.020. 1. All counties of this state are hereby
2
classified, f or t he purpose of establishing organization and

SCS HB 3000 6
3
powers in accordance with the provisions of Section 8,
4
Article VI, Constitution of Missouri, into four
5
classifications determined as follows:
6
Classification 1. All counties having an
7
assessed valuatio n of nine hundred million
8
dollars and over shall automatically be in the
9
first classification after that county has
10
maintained such valuation for the time period
11
required by section 48.030; however, any county
12
of the second classification which, on August
13
28, 2010, has had an assessed valuation of at
14
least six hundred million dollars for at least
15
one year may, by resolution of the governing
16
body of the county, elect to be classified as a
17
county of the first classification after it has
18
maintained such valuation for the period of time
19
required by the provisions of section 48.030.
20
Classification 2. All counties having an
21
assessed valuation of six hundred million
22
dollars and less than the assessed valuation
23
necessary for that county to be in the first
24
classification shall automatically be in the
25
second classification after that county has
26
maintained such valuation for the time period
27
required by section 48.030.
28
Classification 3. All counties having an
29
assessed valuatio n of less than the assessed
30
valuation necessary for that county to be in the
31
second classification shall automatically be in
32
the third classification.
33
Classification 4. All counties which have
34
attained the seco n d classification prior to

SCS HB 3000 7
35
August 13, 1988, and which would otherwise
36
return to the third classification after August
37
13, 1988, because of changes in assessed
38
valuation shall remain a county in the second
39
classification and shall operate under the laws
40
of this state applying to the second
41
classification. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
42
all counties wh i ch have attained the fourth
43
classification prior to January 1, 2027, and
44
which would otherwise move to a county of the
45
third classification on January 1, 2027, shall
46
remain a county in the fourth classification and
47
shall operate under the laws of the state
48
applying to the second classification through
49
December 31, 2030, subject to the provisions of
50
subsection 2 of section 48.030.
51
2. The required assessed valuation for each
52
classif i cation under subsection 1 of this section shall be
53
increased annually by an amount equal to the percentage
54
change in the annual average of the Consumer Price Index for
55
All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) or zero, whichever is greater.
56
The state tax commission shall calculate and publish this
57
amount so that it is available to all counties.
1
49.082. 1. A county commissioner in any county, other
2
than in a fi r st c lassification chartered county or a first
3
classification county not having a charter form of
4
government and not containing any part of a city with a
5
population of three hundred thousand or more, shall, subject
6
to any other adjustment otherwise provided in this section,
7
receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the
8
following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be
9
the amount thereof a s shown for the year next preceding the

SCS HB 3000 8
10
computation. The provisions of this section shall not
11
permit or re q uire a reduction in the amount of compensation
12
being paid for the office of commissioner on January 1, 1997.
13
Assessed Valuation Salary
14
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $19,140
15
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 19,800
16
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 21,120
17
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 22,440
18
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 23,760
19
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 25,080
20
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 26,400
21
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 27,060
22
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 27,390
23
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 28,380
24
300,000,000 or more 29,700
25
2. A county commissioner who begins a term after
26
August 2 8, 2026, shall receive an annual salary computed as
27
set forth in the following schedule.
28
Assessed Valuation Salary
29
Under $51,000,000 $23,800
30
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 25,800
31
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 27,800

SCS HB 3000 9
32
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 29,800
33
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 31,700
34
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 33,700
35
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 35,700
36
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 37,700
37
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 39,700
38
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 41,600
39
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 43,600
40
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 45,600
41
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 47,600
42
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 49,600
43
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 51,500
44
10,000,000,001 or more 53,500
45
3. In addition to any compensation provided pursuant
46
to subs e ction 1 of this section, the presiding commissioner
47
of any county not having a charter form of government shall
48
receive two thousand dollars annual salary.
49
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized
50
in this s ect i on shall be payable to a commissioner only if
51
the commissioner has completed at least twenty hours of
52
classroom instruction each calendar year relating to the
53
operations of the commissioner's office when approved by a
54
professional association of the county commissioners of
55
Missouri unless [exempted from the training] an alternative
56
option is approved by the professional association. The

SCS HB 3000 10
57
professional association approving the program shall provide
58
a certificate of completion to each commissioner who
59
completes the training program and shall send a list of
60
certified commissioners to the treasurer of each county.
61
Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be
62
reimbursed to a county commissioner in the same manner as
63
other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
64
[4.] 5. A county commissioner in any county, other
65
than a fi rst classification charter county or a first
66
classification county not having a charter form of
67
government and not containing any part of a city with a
68
population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not,
69
except upon a two-thirds vote of all the members of the
70
salary commission, receive an annual compensation in an
71
amount less than the total compensation being received for
72
the office of county commissioner or presiding commissioner
73
respectively for the particular county for services rendered
74
or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
1
50.327. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
2
law to the c o ntr a ry, the salary schedules contained in
3
sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269,
4
53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and
5
473.742 shall be set as a base schedule for tho s e county
6
officials. Except when it is necessary to increase newly
7
elected or reelected county officials' salaries, in
8
accordance with Section 13, Article VII, Constitution of
9
Missouri, to comply with the requirements of this section,
10
the salary commission in all counties except charter
11
counties in this state shall be responsible for the
12
computation of salaries of all county officials; provided,
13
however, that any percentage salary adjustments in a county
14
shall be equal for all such officials in that county and any

SCS HB 3000 11
15
salary adjustment after August 28, 2026, shall not decrease
16
the current salary of any official. To the extent that the
17
current salary of any official exce e ds the amount set forth
18
in the salary schedules contained in sections 49.082,
19
50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261,
20
54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742 as of August 28,
21
2026, such salary may only be increased as a result of
22
further increases to assessed value as provided in such
23
sections or in section 50.333.
24
2. In addition to the amounts set forth in the salary
25
schedul e s contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343,
26
51.281, 52.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320,
27
55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742, salaries shall be
28
adjusted each year on the anniversary date of each
29
official's current term. The amount of adjustment shall be
30
based on the following ca lculation:
31
(1) Determine the difference between the last
32
complete d assessed value for the county minus the assessed
33
value for the county for the year prior to the last
34
completed assessed value;
35
(2) Divide the difference by the amount of the last
36
complete d assessed value to determine the annual assessed
37
value growth;
38
(3) Multiply the annual assessed value growth by the
39
followin g amount:
40
Annual Assessed Value Amount
41
Growth
42
Negative No Change
43
0 - 2.99% 1

SCS HB 3000 12
44
3.00 - 5.99% 0.5
45
6.00 - 6.99% 0.33
46
7.00 - 7.99% 0.25
47
8.00 - 9.99% 0.20
48
10% plus .013
49
(4) Multiply the product of the calculation set forth
50
in subdi v ision (3) of this subsection by the official's
51
current salary; and
52
(5) Add the product of the calculation set forth in
53
subdivis i on (4) of this subsection to the current salary
54
amount. Adjustments made pursuant to this subsection shall
55
not equ a l or exceed the salary for the next highest assessed
56
valuation contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343,
57
51.281, 52.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320,
58
55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742.
59
3. Upon majority approval of the salary commission,
60
the ann u al compensation of part-time prosecutors contained
61
in section 56.265 and the county offices contained in
62
sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269,
63
53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 58.095, and 473.742
64
may be increased [by up to two thousand dollars] greater
65
than the compensation provided by the salary schedules;
66
provided, however, that any vote to increase compensation be
67
effective for all county offices in that county subject to
68
the salary commission.
69
[3.] 4. Upon the majority approval of the salary
70
commissio n, t he annual compensation of a county coroner of
71
any county not having a charter form of government as
72
provided in section 58.095 may be increased up to fourteen

SCS HB 3000 13
73
thousand dollars greater than the compensation provided by
74
the salary schedule of such section.
75
[4.] 5. The salary commission of any county of the
76
third cla ssi f ication may amend the base schedules for the
77
computation of salaries for county officials referenced in
78
subsection 1 of this section to include assessed valuation
79
factors in excess of three hundred million dollars; provided
80
that the percentage of any adjustments in assessed valuation
81
factors shall be equal for all such officials in that county.
1
50.333. 1. There shall be a salary commission in
2
every noncha r ter e d county.
3
2. The clerk or court administrator of the circuit
4
court o f the judicial circuit in which such county is
5
located shall set a date, time and place for the salary
6
commission meeting and serve as temporary [chairman] chair
7
of the salary commission until the members of the commission
8
elect a [chairman] chair from their number. Upon written
9
request of a majority of the salary commiss i on members the
10
clerk or court administrator of the circuit court shall
11
forthwith set the earliest date possible for a meeting of
12
the salary commission. The circuit clerk or court
13
administrator shall giv e notice of the time and place of any
14
meeting of the salary commission. Such notice shall be
15
published in a newspaper of gener a l circulation in such
16
county at least five days prior to such meeting. Such
17
notice shall contain a general description of th e business
18
to be discussed at such meeting.
19
3. The members of the salary commission shall be:
20
(1 ) The recorder of deeds if the recorder's office is
21
separate from that of the circuit clerk;
22
(2) The county clerk;
23
(3) [The prosecuting attorney;

SCS HB 3000 14
24
(4)] The sheriff;
25
[(5) ] (4) The county commissioners;
26
[(6)] (5) The collector or treasurer ex officio
27
collector;
28
[(7)] (6) The treasurer or treasurer ex officio
29
collector;
30
[(8)] (7) The assessor;
31
[(9)] (8) The auditor;
32
[(10) ] (9 ) The public administrator; and
33
[(11)] (10 ) The coroner.
34
In a county with more than one hundred fifty thousand but
35
fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, the prosecuting
36
attorney and the sheriff shall be members of the salary
37
commission. In any county that utilizes assistant
38
prosecuting attorneys, such assistant prosecuting attorneys
39
shall be members of the salary commission.
40
4. Members of the salary commission shall receive no
41
additio n al compensation for their services as members of the
42
salary commission. A majority of members shall constitute a
43
quorum.
44
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections
45
610.021 a nd 6 10.022, all meetings of a county salary
46
commission shall be open meetings and all votes taken at
47
such meetings shall be open records. Any vote taken at any
48
meeting of the salary commission sha l l be taken by recorded
49
yeas and nays.
50
[5.] 6. In every county, the salary commission shall
51
meet at l eas t once before November thirtieth of each odd-
52
numbered year and may meet in any even-numbered year. The
53
salary commission may meet as many times as it deems
54
necessary and may meet after November thirtieth and prior to

SCS HB 3000 15
55
December fifteenth of any odd-numbered year if the
56
commission has met at least once prior to November thirtieth
57
of that year. At any meeting of the salary commission, the
58
members shall elect a [chairman] chair from their number.
59
The county clerk shall present a report on the financial
60
condition of the county to the commission once the
61
[chairman] chair is elected, and shall keep the minutes of
62
the meeting.
63
[6.] 7. For purposes of this section, the 1988 base
64
compensat ion is the compensation paid on September 1, 1987,
65
plus the same percentage increase paid or allowed, whichever
66
is greater, to the presiding commissioner or the sheriff,
67
whichever is greater, of that county for the year beginning
68
January 1, 1988. Such increase shall be expressed as a
69
percentage of th e difference between the maximum allowable
70
compensation and the compensation paid on September 1, 1987.
71
[At its meeting in 1987 and at any meeting held in 1988,
72
the salary commission shall determine the compensation to be
73
paid to every county officer holding office on January 1,
74
1988.] The salary commission shall establish the
75
compen s ation for each office at an amount not greater than
76
that set by law as the maximum compensation. If the salary
77
commission votes to increase compensation, b u t not to pay
78
the maximum amount authorized by law for any officer or
79
office, then the increase in compensation shall be the same
80
percentage increase for all officers and offices and shall
81
be expressed as a percentage of the difference between the
82
maximum allowable compensation and the compensation being
83
received at the time of the vote. If two-thirds of the
84
members of the salary commission v ote to decrease the
85
compensation being received at the time of the vote below
86
that compensation, all officers shall receive the same

SCS HB 3000 16
87
percentage decrease. The commission may vote not to
88
increase or decrease the compensation and that compensation
89
shall continue to be the salary of such offices and officers
90
during the subsequent term of office.
91
[7.] 8. For the year 1989 and every second year
92
thereafte r, t he salary commission shall meet in every county
93
as many times as it deems necessary on or prior to November
94
thirtieth of any such year for the purpose of determining
95
the amount of compensation to be paid to county officials.
96
For each year in which the commission meets, the members
97
shall elect a [chairman] chair from their number. The
98
county clerk shall present a report on the financi al
99
condition of the county to the commission once the
100
[chairman] chair is elected, and shall keep minutes of the
101
meeting. The salary commission shall then consider the
102
compensa t ion to be paid for the next term of office for each
103
county officer to be elected at their next general
104
election. If the commission votes not to increase or
105
decrease t he compensation, the salary being paid during the
106
term in which the vote was taken shall continue as the
107
salary of such offices and officers during the subsequent
108
term of office. If the salary commission votes to increase
109
the compensatio n , all officers or offices whose compensation
110
is being considered by the commission at that time shall
111
receive the same percentage of the maximum allowable
112
compensation. However, for any county in which all offices'
113
and officers' salaries have been set at one hundred percent
114
of the maximum allowable compensation, the commission may
115
vote to increase the compensation of all offices except that
116
of full-time prosecuting attorneys at that or any subsequent
117
meeting of the salary commission without regard to any law
118
or maximum limitation established by law. Such increase

SCS HB 3000 17
119
shall be expressed as a percentage of the compensation being
120
paid during the term of office when the vote is taken, and
121
each officer or office whose compensation is being
122
established by the salary commission at that time shall
123
receive the same percentage increase over the compensation
124
being paid for that office during the term when the vote is
125
taken. This increase shall be in addition to any increase
126
mandat e d by an official's salary schedule because of changes
127
in assessed valuation during the current term. If the
128
salary commission votes to decrease the compen s ation, a vote
129
of two-thirds or more of all the members of the salary
130
commission shall be required before the salary or other
131
compensation of any county office shall be decreased below
132
the compensation being paid for the particular office on the
133
date the salary commission votes, and all officers and
134
offices shall receive the same percentage decrease.
135
[8.] 9. The salary commission shall issue, not later
136
than Dece mbe r fifteenth of any year in which it meets, a
137
report of compensation to be paid to each officer and the
138
compensation so set shall be paid beginning with the start
139
of the subsequent term of office of each officer. The
140
report of compensation shall be certified to the c lerk of
141
the county commission for the county and shall be in
142
substantially the following form:
143
The salary commission for _________ County
144
hereby certifies that it has met pursuant to law
145
to establish compensation for county officers to
146
be paid to such officers during the next term of
147
office for the officers affected. The salary
148
commission reports that there sha l l be (no
149
increase in compensation) (an increase of
150
_________ percent) (a decrease of _________

SCS HB 3000 18
151
percent) (county officer's salaries set at
152
_________ percent of the maximum allowable
153
compensation).
154
Salaries shall be adjusted each year on the official's year
155
of incumbency for any change in the last completed
156
assessment that would affect the maximum allowable
157
compensation for that office.
158
[9.] 10. For the meeting in 1989 and every meeting
159
thereafte r, i n the event a salary commission in any county
160
fails, neglects or refuses to meet as provided in this
161
section, or in the event a majority of the salary commission
162
is unable to reach an agreement and so reports or fails to
163
certify a salary report to the clerk of the county
164
commission by December fifteenth of any year in which a
165
report is required to be certified by this section, then the
166
compensation being paid to each affected office or officer
167
on such date shall continue to be the compensation paid to
168
the affected office or officer during the succeeding term of
169
office.
170
[10.] 11. Other provisions of law notwithstanding, in
171
every inst ance where an officer or employee of any county is
172
paid a mileage allowance or reimbursement, the county
173
commission shall allow or reimburse such officers or
174
employees out of the county treasury at the highest rate
175
paid to any county officer for each mile actually and
176
necessarily traveled in the performance of their official
177
duties. The county commission of any county may elect to
178
pay a m i leage allowance for any county commissioner for
179
travel going to and returning from the place of holding
180
commission meetings and for all other necessary travel on
181
official county business in the personal motor vehicle of

SCS HB 3000 19
182
the commissioner presenting the claim. The governing body
183
of any county of the first classificat i on [not having a
184
charter form of government] may provide by order for the
185
payment of mileage expenses of elected and appointed county
186
officials by payment of a certain amount monthly which would
187
reflect the average monthly mileage expenses of such officer
188
based on the amount allowed pursuant to state law for the
189
payment of mileage for state employees. Any order entered
190
for such purpose shall not be construed as salary, wages or
191
other compensation for services rendered.
192
[11.] 12. The term "maximum allowable compensation" as
193
used in th is s e ction means the highest compensation which
194
may be paid to the specified officer or office in the
195
particular county based on the salary schedule established
196
by law for the specified officer or office. If the salary
197
commission at its meeting in 1987 voted for one hundred
198
percent of the maximum allowable compensation and does not
199
change such vote at its meeting held within thirty days
200
after May 13, 1988, as provided in subsection 6 of this
201
section, the one hundred percent shall be calculated on the
202
basis of the total allowable compensation permitted after
203
May 13, 1988.
204
[12.] 13. At the salary commission meeting which
205
establishe s th e percentage rate to be applied to county
206
officers during the next term of office, the salary
207
commission may authorize the further adjustment of such
208
officers' compensation as a cost-of-living component and
209
effective January first of each year, the compensation for
210
county officers may be adjusted by the county commission,
211
and if the adjustment of compensation is authorized, the
212
percentage increase shall be the same for all county
213
officers, not to exceed the percentage increase given to the

SCS HB 3000 20
214
other county employees. The compensation for all county
215
officers may be set as a group, although the change in
216
compensation will not become effective until the next term
217
of office for each officer.
218
[13. At the salary commission meeting in 1997 which
219
establish e s the salaries for those officers to be elected at
220
the general election in 1998, the salary commission of each
221
noncharter county may provide salary increases for associate
222
county commissioners elected in 1996. This one-time
223
increase is necessitated by the chang e from two- to four-
224
year terms for associate commissioners pursuant to house
225
bill 256, passed by the first regular session of the eighty-
226
eighth general assembly in 1995.]
1
50.334. 1. In all counties, except counties of the
2
first classi f ica t ion having a charter form of government and
3
counties of the first classification not having a charter
4
form of government and not containing any part of a city
5
with a population of three hundred thousand or more, each
6
recorder of deeds, if the recorder's office is separate from
7
that of the circuit clerk, shall receive as total
8
compensation for all services performed by the recorder,
9
except as provided pursuant to section 50.333, an annual
10
salary which shall be computed on an assessed valuation
11
basis as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed
12
valuation factor shall be the amount thereof a s computed for
13
the year next preceding the computation. The county
14
recorder of deeds whose office is separa t e from that of the
15
circuit clerk in any county, other than a county of the
16
first classification having a charter form of government or
17
a county of the first classification not having a charter
18
form of government and not containing any part of a city
19
with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall

SCS HB 3000 21
20
not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the
21
salary commission, receive an annual compensation in an
22
amount less than the total compensation being received for
23
the office of county recorder of deeds in the particular
24
county for services rendered or performed on January 1, 1997.
25
Assessed Valuation Salary
26
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
27
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
28
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
29
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
30
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
31
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
32
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
33
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
34
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
35
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
36
300,000,000 or more 45,000
37
2. A recorder of deeds who begins a term after August
38
28, 202 6 , shall receive an annual salary computed as set
39
forth in the following schedule.
40
Assessed Valuation Salary
41
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
42
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100

SCS HB 3000 22
43
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
44
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
45
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
46
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
47
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
48
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
49
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
50
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
51
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
52
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
53
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
54
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
55
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
56
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
57
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in
58
this se c tion shall be payable to the recorder only if he has
59
completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
60
each calendar year relating to the operations of the
61
recorder's office when approved by a professional
62
association of the county recorders of deeds of Missouri
63
unless [exempted from the training] an alternative option is
64
approved by the professional association. The professional
65
association approving the program shall p r ovide a
66
certificate of completion to each recorder who completes the

SCS HB 3000 23
67
training program and shall send a list of certified
68
recorders to the treasurer of each county. Expenses
69
incurred for attending the training sessio n shall be
70
reimbursed to the county recorder in the same manner as
71
other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
1
51.281. 1. The county clerk in any county, other than
2
in a first c l ass i fication county, shall receive an annual
3
salary computed as set forth in the following schedule. The
4
assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof a s
5
shown for the year next preceding the computation. The
6
provisions of this section shall not permit or req u ire a
7
reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the
8
office of clerk on January 1, 1997.
9
Assessed Valuation Salary
10
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
11
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
12
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
13
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
14
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
15
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
16
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
17
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
18
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
19
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
20
300,000,000 or more 45,000

SCS HB 3000 24
21
2. A county clerk who begins a term after August 28,
22
2026, s h all receive an annual salary computed as set forth
23
in the following schedule.
24
Assessed Valuation Salary
25
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
26
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
27
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
28
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
29
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
30
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
31
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
32
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
33
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
34
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
35
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
36
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
37
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
38
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
39
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
40
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
41
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in
42
this se c tion shall be payable to the clerk only if the clerk
43
has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction

SCS HB 3000 25
44
each calendar year relating to the operations of the clerk's
45
office when approved by [a professional] the Missouri
46
association of [the] county clerks [of Missouri] and
47
election authorities unless [exempted from the training] an
48
alternative option is approved by the professional
49
association. The professional association approving the
50
program shal l provide a certificate of completion to each
51
clerk who completes the training program and shall send a
52
list of certified clerks to the treasurer of each county.
53
Expenses incurred for attending the training session may b e
54
reimbursed to the county clerk in the same manner as other
55
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
56
[3.] 4. The county clerk may retain any fees to which
57
he is enti tle d fo r servi ces pe rfor med in the issua nce of
58
fis h a nd game l icen ses or pe rmits.
59
[4. ] 5. The coun ty clerk in any county, other than a
60
first cla ssi f ication charter county or a first
61
classification county not having a charter for m of
62
government and not containing any part of a city with a
63
population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not,
64
except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary
65
commission, receive an annual compensation in an amount less
66
than the total compensation being received for the office of
67
county clerk in the particular county for services rendered
68
or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
1
52.269. 1. In all counties, except first
2
classificati o n c o unties having a charter form of government
3
and first classification counties not having a charter form
4
of government and not containing any part of a city with a
5
population of three hundred thousand or more, the county
6
collector shall receive an annual salary which shall be paid
7
in equal monthly installments by the county. The salary

SCS HB 3000 26
8
shall be computed on an assessed valuation basis as provided
9
in this subsection. The assessed valuation factor shall be
10
the amount as shown for the year next preceding the annual
11
salary computation. A county collector subject to the
12
provisions of this s ection shall not receive an annual
13
compensation less than the total compensation being received
14
by the county collector in that county for services rendered
15
or performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and
16
ending February 29, 1988. The county collector shall
17
receive the same percenta g e adjustments provided by the
18
county salary commissions for county officers in that county
19
pursuant to section 50.333. The provisions of this section
20
shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of
21
compensation being paid for the office of county collector
22
on January 1, 1997, or less than the total compensation
23
being received for the services rendered or performed for
24
the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29,
25
1988. The salary shall be computed on the basis of the
26
follo w ing schedule:
27
Assessed Valuation Salary
28
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
29
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
30
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
31
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
32
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
33
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
34
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000

SCS HB 3000 27
35
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
36
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
37
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
38
300,000,000 or more 45,000
39
2. A county collector who begins a term after August
40
28, 202 6 , shall receive an annual salary computed as set
41
forth in the following schedule.
42
Assessed Valuation Salary
43
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
44
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
45
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
46
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
47
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
48
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
49
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
50
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
51
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
52
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
53
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
54
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
55
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100

SCS HB 3000 28
56
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
57
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
58
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
59
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in
60
this se c tion shall be payable to the collector only if the
61
collector has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
62
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of
63
the collector's office when approved by a professional
64
association of the county collectors of Missouri unless
65
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is
66
approved by the professional association. The professional
67
association approving the program shall p r ovide a
68
certificate of completion to each collector who completes
69
the training program and shall send a list of certified
70
collectors to the treasurer of each county. Expenses
71
incurred for attending the training session may be
72
reimbursed to the county collector in the same manner as
73
other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
74
[3.] 4. Any provision of law to the contrary
75
notwithst and i ng, any fee provided for in section 52.250 or
76
52.275, when collected on ditch and levee taxes, shall not
77
be collected on behalf of the county and deposited into the
78
county general revenue fund. Such fee shall be retained by
79
the collector as compensatio n for his services, in addition
80
to any amount provided for such collector in this section.
81
[4.] 5. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this
82
section, aft e r the next general election following January
83
1, 1988, all fees collected by the collector shall be

SCS HB 3000 29
84
collected on behalf of the county and deposited in the
85
county general revenue fund.
1
53.082. 1. The county assessor in any county, other
2
than in a fi r st c lassification county, shall receive an
3
annual salary computed as set forth in the following
4
schedule provided in this subsection. The assessed
5
valuation factor shall be the amount t hereof as shown for
6
the year next preceding the computation. The provisions of
7
this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the
8
amount of compensation being paid for the office of assessor
9
on September 1, 1997.
10
Assessed Valuation Salary
11
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
12
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
13
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
14
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
15
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
16
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
17
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
18
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
19
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
20
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
21
300,000,000 or more 45,000

SCS HB 3000 30
22
2. A county assessor who begins a term after August
23
28, 202 6 , shall receive an annual salary computed as set
24
forth in the following schedule.
25
Assessed Valuation Salary
26
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
27
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
28
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
29
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
30
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
31
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
32
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
33
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
34
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
35
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
36
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
37
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
38
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
39
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
40
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
41
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
42
3. The compensation for county assessors in second,
43
third a n d fourth classification counties for the term of
44
office beginning September 1, 1997, shall be calculated

SCS HB 3000 31
45
pursuant to the salary schedule in this section using the
46
percentage increase approved by the county salary commission
47
when establishing the compensation for the office of county
48
assessor at the salary commission meeting in 1997. This
49
salary shall become effective on September 1, 1997 .
50
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized
51
in this s ect i on shall be payable to the assessor only if the
52
assessor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
53
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of
54
the assessor's office when approved by a professional
55
association of the county assessors of Missouri unless
56
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is
57
approved by the professional association. The professional
58
association approving the program shall p r ovide a
59
certificate of completion to each assessor who completes the
60
training program and shall send a list of certified
61
assessors to the treasurer of each county. Expenses
62
incurred for attending the training sessio n may be
63
reimbursed to the county assessor in the same manner as
64
other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
65
[4.] 5. The county assessor in any county, except a
66
first cla ssi f ication county, shall not, except upon two-
67
thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission,
68
receive an annual compensation in an amount less than the
69
total compensation being received for the office of county
70
assessor in the particular county for services rendered or
71
performed on the date the salary commission votes.
1
54.261. 1. The county treasurer in counties of the
2
first classi f ica t ion, not having a charter form of
3
government and containing a portion of a city with a
4
population of three hundred thousand or more, and in
5
counties of the second, third and fourth classifications of

SCS HB 3000 32
6
this state, shall receive as compensation for services
7
performed by the treasurer an annual salary based upon the
8
assessed valuation of the county. The provisions of this
9
section shall not permit or requi r e a reduction, nor shall
10
require an increase, in the amount of compensation being
11
paid for the office of treasurer on January 1, 2002.
12
2. The amount of salary based upon assessed valuation
13
shall b e computed according to the following schedule:
14
Assessed Valuation Salary
15
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
16
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
17
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
18
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
19
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
20
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
21
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
22
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
23
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
24
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
25
300,000,000 or more 45,000
26
3. A county treasurer who begins a term after August
27
28, 202 6 , shall receive an annual salary computed as set
28
forth in the following schedule.
29
Assessed Valuation Salary

SCS HB 3000 33
30
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
31
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
32
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
33
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
34
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
35
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
36
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
37
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
38
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
39
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
40
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
41
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
42
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
43
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
44
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
45
$10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
46
4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in
47
this se c tion shall be payable to the treasurer only if the
48
treasurer has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
49
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of
50
the treasurer's office when approved by a professional
51
association of the county treasurers or county collectors of
52
Missouri unless [exempted from the training] an alternative
53
option is approved by the professional association. The

SCS HB 3000 34
54
professional association approving the program shall provide
55
a certificate of completion to each treasurer who completes
56
the training program and shall send a list of certified
57
treasurers to the county commission of each county.
58
Expenses incurred for attending the training sessio n shall
59
be reimbursed to the county treasurer in the same manner as
60
other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
61
[4.] 5. The county treasurer in any county, other than
62
a county of t he first classification having a charter form
63
of government or a county of the first classification not
64
having a charter form of government and not containing any
65
part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand
66
or more, shall not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the
67
members of the commission, receive an annual compensation in
68
an amount less than the total compensation being received
69
for the office of county treasurer in the particular county
70
for services rendered or performed on the date the salary
71
commission votes.
72
[5.] 6. In the event of a vacancy due to death,
73
resignati on, or otherwise in the office of treasurer in any
74
county except a county with a charter form of government,
75
and when there is no deputy treasurer, the county commission
76
shall appoint a qualified acting treasurer until such time
77
as the vacancy is filled by the governor pursuant to section
78
105.030 or the elected treasurer returns to work. The
79
county commission shall employ and fix the compens ation of
80
clerical and other assistants necessary to enable the
81
interim treasurer to efficiently perform the duties of the
82
office.
1
54.320. 1. The county collector-treasurer in counties
2
of the third and fourth classifications adopting township
3
organization shall receive an annual salary as set forth in

SCS HB 3000 35
4
the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall
5
be the amount thereof a s shown for the year next preceding
6
the computation. A county collector-treasurer subject to
7
the provisions o f this section shall not receive an annual
8
compensation less than the total compensation being received
9
by the county treasurer ex officio collector in that county
10
for services rendered or performed for the period beginning
11
March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The county
12
collector-treasurer shall receive the same p e rcentage
13
adjustments provided by county salary commissions for county
14
officers in that county pursuant to section 50.333. The
15
provisions of this section shall not permit or requ i re a
16
reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the
17
office of county treasurer ex officio collector on January
18
1, 1997, or less than the total compensation being received
19
for the services rendered or performed for the period
20
beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The
21
salary shall be computed on the basis of the following
22
schedule:
23
Assessed Valuation Salary
24
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
25
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
26
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
27
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
28
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
29
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
30
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000

SCS HB 3000 36
31
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
32
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
33
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
34
300,000,000 to 449,999,999 45,000
35
In addition, the collector-treasurer shall collect on behalf
36
of the county a fee for the collection of all back taxes and
37
all delinquent taxes of two percent on all sums collected to
38
be added to the face of the tax bill, and collected from the
39
party paying the tax. The collector-treasurer shall collect
40
on behalf of the count y a fee of three percent on all
41
licenses, including current railroad and utility taxes,
42
surtax, back taxes, delinquent taxes and interest collected
43
by the collector-treasurer, to be deducted from the amounts
44
collected. The collector-treasurer shall collect on behalf
45
of the cou n ty for the purpose of mailing statements and
46
receipts required by section 139.350 a fee of one-half of
47
one percent on all licenses and all taxes, including current
48
taxes, back taxes, delinquent taxes, and interest collected
49
by the collector-treasurer, to be deducted from the amounts
50
collected. All fees collected under this section shall be
51
collected o n behalf of the county and shall be deposited in
52
the county treasury or as provided by law. Collector-
53
treasurers in counties having a township f o rm of government
54
are entitled to collect such fees immediately upon an order
55
of the circuit court under section 139.031. If the protest
56
is later sustained and a portion of the taxes so paid is
57
returned to the taxpayer the county shall return that
58
portion of the fee collected on the amount returned to the

SCS HB 3000 37
59
taxpayer. The collector-treasurer in each of the third and
60
fourth cl a ssification counties which have adopted the
61
township form of county government is entitled to employ
62
deputies and assistants, and for the deputies and assistants
63
is allowed not less than the amount allowed in 2003-2004,
64
whichever is greater.
65
2. A county collector-treasurer who begins a term
66
after A u gust 28, 2026, shall receive an annual salary
67
computed as set forth in the following schedule.
68
Assessed Valuation Salary
69
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
70
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
71
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
72
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
73
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
74
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
75
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
76
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
77
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
78
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
79
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
80
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
81
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
82
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100

SCS HB 3000 38
83
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
84
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
85
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the
86
contrar y , the collector-treasurer in each county of the
87
third or fourth classification having a township form of
88
government shall employ not fewer than one full-time
89
deputy. The collector-treasurer may employ such number of
90
deputie s and assistants as may be necessary to perform the
91
duties of the office of collector-treasurer promptly and
92
correctly, as determined by the collector-treasurer. The
93
office of the collector-treasurer shall be funded
94
sufficiently to compensate deputies and assistants at a
95
level no less than the compensation provided for other
96
county employees. Such deputies and assistants shall be
97
allowed adjustment s in compensation at the same percentage
98
as provided for other county employees, as effective January
99
first each year.
100
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized
101
in this s ect i on shall be payable to the collector-treasurer
102
only if such officer has completed at least twenty hours of
103
classroom instruction each calendar year relating to the
104
operations of the collector-treasurer's office when approved
105
by a professional association of the county treasurers or
106
county collectors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
107
training] an alternative option is approved by the
108
professional association. The professional association
109
approving the program sha l l provide a certificate of
110
completion to each collector-treasurer who completes the
111
training program and shall send a list of certified
112
collector-treasurers to the county commission of each

SCS HB 3000 39
113
county. Expenses incurred for attending the training
114
session may be reimbursed to the county collector-treasurer
115
in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated
116
for that purpose.
1
55.091. 1. The county auditor in any county, other
2
than in a fi r st c lassification chartered county or a first
3
classification county not having a charter form of
4
government and not containing any part of a city with a
5
population of three hundred thousand or more, shall receive
6
an annual salary computed on an assessed valuation basis as
7
set forth in the following schedule. The assessed valuation
8
factor shall be the amount thereof a s shown for the year
9
next preceding the computation. The provisions of this
10
section shall not permit or req u ire a reduction in the
11
amount of compensation being paid for the office of auditor
12
on January 1, 1997.
13
Assessed Valuation Salary
14
$131,000,000 to 189,999,999 $40,500
15
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
16
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
17
300,000,000 to 399,999,999 45,000
18
400,000,000 to 499,999,999 46,000
19
500,000,000 or more 47,000
20
2. A county auditor who begins a term after August 28,
21
2026, s h all receive an annual salary computed as set forth
22
in the following schedule.

SCS HB 3000 40
23
Assessed Valuation Salary
24
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
25
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
26
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
27
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
28
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
29
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
30
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
31
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
32
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
33
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
34
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
35
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
36
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
37
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
38
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
39
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
40
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in
41
this se c tion shall be payable to the auditor only if the
42
auditor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
43
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of
44
the auditor's office when approved by a professional
45
association of the county auditors of Missouri unless

SCS HB 3000 41
46
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is
47
approved by the professional association. The professional
48
association approving the program shall p r ovide a
49
certificate of completion to each auditor who completes the
50
training program and shall send a list of certified auditors
51
to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred
52
attending the training session m a y be reimbursed to the
53
county auditor in the same manner as other expenses as may
54
be appropriated for that purpose.
55
[3.] 4. The county auditor in any county, other than a
56
first cla ssi f ication charter county, shall not, except upon
57
two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission,
58
receive an annual compensation less than the total
59
compensation being received for the office of county auditor
60
in the particular county for services rendered or performed
61
on the date the salary commission votes.
1
58.095. 1. The county coroner in any county not
2
having a cha r ter form of government shall receive an annual
3
salary computed on a basis as set forth in the following
4
schedule, as well as any adjustment authorized under
5
subsection [3] 4 of section 50.327. The provisions of this
6
section shall not permit or require a reduction in the
7
amount of compensation being paid for the office of coroner
8
on January 1, 2025:
9
Assessed Valuation Salary
10
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $8,000
11
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 8,500
12
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 9,000
13
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 9,500

SCS HB 3000 42
14
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 10,000
15
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 11,000
16
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 12,000
17
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 13,000
18
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 14,000
19
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 15,000
20
300,000,000 or more 16,000
21
2. (1) One thousand dollars of the salary authorized
22
in this sect i on shall be payable to the coroner, deputy
23
coroner, and assistants only if the coroner, deputy coroner,
24
or assistant has completed at least twenty hours of
25
classroom instruction each calendar year as presented by a
26
state-recognized and -accredited or nationally recognized
27
and accredited credentialing organization that certifies
28
individuals to conduct death investigations. Certified
29
training completion shall be submitted to a p rofessional
30
association of the county coroners of Missouri which, upon
31
validating the certified training, shall submit the
32
individual's name to the county treasurer and department of
33
health and senior services indicating the individual is
34
compliant with the training requirements.
35
(2) Expenses incurred for attending the training
36
session s hall be reimbursed to the county coroner in the
37
same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for
38
that purpose to the extent that such expenses are not fully
39
reimbursed under paragraph (c) of subdivision (2) of
40
subsection 1 of section 58.208.

SCS HB 3000 43
41
3. The county coroner in any county not having a
42
charter form of government shall not, except upon two-thirds
43
vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an
44
annual compensation in an amount less than the total
45
compensation being received for the office of county coroner
46
in the particular county for services rendered or performed
47
on the date the salary commission votes.
48
4. For the term beginning in 1997, the compensation of
49
the cor o ner, in counties in which the salary commission has
50
not voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum
51
allowable salary, shall be a percentage of the maximum
52
allowable salary established by this section. The
53
percentage applied shall be the same percenta g e of the
54
maximum allowable salary received or allowed, whichever is
55
greater, to the presiding commissioner or sheriff, whichever
56
is greater, of that county for the year beginning January 1,
57
1997. In those counties in which the salary commission has
58
voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum allowable
59
salary, the compensation of the coroner shall be based on
60
the maximum allowable salary in effect at each time a
61
coroner's term of office commences following the vote to pay
62
one hundred percent of the maximum allowable compensation.
63
Subsequent compensation shall be determined as provided in
64
section 50.333.
1
59.120. 1. The recorder shall keep [his] the
2
recorder's o f fic e at the seat of justice, and the county
3
commission shall provide the same with suitable books, in
4
which the recorder shall record all instruments of writing
5
authorized and required to be recorded. If there is no
6
courthouse or other suitable county bui l ding at the seat of
7
justice, the county commission shall provide an office for

SCS HB 3000 44
8
the recorder at any other place in the county where there is
9
a courthouse and courts of record are held.
10
2. Each recorder shall display in the recorder's
11
office i n a place visible to the public a printed sign with
12
the following text in all capital letters of at least one
13
inch in height: "WARNING: THE OFFENSE OF FILING FALSE
14
DOCUMENTS IS A F ELONY UNDE R MISSOURI LAW (RSMO 570.095) WITH
15
PENALTIES THAT MAY INCLUDE JAIL OR PRISON TIME AND FINANCIAL
16
RESTITUTION.".
1
67.058. 1. The governing body of a political
2
subdivision m ay d istribute surplus or unneeded supplies or
3
property in the same manner as provided for the distribution
4
of federal surplus property.
5
2. The governing body of a political subdivision may
6
sell su r plus or unneeded supplies or property to the general
7
public. For items with a value of five hundred dollars or
8
less, t h e governing body shall obtain the name of the
9
purchaser, their phone n u mber and address, and a description
10
of the property sold, the amount paid, and the date. All
11
items with a value over five hundred dollars shall b e sold
12
on an online auction platform approved by the office of
13
administration or by sealed bid.
14
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 and
15
2 of th i s section to the contrary, the governing body of a
16
political subdivision shall not donate or sell surplus
17
emergency vehicles or unneeded supplies or property to
18
members of the governing body, officers, or employees of the
19
political subdivision or their relatives within the fourth
20
degree by consanguinity or affinity, nor to an entity of
21
which a member of the governing body, officer, or employee
22
is a board member or officer unless such surplus is sold on

SCS HB 3000 45
23
an online auction platform approved by the Missouri office
24
of administration.
25
4. The governing body of a political subdivision, or
26
any per s on designated by the political subdivision, may
27
conduct or authorize an audit of any transfer, donation, or
28
sale made under this section. Such audit may include review
29
of records, receipts, and documentation maintained under
30
this section to ensure compliance with applicable laws,
31
regulations, and policies of the political subdivision. The
32
results of any audit conducted under this subsection sh a ll
33
be made available to the governing body of the political
34
subdivision and retained in accordance with applicable
35
records retention schedules.
1
67.311. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms shall m ean :
3
(1) "County", any county with more than seven hundred
4
thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants;
5
(2) "Mobile food unit", a vehicle-mounted food service
6
establis h ment, designed to be readily movable, that returns
7
to a commissary daily for clean-up and service;
8
(3) "Municipality", any city, town, or village located
9
wholly o r partially within a county.
10
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
11
contrar y , any license or permit issued by a county to a
12
mobile food unit or operator shall be sufficient to allow
13
such mobile food unit or operator to operate in all
14
municipalities within such county. Any permitting
15
requirement imposed by a municipal i ty that is more strict
16
than the permitting requirements imposed by a county shall
17
be null and void.
18
3. The provisions of this section shall not be
19
constru e d to prohibit or limit any health or food sanitation

SCS HB 3000 46
20
regulations authorized in chapter 196 or any other provision
21
of law.
1
67.5060. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "Design-build", a project delivery method subject
4
to a [th r ee-stage] multi-stage qualifications-based
5
selection for which the design and construction services are
6
furnished under one contract;
7
(2) "Design-build contract", a contract which is
8
subject t o a three-stage qualifications-based selection
9
process similar to that described in sections 8.285 to 8.291
10
between a political subdivision and a design-builder to
11
furnish the architectural, engineering, and related design
12
services and the labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and
13
other construction services required for a design-build
14
project;
15
(3) "Design-build project", the design, construction,
16
alterati o n, addition, remodeling, or improvement of any
17
buildings or facilities under contract with a political
18
subdivision. Such design-build projects include, but are
19
not limited t o:
20
(a) Civil works projects, such as roads, streets,
21
bridges, utilities, airport runways and taxiways, storm
22
drainage and flood control projects, or transit projects; and
23
(b) Noncivil works projects, such as buildings, site
24
improvem e nts, and other structures, habitable or not,
25
commonly designed by architects in excess of [seven] five
26
million dollars;
27
(4) "Design-builder", any individual, partnership,
28
joint ve n ture, or corporation subject to a qualification-
29
based selection that offers to provide or provides design
30
services and general contracting services through a design-

SCS HB 3000 47
31
build contract or a progressive design-build contract in
32
which services within the scope of the practice of
33
professional architecture or engineering are performed
34
respectively by a licensed architect or licensed engineer
35
and in which services within the scope of general
36
contracting are performed by a general contractor or other
37
legal entity that furnishes architecture or engineering
38
services and construction services either directly or
39
through subcontracts or joint ventures;
40
(5) "Design criteria consultant", a person,
41
corporat i on, partnership, or other legal entity duly
42
licensed and authorized to practice architecture or
43
professional engineering in this state under chapter 327 who
44
is employed by or contracted by the political subdivision to
45
assist the political subdivision in the development of
46
project design criteria, requests for proposals, evaluation
47
of proposals, the evaluation of the construction under a
48
design-build contract or a progressive design-build contract
49
to determine adherence to the design criteria, and any
50
additional services requested by the political subdivision
51
to represent its interests in relation to a project. The
52
design criteria consultant may not submit a proposal or
53
furnish design or construction services for the design-build
54
contract for which its services were sought;
55
(6) "Design criteria package", performance-oriented
56
program, scope, and specifications for the design-build
57
project sufficient to permit a design-builder to prepare a
58
response to a political subdivision's request for proposals
59
for a design-build project or a progressive design-build
60
project, which may include capacity, durability, standards,
61
ingress and egress requirements, performance requirements,
62
description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental

SCS HB 3000 48
63
information concerning the site, interior space
64
requirements, material quality standards, design and
65
construction schedules, site development requirements,
66
provisions for utilities, storm water retention and
67
disposal, parking requirements, applicable governmental code
68
requirements, preliminary designs for the project or
69
portions thereof, and other criteria for the intended use of
70
the project;
71
(7) "Design professional services", services that are:
72
(a) Within the practice of architecture as defined in
73
section 3 27.091, or within the practice of professional
74
engineering as defined in section 327.181; or
75
(b) Performed by a licensed or authorized architect or
76
professi o nal engineer in connection with the architect's or
77
professional engineer's employment or practice;
78
(8) "Progressive design-build contract", a contract
79
that is s ubject to a two-staged qualification-based
80
selection process as described in subdivision (1) of
81
subsection 13 of this section between a political
82
subdivision and a design-builder to furnish the
83
architectural, engineering, and related design services and
84
the labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and other
85
construction services required for a progressive design-
86
build project;
87
(9) "Progressive design-build project", the design,
88
construc t ion, alteration, addition, remodeling, or
89
improvement of any buildings or facilities under one
90
progressive design-build contract with a political
91
subdivision. Such progressive design-build projects
92
include, but are not limited to:

SCS HB 3000 49
93
(a) Civil works projects, such as roads, streets,
94
bridges, utilities, airport runways and taxiways, storm
95
drainage and flood control projects, or transit projects; and
96
(b) Noncivil works projects, such as buildings, site
97
improvem e nts, and other structures, habitable or not,
98
commonly designed by architects;
99
(10) "Proposal", an offer in response to a request for
100
proposals by a design-builder to enter into a design-build
101
contract for a design-build project or a progressive design-
102
build contract for a progressive design-build project under
103
this section;
104
[(9)] (11) "Request for proposal", the document by
105
which the polit i cal subdivision solicits proposals for a
106
design-build contract or progressive design-build contract;
107
[(10)] (12) "Stipend", an amount paid to the
108
unsuccessful but responsive, short-listed design-builders to
109
defray the cost of participating in phase II of the
110
selection process for a design-build project described in
111
this section.
112
2. In using a design-build contract or a progressive
113
design- b uild contract, the political subdivision shall
114
determine the scope and level of detail required to permit
115
qualified persons to submit proposals in accordance with the
116
request for proposals given the nature of the project.
117
3. A design criteria consultant shall be employed or
118
retaine d by the political subdivision to assist in
119
preparation of the design criteria package and request for
120
proposal, perform periodic site visits to observe adherence
121
to the design criteria, prepare progress reports, review and
122
approve progress and final pay applications of the design-
123
builder, review shop drawings and submissions, provide input
124
in disputes, help interpret the construction documents,

SCS HB 3000 50
125
perform inspections upon substantial and final completion,
126
assist in warranty inspections, and provide any other
127
professional service assisting with the project
128
administration of a design-build project or a progressive
129
design-build project. The design criteria consultant may
130
also evaluate constru c tion as to the adherence of the design
131
criteria. The consultant shall be selected and its contract
132
negotiate d in compliance with sections 8.285 to 8.291 unless
133
the consultant is a direct employee of the political
134
subdivision.
135
4. The political subdivision shall publicly disclose
136
at a re g ular meeting its intent to utilize the design-build
137
method or the progressive design-build method and its
138
project design criteria at least one week prior to
139
publishing the request for proposals. Notice of requests
140
for proposals shall be advertised by p ublication in a
141
newspaper of general circulation published in the county
142
where the political subdivision is located once a week for
143
two consecutive weeks prior to opening the proposals, or by
144
a virtual notice procedure that notifies interested parties
145
for at least twenty various purchases, design contracts,
146
construction contracts, or other contracts each year for the
147
political subdivision. The political subdivision shall
148
publish a notice of a r equest for proposal with a
149
description of the project, the procedures for submission,
150
and the selection criteria to be used.
151
5. The political subdivision shall establish in the
152
request for proposal a time, place, and other specific
153
instructions for the receipt of proposals. Proposals not
154
submitted in strict accordance with the in s tructions shall
155
be subject to rejection.

SCS HB 3000 51
156
6. The following provisions of this subsection shall
157
apply t o a design-build project:
158
(1) A request for proposal s hall be prepared for each
159
design-b u ild contract containing at minimum the following
160
elements:
161
[(1)] (a) The procedures to be followed for submitting
162
proposals, the criteria for evaluating proposals and their
163
relative weight, and the procedures for making awards;
164
[(2)] (b) The proposed terms and conditions for the
165
design-bui ld c o ntract, if available;
166
[(3)] (c) The design criteria package;
167
[(4)] (d) A description of the drawings,
168
specificat ions , or other information to be submitted with
169
the proposal, with guidance as to the form and level of
170
completeness of the drawings, specifications, or other
171
information that will be acceptable;
172
[(5)] (e) A schedule for planned commencement and
173
completion of t he design-build contract, if any;
174
[(6)] (f) Budget limits for the design-build contract,
175
if any;
176
[(7)] (g) Requirements including any available ratings
177
for perfor manc e bonds, payment bonds, and insurance, if any;
178
[(8)] (h) The amount of the stipend which will be
179
available; and
180
[(9)] (i) Any other information that the political
181
subdivisio n in its discretion chooses to supply including,
182
but not limited to, surveys, soil reports, drawings of
183
existing structures, environmental studies, photographs,
184
references to public records, or affirmative action and
185
minority business enterprise requirements consistent with
186
state and federal law[.];

SCS HB 3000 52
187
[7.] (2) The political subdivision shall solicit
188
proposals in a three-stage process. Phase I shall be the
189
solicitation of qualifications of t h e design-build team.
190
Phase II shall be the solicitation of a technical propos a l
191
including conceptual design for the project. Phase III
192
shall be the proposal of the construction cos t[.];
193
[8.] (3) The political subdivision shall review the
194
submissio ns o f the proposals and assign points to each
195
proposal in accordance with this section and as set out in
196
the instructions of the request for proposal[.];
197
[9.] (4) Phase I shall require all design-builders to
198
submit a stat e ment of qualification that shall include, but
199
not be limited to:
200
[(1)] (a) Demonstrated ability to perform projects
201
comparable in d esign, scope, and complexity;
202
[(2)] (b) References of owners for whom design-build
203
projects, cons t ruction projects, or design projects have
204
been performed;
205
[(3)] (c) Qualifications of personnel who will manage
206
the design and construction aspects of the project; and
207
[(4)] (d) The names and qualifications of the primary
208
design con sult a nts and the primary trade contractors with
209
whom the design-builder proposes to subcontract or joint
210
venture. The design-builder shall not replace an identified
211
contract o r, subcontractor, design consultant, or
212
subconsultant without the written approval of the political
213
subdivision.
214
[10.] 7. The political subdivision shall evaluate the
215
qualificat ion s of all the design-builders who submitted
216
proposals in accordance with the instructions of the request
217
for proposal. Architectural and engineering services on the
218
project shall be evaluated in accordance with the

SCS HB 3000 53
219
requirements of sections 8.285 and 8.291. Qualified design-
220
builders selected by the evaluation team m ay proceed to
221
phase II of the selection process. Design-builders lacking
222
the necessary qualifications to per form the work shall be
223
disqualified and shall not proceed to phase II of the
224
process. This process of short listing shall narrow the
225
number of qualified design-builders to not more than [five]
226
three nor fewer than two. Under no circumstances shall
227
price or fees be a part o f the prequalification criteria.
228
Design-builders may be interviewed in either phase I or
229
phase II of the process. Points assigned in phase I of the
230
evaluation process shall not carry forward to phase II of
231
the process. All qualified design-builders shall be ranked
232
on points gi v en in phases II and III only.
233
[11.] 8. The political subdivision shall have
234
discretion to disqualify any design-builder who, in the
235
political subdivision's opinion, lacks the minimum
236
qualifications required to perform the work.
237
[12.] 9. Once a sufficient number of no more than
238
[five] thr ee a nd no fewer than two qualified design-builders
239
have been selected, the design-builders shall have a
240
specified amount of time in which to assemble phase II and
241
phase III proposals.
242
[13.] 10. Phase II of the process shall be conducted
243
as follows :
244
(1) The political subdivision shall invite the top
245
qualifie d design-builders to participate in phase II of the
246
process;
247
(2) A design-builder shall submit its design for the
248
project t o the level of detail required in the request for
249
proposal. The design proposal shall demonstrate compliance
250
with the r equirements set out in the request for proposal;

SCS HB 3000 54
251
(3) The ability of the design-builder to meet the
252
schedule for completing a project as specified by the
253
political subdivision may be considered as an element of
254
evaluation in phase II;
255
(4) Up to twenty percent of the points awarded to each
256
design-b u ilder in phase II may be based on each design-
257
builder's qualifications and ability to design, contract,
258
and deliver the project on time and within the budget of the
259
political subdivision;
260
(5) Under no circumstances shall the design proposal
261
contain a ny reference to the cost of the proposal; and
262
(6) The submitted designs shall be evaluated and
263
assigned points in accordance with the requirements of the
264
request for proposal. Phase II shall account for not less
265
than forty percent of the total point score as specified in
266
the request for proposal.
267
[14.] 11. Phase III shall be conducted as follows:
268
(1) T he p hase III proposal shall provide a firm, fixed
269
cost of d esign and construction. The proposal shall be
270
accompanied by bid security and a ny other items, such as
271
statements of minority participation as required by the
272
request for proposal;
273
(2) Cost proposals shall be submitted in accordance
274
with the instructions of the request for proposal. The
275
political subdivision shall reject any proposal th a t is not
276
submitted on time. Phase III shall account for not less
277
than forty percent of the total point score as specified in
278
the request for proposal;
279
(3) Proposals for phase II and phase III shall be
280
submitte d concurrently at the time and place specified in
281
the request for proposal, but in separate envelopes or other
282
means of submission. The phase III cost proposals shall be

SCS HB 3000 55
283
opened only after the phase II design proposals have been
284
evaluated and assigned points, ranked in order, and posted;
285
(4) Cost proposals shall be opened and read aloud at
286
the time and place specified in the request for proposal.
287
At the same time and place, the evaluation team shall mak e
288
public its scoring of phase II. Cost proposals shall be
289
evaluated in accordance with th e requirements of the request
290
for proposal. In evaluating the cost proposals, the lowest
291
responsive bi d der shall be awarded the total number of
292
points assigned to be awarded in phase III. For all other
293
bidders, cost points shall be calculated by reducing the
294
maximum points available in phase III by at least one
295
percent for each percentage point by which the bidder
296
exceeds the lowest bid and the points assigned shall be
297
added to the points assigned for phase II for each design-
298
builder;
299
(5) If the political subdivision determines that it is
300
not in t h e best interest of the political subdivision to
301
proceed with the project pursuant to the proposal offered by
302
the design-builder with the highest total number of points,
303
the political subdivision shall reject all proposals. In
304
this event, all qualified and responsive design-build e rs
305
with lower point totals shall receive a stipend and the
306
responsive design-builder with the highest total number of
307
points shall receive an amount equal to two times the
308
stipend. If the political subdivision decides to award the
309
project, the responsive design-builder with the highest
310
number of points shall be awarded the contract; and
311
(6) If all proposals are rejected, the political
312
subdivis i on may solicit new proposals using different design
313
criteria, budget constraints, or qualifications.

SCS HB 3000 56
314
[15.] 12. As an inducement to qualified design-
315
builders, the p olitical subdivision shall pay a reasonable
316
stipend, the amount of which shall be established in the
317
request for proposal, to each prequalified design-builder
318
whose proposal is responsive but not accepted. Such stipend
319
shall be no less than one-half of one percent o f the total
320
project budget. Upon payment of the stipend to any
321
unsuccessful de s ign-builder, the political subdivision shall
322
acquire a nonexclusive right to use the design submitted by
323
the design-builder, and the design-builder shall have no
324
further liability for the use of the design by the political
325
subdivision in any manner. If the design-builder desires to
326
retain all rights and inte r est in the design proposed, the
327
design-builder shall forfeit the stipend.
328
13. The following provisions of this subsection shall
329
apply to a progressive design-build project:
330
(1) A request for proposal shall be prepared for each
331
progress i ve design-build contract containing at a minimum
332
the following elements:
333
(a) The procedures to be followed for submitting
334
proposal s , the criteria for evaluating proposals and their
335
relative weight, and the procedures for making awards;
336
(b) The proposed terms and conditions for the
337
progress i ve design-build contract, if available;
338
(c) The design criteria package;
339
(d) A description of the project approach elements, or
340
other in f ormation to be submitted with the proposal, or
341
other information that will be acceptable;
342
(e) A schedule for planned commencement and completion
343
of the p r ogressive design-build contract, if any;
344
(f) Budget limits for the progressive design-build
345
contract , if any;

SCS HB 3000 57
346
(g) Requirements including any available ratings for
347
performa n ce bonds, payment bonds, and insurance, if any; and
348
(h) Any other information that the political
349
subdivis i on in its discretion chooses to supply including,
350
but not limited to, surveys, soil reports, drawings of
351
existing structures, environmental studies, photographs,
352
references to public records, or affirmative action and
353
minority business enterprise requirements consistent with
354
state and federal law;
355
(2) The political subdivision shall solicit proposals
356
in a two - stage process. Phase I shall be the solicitation
357
and evaluation of the qu alifications of design-builders.
358
Phase II shall be the solicitation and evaluation of
359
proposals describing the design-builder's approach to design
360
development, preconstruction services and construction of
361
the project;
362
(3) The political subdivision shall review the
363
submissi o ns of the proposals and assign points to each
364
proposal in accordance with this section and as set out in
365
the instructions of the request for proposal;
366
(4) Phase I shall require all design-builders to
367
submit a statement of qualification that shall include, but
368
not be limited to:
369
(a) Demonstrated ability to perform projects
370
comparab l e in design, scope, and complexity;
371
(b) References of owners for whom design-build
372
projects or progressive design-build projects, construction
373
projects, or design projects have been performed;
374
(c) Qualifications of personnel who will manage the
375
design a n d construction aspects of the project; and
376
(d) The names and qualifications of the primary design
377
consulta n ts and the primary trade contractors with whom the

SCS HB 3000 58
378
design-builder proposes to joint venture. The design-
379
builder shall not replace an identified c o ntractor, or
380
design consultant without the written approval of the
381
political subdivision;
382
(5) The political subdivision shall evaluate the
383
qualific a tions of all the design-builders who submitted
384
proposals in accordance with the instructions of the request
385
for proposal. Architectural and engineering services on the
386
project shall be evaluated in accordance with the
387
requirements of sections 8.285 and 8.291. Qualified design-
388
builders selected by the evaluation team m ay proceed to
389
phase II of the selection process. Design-builders lacking
390
the necessary qualifications to pe r form the work shall be
391
disqualified and shall not proceed to phase II of the
392
process. This process of short listing shall narrow the
393
number o f qualified design-builders to not more than five.
394
Under no circumstances shall price or fees be a part of th e
395
prequalification criteria. Design-builders may be
396
interviewed in either phase I or phase II of the process.
397
Points assigned in phase I of the evaluation process shal l
398
not carry forward to phase II of the process. All qualified
399
design-builders shall be ranked on points giv e n in phase II
400
only;
401
(6) The political subdivision shall have discretion to
402
disquali f y any design-builder who, in the political
403
subdivision's opinion, lacks the minimum qualifications
404
required to perform the work;
405
(7) Once a sufficient number of no more than three but
406
not less than two qualified design-builders have been
407
selected, the design-builders shall have a specified amount
408
of time in which to assemble phase II proposals;

SCS HB 3000 59
409
(8) Phase II of the process shall be conducted as
410
follows:
411
(a) The political subdivision shall invite the top
412
qualifie d design-builders to participate in phase II of the
413
process;
414
(b) Each invited design-builder shall submit a
415
proposal describing its approach to design development,
416
collaboration with the political subdivision, and delivery
417
of preconstruction and construction services. The proposal
418
shall not include any construction pricing;
419
(c) The proposal shall demonstrate understanding of
420
the proj e ct goals and may address:
421
a. Approach to design integration, cost estimating,
422
schedul i ng, and value engineering during preconstruction;
423
b. Approach to subcontractor outreach, selection, and
424
partici p ation;
425
c. Approach to establishing transparent pricing for
426
the pre c onstruction and construction phase; and
427
d. Any innovations, sustainability measures, or risk-
428
managem e nt strategies proposed for the project;
429
(d) Evaluation of phase II proposals shall be
430
qualific a tions-based. Price consideration shall be for
431
preconstruction phase services only and may be in the form
432
of proposed rates, fees, or other acceptable forms as
433
determined by the political subdivision;
434
(e) The political subdivision shall rank the phase II
435
proposal s according to the criteria and weighting
436
established in the request for proposals and may conduct
437
interviews as part of the evaluation;
438
(f) Following evaluation, the political subdivision
439
may ente r into negotiations with the highest-ranked design-
440
builder to establish a preconstruction services agreement.

SCS HB 3000 60
441
If the parties are unable to reach an agreement, the
442
political subdivision may terminate negotiations and
443
commence negotiations with the next highest-ranked design-
444
builder; and
445
(g) During the preconstruction phase, the design-
446
builder a nd the political subdivision shall collaborate to
447
advance the design to a level sufficient to establish a
448
fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price,
449
consistent with agreed-upon milestones and deliverables.
450
Upon acceptance of the price and contract terms, the par t ies
451
may amend the contract to authorize construction;
452
(9) This subsection shall expire on August 28, 2036.
453
[16 . ] 14. (1) As used in this subsection, "wastewater
454
or water c ontr a ct" m eans any design-build contract or
455
progressive design-build contract that involves the
456
provision of engineering and construction services either
457
directly by a party to the contract or through
458
subcontractors retained by a party to the contract for a
459
wastewater or water storage, conveyance, or treatment
460
facility project.
461
(2) Any political subdivision may enter into a
462
wastewat e r or water contract for design-build or progressive
463
design-build of a wastewater or water project.
464
(3) In disbursing community development block grants
465
under 42 U.S.C. Sections 5301 to 5321, the department of
466
economic development shall not reject wastewater or water
467
projects solely for utilizing wastewater or water contracts.
468
(4) The department of natural resources shall not
469
preclude wastewater or water contracts from consideration
470
for funding provided by the water and wastewater loan fund
471
under section 644.122.

SCS HB 3000 61
472
(5) A political subdivision planning a wastewater or
473
water de s ign-build or progressive design-build project shall
474
retain an engineer duly licensed in this state to assist in
475
preparing any necessary documents and specifications and
476
evaluations of design-build or progressive design-build
477
proposals.
478
[17.] 15. The payment bond requirements of section
479
107.170 sh all a pply to [the] design-build [project] projects
480
and progressive design-build projects. All persons
481
furnishing design services shall be de e med to be covered by
482
the payment bond the same as any person furnishing labor and
483
materials. The performance bond for the design-builder
484
shall not c over any damages of the type specified to be
485
covered by the professional liability insurance established
486
by the political subdivision in the request for proposals.
487
[18.] 16. Any person or firm performing architectural,
488
engineerin g, l a ndscape architecture, or land-surveying
489
services for the design-builder on the design-build project
490
or progressive design-build project shall be duly licensed
491
or authorized in this state to provide such services as
492
required by chapter 327.
493
[19.] 17. Any political subdivision engaged in a
494
project un der t his section which impacts a railroad
495
regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration shall
496
consult with the affected railroad on required
497
specifications relating to clearance, safety, insurance, and
498
indemnification to be included in the construction documents
499
for such project.
500
[20.] 18. Under section 327.465, any design-builder
501
that enter s in t o a design-build contract or progressive
502
design-build contract with a political subdivision is exempt
503
from the requirement that such person or entity hold a

SCS HB 3000 62
504
license or that such corporation hold a certificate of
505
authority if the architectural, engineering, or land-
506
surveying services to be performed under the design-build
507
contract are performed through subcontracts or joint
508
ventures with properly licensed or authorized persons or
509
entities, and not performed by the design-builder or its own
510
employees.
511
[21.] 19. This section shall not apply to:
512
(1) A ny m etropolitan sewer district established under
513
Article V I, Section 30(a) of the Constitution of Missouri; or
514
(2) Any special charter city, or any city or county
515
governed by home rule under Article VI, Sections 18(a) to
516
18(r) or 19 of the Constitution of Missouri that has adopted
517
a design-build process or progressive design-build process
518
via ordinance, rule, or regulation.
1
71.012. 1. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of
2
sections 71. 0 15 a nd 7 1 .860 to 71.920, the governing body of
3
any city, town or village may annex unincorporated areas
4
which are contiguous and compact to the existing corporate
5
limits of the city, town or village pursuant to this
6
section.
7
(2) The term "contiguous and compact" does not include
8
a situat i on whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be
9
annexed is contiguous to the annexing city, town or village
10
only by a railroad line, trail, pipeline or other strip of
11
real property less than one-quarter mile in width within the
12
city, town or village so that the boundaries of the city,
13
town or village after annexation would leave unincorporated
14
areas between the annexed area and the prior boundaries of
15
the city, town or village connected only by such railroad
16
line, trail, pipeline or other such strip of real property.

SCS HB 3000 63
17
(3) The term contiguous and compact shall include a
18
situatio n whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be
19
annexed would be contiguous and compact to the existing
20
corporate limits of the city, town, or village but for an
21
intervening state highway or interstate highway as defined
22
in section 304.001, or railroad right-of-way, regardless of
23
whether any other city, town, or village has annexed such
24
state or interstate highway or railroad right-of-way or
25
otherwise has an easement in such state or interstate
26
highway or railroad right-of-way.
27
(4) The term contiguous and c ompact does not prohibit
28
voluntar y annexations pursuant to this section merely
29
because such voluntary annexation would create an island of
30
unincorporated area within the city, town or village, so
31
long as the owners of the unincorporated island were also
32
given the opportunity to voluntarily annex into the city,
33
town or village.
34
(5) For a c i ty, town, or village in a county with more
35
than fou r hundred thousand but fewer than five hundred
36
thousand inhabitants or with more than two hundred thousand
37
but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, the
38
term "contiguous and compact" shall include a situation
39
whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be annexed is
40
contiguous to the annexing city, town, or village by at
41
least twenty-five percent of the length of the perimeter of
42
the area proposed for annexation. No such city, town, or
43
village shall annex an unincorpor a ted area contiguous to any
44
unincorporated area annexed by the city, town, or village
45
within the last twenty-four months.
46
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section,
47
the gove r ning body of any city, town or village in any
48
county of the third classification which borders a county of

SCS HB 3000 64
49
the fourth classification, a county of the second
50
classification and the Mississippi River may annex areas
51
along a road or highway up to two miles from existing
52
boundaries of the city, town or village or the governing
53
body in any city, town or village in any county of the third
54
classification without a township form of government with a
55
population of at least twenty-four thousand inhabitants but
56
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants and such county
57
contains a state correctional center may voluntarily annex
58
such correctional center pursuant to the provisions of this
59
section if the correctional center is along a road or
60
highway within two miles from the existing boundaries of the
61
city, town or village.
62
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
63
section t o the contrary, a city with more than seventy-one
64
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants
65
that owns and operates an airport that is outside the
66
boundaries of such city may annex such airport regardless of
67
whether the boundaries of such airport are contiguous and
68
compact to the existing corporate limits of such city.
69
2. (1) When a notarized petition, requesting
70
annexat i on a n d signed by the owners of all fee interests of
71
record in all tracts of real property located within the
72
area proposed to be annexed, or a request for annexation
73
signed under the authority of the governing body of any
74
common interest community and approved by a majority vote of
75
unit owners located within the area proposed to be annexed
76
is presented to the governing body of the city, town or
77
village, the governing body shall hold a public hearing
78
concerning the matter not less than fourteen nor more than
79
sixty days after the petition is received, and the hearing
80
shall be held not less than seven days after notice of the

SCS HB 3000 65
81
hearing is published in a newspaper of general circulation
82
qualified to publish legal matters and located within the
83
boundary of the petitioned city, town or village. If no
84
such newspaper exists within the boundary of such city, town
85
or village, then the notice shall be published in the
86
qualified newspaper nearest the petitioned city, town or
87
village. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term
88
"common- i nterest community" shall mean a condominium as said
89
term is used in chapter 448, or a common-interest community,
90
a cooperative, or a planned community.
91
(a) A "common-interest community" shall be defined as
92
real pro p erty with respect to which a person, by virtue of
93
such person's ownership of a unit, is obliged to pay for
94
real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance or
95
improvement of other real property described in a
96
declaration. "Ownership of a unit" does not include a
97
leasehold in t erest of less than twenty years in a unit,
98
including renewal options;
99
(b) A "cooperative" shall be defined as a common-
100
interest community in which the real property is owned by an
101
association, each of whose members is entitled by virtue of
102
such member's ownership interest in the association to
103
exclusive possession of a unit;
104
(c) A "planned community" shall be defined as a common-
105
interest community that is not a condominium or a
106
cooperative. A condominium or cooperative may be part of a
107
planned comm u nity.
108
(2) At the public hearing any interested person,
109
corporat i on or political subdivision may present evidence
110
regarding the proposed annexation. If, after holding the
111
hearing, the governing body of the city, town or village
112
determines that the annexation is reasonable and necessary

SCS HB 3000 66
113
to the proper development of the city, town or village, and
114
the city, town or village has the ability to furnish normal
115
municipal services to the area to be annexed within a
116
reasonable time, it may, subject to the provisions of
117
subdivision (3) of this subsection, annex the territory by
118
ordinance without further action.
119
(3) If a written objection to the proposed annexation
120
is filed with the governing body of the city, town or
121
village not later than fourteen days after the public
122
hearing by at least five percent of the qualified voters of
123
the city, town or village, or two qualified voters of the
124
area sought to be annexed if the same contains two qualified
125
voters, the provisions of sections 71.015 and 71.860 to
126
71.920, shall be followed.
127
3. If no objection is filed, the city, town or village
128
shall e x tend its limits by ordinance to include such
129
territory, specifying with accuracy the new boundary lines
130
to which the city's, town's or village's limits are
131
extended. Upon duly enacting such annexation ordinance, the
132
city, tow n or village shall cause three certified copies of
133
the same to be filed with the county assessor and the clerk
134
of the county wherein the city, town or village is located,
135
and one certified copy to be filed with the election
136
authority, if different from the clerk of the county which
137
has jurisdiction over the area being annexed, whereupon the
138
annexation shall be complete and final and thereafter all
139
courts of this state shall take judicial notice of the
140
limits of that city, town or village as so extended.
141
4. That a petition requesting annexation is not or was
142
not ver i fied or notarized shall not affect the validity of
143
an annexation heretofore or hereafter undertaken in
144
accordance with this section.

SCS HB 3000 67
145
5. Any action of any kind seeking to deannex from any
146
city, t o wn, or village any area annexed under this section,
147
or seeking in any way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or
148
otherwise challenge such annexation or oust such city, town,
149
or village from jurisdiction over such annexed area shall be
150
brought within five years of the date of adoption of the
151
annexation ordinance.
1
71.015. 1. Should any city, town, or village, not
2
located in a n y c o unty of the first classification which has
3
adopted a constitutional charter for its own local
4
government, seek to annex an area to which objection is
5
made, the following shall be satisfied:
6
(1) Before the governing body of any city, town, or
7
village h as adopted a resolution to annex any unincorporated
8
area of land, such city, town, or village shall first as a
9
condition precedent determine that:
10
(a) The land to be annexed is contiguous to the
11
existing city, town, or village limits and that the length
12
of the contiguous boundary common to the existing city,
13
town, or village limit and the proposed area to be annexed
14
is at least fifteen percent of the length of the perimeter
15
of the area proposed for annexation; or
16
(b) The land to be annexed would be contiguous and
17
compact t o the existing city, town, or village limits but
18
for an intervening state highway or interstate highway as
19
defined in section 304.001, or railroad right-of-way, and
20
the shared border of the land to be annexed and existing
21
city, town, or village composes at least fifteen percent of
22
the total perimeter of the land to be annexed. For purposes
23
of calculating the length of such border under this
24
paragraph, the border between the land to be annexed and the
25
existing city, town, or village shall be deemed to be:

SCS HB 3000 68
26
a. If an intervening state highway or interstate
27
highway , the centerline; or
28
b. If a railroad right-of-way, the midpoint between
29
the out e rmost rails if there are rails or the best estimate
30
of the middle of the right-of-way if there are no rails;
31
(2) The governing body of any city, town, or village
32
shall pr o pose an ordinance setting forth the following:
33
(a) The area to be annexed and affirmatively stating
34
that the boundaries comply with the condition precedent
35
referred to in subdivision (1) above;
36
(b) That such annexation is reasonable and necessary
37
to the p r oper development of the city, town, or village;
38
(c) That the city has developed a plan of intent to
39
provide s ervices to the area proposed for annexation;
40
(d) That a public hearing shall be held prior to the
41
adoption of the ordinance;
42
(e) When the annexation is proposed to be effective,
43
the effe c tive date being up to thirty-six months from the
44
date of any election held in conjunction thereto;
45
(3) The city, town, or village shall fix a date for a
46
public h e aring on the ordinance and make a good faith effort
47
to notify all fee owners of record within the area proposed
48
to be annexed by certified mail, not less than thirty nor
49
more than sixty days before the hearing, and notify all
50
residents of the area by publication of notice in a
51
newspaper of general circulation qualified to publish legal
52
matters in the county or counties where the proposed area is
53
located, at least once a week for three consecutive weeks
54
prior to the hearing, with at least one such notice being
55
not more than twenty days and not less than ten days before
56
the hearing;

SCS HB 3000 69
57
(4) At the hearing referred to in subdivision (3) of
58
this sub s ection, the city, town, or village shall present
59
the plan of intent and evidence in support thereof to
60
include:
61
(a) A list of major services presently provided by the
62
city, to w n, or village including, but not limited to, police
63
and fire protection, water and sewer systems, street
64
maintenance, parks and recreation, and refuse collection;
65
(b) A proposed time schedule whereby the city, town,
66
or villa g e plans to provide such services to the residents
67
of the proposed area to be annexed within three years from
68
the date the annexation is to become effective;
69
(c) The level at which the city, town, or village
70
assesses property and the rate at which it taxes that
71
property;
72
(d) How the city, town, or village proposes to zone
73
the area to be annexed;
74
(e) When the proposed annexation shall become
75
effectiv e ;
76
(5) Following the hearing, and either before or after
77
the elec t ion held in subdivision (6) of this subsection,
78
should the governing body of the city, town, or village vote
79
favorably by ordinance to annex the area, the governing body
80
of the city, town or village shall file an action in the
81
circuit court of the county in which such unincorporated
82
area is situated, under the provisions of chapter 527,
83
praying for a declaratory judgment authorizing such
84
annexation. The petition in such action shall state facts
85
showing:
86
(a) The area to be annexed and its conformity with the
87
conditio n precedent referred to in subdivision (1) of this
88
subsection;

SCS HB 3000 70
89
(b) That such annexation is reasonable and necessary
90
to the p r oper development of the city, town, or village; and
91
(c) The ability of the city, town, or village to
92
furnish n ormal municipal services of the city, town, or
93
village to the unincorporated area within a reasonable time
94
not to exceed three years after the annexation is to become
95
effective. Such action shall be a class action against the
96
inhabitant s of such unincorporated area under the provisions
97
of section 507.070;
98
(6) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this
99
section, if the court authorizes the city, town, or village
100
to make an annexation, the legislative body of such city,
101
town, or village shall not have the power to extend the
102
limits of the city, town, or village by such annexation
103
until an election is held at which the proposition for
104
annexation is approved by a majority of the total votes cast
105
in the city, town, or village and by a separate majority of
106
the total votes cast in the unincorporated territory sought
107
to be annexed. However, should less than a majority of the
108
total votes ca s t in the area proposed to be annexed vote in
109
favor of the proposal, but at least a majority of the total
110
votes cast in the city, town, or village vote in favor of
111
the proposal, then the proposal shall again be voted upon in
112
not more than one hundred twenty days by both the registered
113
voters of the city, town, or village and the registered
114
voters of the area proposed to be annexed. If at least two-
115
thirds of the qualified electors voting th e reon are in favor
116
of the annexation, then the city, town, or village may
117
proceed to annex the territory. If the proposal fails to
118
receive the necessary majority, no part of the area sought
119
to be annexed may be the subject of another proposal to
120
annex for a period of two years from the date of the

SCS HB 3000 71
121
election, except that, during the two-year period, the
122
owners of all fee interests of record in the area or any
123
portion of the area may petition the city, town, or village
124
for the annexation of the land owned by them pursuant to the
125
procedures in section 71.012. The elections shall if
126
authorized be held, except as herein otherwise provided, in
127
accordance with the general state law governing special
128
elections, and the entire cost of the election or elections
129
shall be paid by the city, town, or village proposing to
130
annex the territory;
131
(7) Failure to comply in providing services to the
132
said are a or to zone in compliance with the plan of intent
133
within three years after the effective date of the
134
annexation, unless compliance is made unreasonable by an act
135
of God, shall give rise to a cause of action for
136
deannexation which may be filed in the circuit court by any
137
resident of the area who was residing in the area at the
138
time the annexation became effective;
139
(8) No city, town, or village which has filed an
140
action u n der this section as this section read prior to May
141
13, 1980, which action is part of an annexation proceeding
142
pending on May 13, 1980, shall be required to comply with
143
subdivision (5) of this subsection in regard to such
144
annexation proceeding;
145
(9) If the area proposed for annexation includes a
146
public r o ad or highway but does not include all of the land
147
adjoining such road or highway, then such fee owners of
148
record, of the lands adjoining said highway shall be
149
permitted to intervene in the declaratory judgment action
150
described in subdivision (5) of this subsection.
151
2. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 1 of
152
this se c tion, for any annexation by any city with a

SCS HB 3000 72
153
population of three hundred fifty thousand or more
154
inhabitants which is located in more than one county that
155
becomes effective after August 28, 1994, if such city has
156
not provided water and sewer service to such annexed area
157
within three years of the effective date of the annexation,
158
a cause of action shall lie for deannexation, unless the
159
failure to provide such water and sewer service to the
160
annexed area is made unreasonable by an act of God. The
161
cause of action for deannexation may be filed in th e circuit
162
court by any resident of the annexed area who is presently
163
residing in the area at the time of the filing of the suit
164
and was a resident of the annexed area at the time the
165
annexation became effective. If the suit for deannexation
166
is successful, the city shal l be liable for all court costs
167
and attorney fees.
168
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (6)
169
of subs e ction 1 of this section, all cities, towns, and
170
villages located in any county [of the first classification]
171
with a charter form of government with [a population of] two
172
hundred thousand or more inhabitants [which] that adjoins a
173
county with a population of nine hundred thousand or more
174
inhabitants shall comply with the provisions of this
175
subsection. If the court authorizes any city, town, or
176
village sub j ect to this subsection to make an annexation,
177
the legislative body of such city, town or village shall not
178
have the power to extend the limits of such city, town, or
179
village by such annexation until an election is held at
180
which the proposition for annexation is approved by a
181
majority of the total votes cast in such city, town, or
182
village and by a separate majority of the total votes cast
183
in the unincorporated territory sought to be annexed; except
184
that:

SCS HB 3000 73
185
(1) In the case of a proposed annexation in any area
186
which is contiguous to the existing city, town or village
187
and which is within an area designated as flood plain by the
188
Federal Emergency Management Agency and which is inhabited
189
by no more than thirty registered voters and for which a
190
final declaratory judgment has been granted prior to January
191
1, 1993, approving such annexation and where notarized
192
affidavits expressing approval of the proposed annexation
193
are obtained from a majority of the registered voters
194
residing in the area to be annexed, the area may be annexed
195
by an ordinance duly enacted by the governing body and no
196
elections shall be required; and
197
(2) In the case of a proposed annexation of
198
unincorp o rated territory in which no qualified electors
199
reside, if at least a majority of the qualified electors
200
voting on the proposition are in favor of the annexation,
201
the city, town or village may proceed to annex the territory
202
and no subsequent election shall be required.
203
If the proposal fails to receive the necessary separate
204
majorities, no part of the area sought to be annexed may be
205
the subject of any other proposal to annex for a period of
206
two years from the date of such election, except that,
207
during the two-year period, the owners of all fee interests
208
of record in the area or any portion of the area may
209
petition the city, town, or village for the annexation of
210
the land owned by them pursuant to the procedures in section
211
71.012 [or 71.014]. The election shall, if authorized, be
212
held, except as oth e rwise provided in this section, in
213
accordance with the general state laws governing special
214
elections, and the entire cost of the election or elections
215
shall be paid by the city, town, or village proposing to

SCS HB 3000 74
216
annex the territory. Failure of the city, town or village
217
to comply in providi n g services to the area or to zone in
218
compliance with the plan of intent within three years after
219
the effective date of the annexation, unless compliance is
220
made unreasonable by an act of God, shall give rise to a
221
cause of action for deannexation which may be filed in the
222
circuit court not later than four years after the effective
223
date of the annexation by any resident of the area who was
224
residing in such area at the time the annexation became
225
effective or by any nonresident owner of real property in
226
such area.
227
4. Except for a cause of action for deannexation under
228
subdivi s ion (2) of subsection 3 of this section, any action
229
of any kind seeking to deannex from any city, town, or
230
village any area annexed under this section, or seeking in
231
any way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or otherwise
232
challenge such annexation or oust such city, town, or
233
village from jurisdiction over such annexed area shall be
234
brought within five years of the date of the adoption of the
235
annexation ordinance.
1
77.230. No person shall be mayor unless he or she be
2
at least thi r ty years of age, a citizen of the United States
3
and a resident of the county in which such city is located
4
at the time of and for two years next preceding his or her
5
election. When two or more persons shall have an equal
6
number of votes for the office of mayor, the matter shall be
7
determined by the council.
1
79.080. No person shall be mayor unless he or she be
2
at least twe n ty-five years of age, a citizen of the United
3
States and a resident of the county in which such city is
4
located at the time of and for at least one year next
5
preceding his or her election.

SCS HB 3000 75
1
82.1025. 1. Sections 82.1025, 82.1027 and 82.1030
2
apply to a nu i san c e located within the boundaries of:
3
(1) Any city not within a county;
4
(2) Any home rule city with at least three hundred
5
fifty th o usand inhabitants which is located in more than one
6
county;
7
(3) Any home rule city with more than one hundred
8
sixty th o usand but fewer than two hundred thousand
9
inhabitants; [or]
10
(4) Any home rule city with more than seventy-one
11
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants; or
12
(5) Any city with more than one hundred five thousand
13
but fewe r than one hundred twenty-five thousand inhabitants.
14
2. Any property owner who owns property within one
15
thousan d two hundred feet of a parcel of property that is
16
alleged to be a nuisance may bring a nuisance action under
17
this section against the offending property owner for the
18
amount of damage created by such nuisance to the value of
19
the petitioner's property, including diminution in value of
20
the petitioner's property, and court costs.
21
3. An action for injunctive relief to abate a nuisance
22
may be b rought under this section by:
23
(1) Anyone who owns property within one thousand two
24
hundred f eet to a property which is alleged to be a
25
nuisance; or
26
(2) A neighborhood organization, as defined in section
27
82.1027, on behalf of any person or persons who own property
28
within the boundaries of the neighborhood or neighborhoods
29
described in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
30
neighborhood organization and who could maintain a nuisance
31
action under this section or under the common law of private
32
nuisance, or on its own behalf with respect to a nuisance on

SCS HB 3000 76
33
property anywhere within the boundaries of the neighborhood
34
or neighborhoods.
35
4. An action shall not be brought under this section
36
until s i xty days after the party who brings the action has
37
mailed notice of intent to bring an action under this
38
section, postage prepaid, to:
39
(1) The tenant, if any, or to "occupant" if the
40
identity of the tenant cannot be reasonably ascertained, at
41
the property's address; and
42
(2) The property owner of record at the last known
43
address o f the property owner on file with the county or
44
city, or, if the property owner is a corporation or other
45
type of limited liability company, to the property owner's
46
registered agent at the agent's address of record;
47
that a nuisance exists and that legal action may be taken
48
against the owner of the property if the nuisance is not
49
eliminated within sixty days after the date on the mailed
50
notice. If the notice is returned unclaimed or refused,
51
designa t ed by the post office to be undeliverable, or signed
52
for by a person other than the addressee, then adequate and
53
sufficient notice shall be provided by posting a copy of the
54
notice on the property where the nuisance allegedly is
55
occurring. A sworn affidavit by the person who mailed or
56
posted the notice describing the date and manner that notice
57
was given shall be sufficient evidence to establish that the
58
notice was given. The notice shall specify:
59
(a) The act o r condition that constitutes the nuisance;
60
(b) The date the nuisance was first discovered;
61
(c) The address of the property and location on the
62
property where the act or condition that constitutes the
63
nuisance is allegedly occurring or exists; and

SCS HB 3000 77
64
(d) The relief sought in the action.
65
5. A copy of a notice of citation issued by the city
66
or coun t y that shows the date the citation was issued shall
67
be prima facie evidence of whether and for how long the
68
property has been in violation of the code or ordinance
69
provisions described in the citation.
70
6. A proceeding under this section shall:
71
(1 ) Be heard at the earliest practicable date; and
72
(2) Be expedited in every way.
73
7. W hen a property owner or neighborhood organization
74
brings a n action under this section for injunctive relief to
75
abate a nuisance, a prima facie case for injunctive relief
76
shall be made upon proof that a nuisance exists on the
77
property. An action for injunctive relief to abate a
78
nuisance s hall be heard by the court without a jury and
79
shall not require proof that the party bringing the action
80
has sustained damage or loss as a result of the nuisance.
81
8. When a property owner or neighborhood organization
82
bringin g the action prevails in such action, such property
83
owner or organization may be entitled to an award for
84
attorneys' fees and expenses, based on the amount of time
85
reasonably expended, as ordered by the court, which award
86
for attorneys' fees and expenses shall be entered as a
87
judgment against the owner of the property on which the act
88
or condition constituting the nuisance occurred or was
89
located.
90
9. In addition to any other penalties or costs
91
associa t ed with the abatement of a nuisance that are imposed
92
pursuant to sections 82.1025 to 82.1031, any person or
93
entity that is not a resident of this state and who is an
94
owner of property found to have a code or ordinance
95
violation shall be subject to a civil fine of two thousand

SCS HB 3000 78
96
dollars per violation. Any property found to have a code or
97
ordinance violation and that is structurally unsafe or poses
98
a threat to persons or other property shall have such
99
nuisance abated within one year of the code or ordinance
100
violation. Any such property that is not abated within one
101
year, and a ny property with unpaid civil fines within two
102
years of the imposition of the fine shall be subject to sale
103
by the taxing jurisdiction in which the property is
104
located. The property shall be sold in an amount that will
105
satisfy t he costs incurred for abating the property as well
106
as any outstanding civil fines. Such sale shall coincide
107
with the sale of delinquent pro p erties under chapters 140
108
and 141.
1
108.240. 1. Before any general obligation bearer bond
2
or general ob l iga t ion registered bond, hereafter issued by
3
any county, township, city, town, village or school district
4
or special road district or fire protection district or by
5
virtue of the provisions of chapters 243, 245, 248, and
6
sections 242.010 to 242.690 for any purpose whatever, shall
7
obtain validity or be negotiated:
8
(1) If such bonds are in bearer form, such bonds shall
9
first be presented to the state auditor, who, other
10
provisions of law notwithstanding, shall certify by manual
11
or facsimile endorsement of such bonds that all conditions
12
of the laws have been complied with in its issue, if that be
13
the case, and also that the conditions of the contract,
14
under which they were ordered to be issued, have also been
15
complied with and the evidence of that fact shall be filed
16
and preserved by the auditor. The state auditor may endorse
17
bearer bonds with the auditor ' s facsimile signature in lieu
18
of manual signature after filing the auditor's manual

SCS HB 3000 79
19
signature, certified by the auditor under oath, with the
20
secretary of state; and
21
(2) If such bonds are in registered form, the
22
proceedi n gs relating to the issuance of such registered
23
bonds shall first be presented to the state auditor, who
24
shall examine the same and shall issue a certificate that
25
such proceedings comply with all conditions of the laws, if
26
that be the case, and also that the conditions of the
27
contract, under which they were ordered to be issued, have
28
also been complied with, and the evidence of these facts
29
shall be filed and preserved by the auditor. The state
30
auditor shall also maintain the following inf ormation: the
31
name of the issuer of the bonds; the amount thereof; th e
32
maturity dates thereof; the interest rates thereon; and the
33
provisions with respect to prepayment, if any.
34
2. Such bearer bonds after receiving the said
35
certifi c ate of the auditor as herein provided and such
36
registered bonds after the issuance of the said certificate
37
as herein provided shall thereafter be held in every action,
38
suit or proceeding in which their validity is, or may be,
39
brought into question, prima facie, valid and binding
40
obligations, and in every action brought to enforce
41
collection of such bonds, the certificate of such auditor,
42
or a duly certified copy thereof, shall be admitted and
43
received in evidence of the validity of such bonds, together
44
with the coupons thereto attached if any; provided, the only
45
defense which can be offered against the validity of such
46
bonds shall be for forgery or fraud. But this section shall
47
not be construed to give validity to any such bonds as may
48
be issued in excess of the limit fixed by the constitution,
49
or contrary to its provisions, but all such bonds shall, to
50
the extent of such excess, be held void; and provided

SCS HB 3000 80
51
further, that the remedy of injunction shall also lie at the
52
instance of any taxpayer of the respective county, city,
53
town, village, township or school district or special road
54
district or fire protection district or drainage district or
55
levy district to prevent the registration of any bonds,
56
alleged to be illegally issued or funded.
57
3. For purposes of subsection 1 of this section, once
58
the tim e period set forth in section 115.557 has expired, if
59
no election contest has been brought, all conditions of
60
chapter 115 shall be deemed as having been complied with in
61
the issuance of the bond.
1
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
2
this section, upo n receipt of notice of a special election
3
to fill a vacancy submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of
4
section 115.125, the election authority shall cause legal
5
notice of the special election to be published in a
6
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The
7
notice shall include the name of the officer or agency
8
calling the election, the date and time of the election, the
9
name of the office to be filled and the date by which
10
candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
11
one week prior to each special election to fill a va c ancy
12
held in its jurisdiction, the election authority shall cause
13
legal notice of the election to be published in two
14
newspapers of different political faith and general
15
circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
16
include the date and time of the election, the name of the
17
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
18
If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in th e
19
jurisdiction, the notice shall be published in the newspaper
20
within one week prior to the election. If there are two or
21
more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction,

SCS HB 3000 81
22
but no two of opposite political faith, the notice shall be
23
published in any two of the newspapers within one week prior
24
to the election.
25
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this
26
section and in sections 115.521, 115.549 and 115.593, the
27
election authority shall cause legal notice of each election
28
held in its jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall
29
be published in two newspapers of differe n t political faith
30
and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published
31
within the bounds of the area holding the election. If
32
there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then noti c e shall
33
be published in only one newspaper. If there is no
34
newspaper published within the boun d s of the election area,
35
then the notice shall be published in two qualified
36
newspapers of different political faith serving the area.
37
Notice shall be published twice[, the first publication
38
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the
39
second publication occurring] within [one week] six weeks
40
prior to the election. Each such legal notice shall include
41
the date and time of t h e election, the name of the officer
42
or agency calling the election and a sample ballot; and,
43
unless notice has been given as provided by section 115.129,
44
the second publication of notice of the election shall
45
include the location of polling places. The election
46
authority may provide any additional not ice of the election
47
it deems desirable.
48
3. The election authority shall print the official
49
ballot a s the same appears on the sample ballot, and no
50
candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample
51
ballot or official printed ballot shall be stricken or
52
removed from the ballot except on death of a candidate or by
53
court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be

SCS HB 3000 82
54
stricken or removed from the ballot less than eight weeks
55
before the date of the election.
56
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published
57
twice i n accordance with any of the provisions of this
58
chapter, the election authority [in jurisdictions which have
59
less than seven hundred fifty registered voters and in which
60
no newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is
61
published,] may cause legal notice to be mailed [during the
62
second week prior to the election, by first class mail,]
63
within six weeks prior to the election to each registered
64
voter at the voter's voting address and published once in
65
one or more newspapers in the county. An election authority
66
may exclude from this mailing any vot e r that is designated
67
as an inactive voter pursuant to section 115.193. All such
68
legal notices shall include the date and time of t he
69
election, the location of the polling place, the name of the
70
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
71
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of
72
candida c y for any office in a political subdivision or
73
special district is not required by law or charter, the
74
opening filing date shall be 8:00 a.m., the seventeenth
75
Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing date for
76
filing a declaration of candid a cy for any office in a
77
political subdivision or special district is not required by
78
law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00 p.m.,
79
the fourteenth Tuesday prior to the election. The political
80
subdivision or special district calling an el e ction shall,
81
before the seventeenth Tuesday, prior to any election at
82
which offices are to be filled, notify the general public of
83
the opening filing date, the office or offices to be filled,
84
the proper place for filing and the closing filing date of
85
the election. Such notification may be accomplished by

SCS HB 3000 83
86
legal notice published in at least one newspaper of general
87
circulation in the political subdivision or special district.
88
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and
89
115.359 , if there is no additional cost for the printing or
90
reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any
91
printing or reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for
92
an office or who has been duly nominated for an office may,
93
at any time after the certification of the notice of
94
election required in subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no
95
later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
96
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order,
97
which, except for good cause shown by the election authority
98
in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon
99
application by the candidate to the circuit court of the
100
area of such candidate's residence.
1
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
2
the Missouri C ons t itution, the following terms mean:
3
(1) "Residential property"[,]:
4
(a) All real property improved by a structure which is
5
used or i ntended to be used for residential living by human
6
occupants[,];
7
(b) Vacant land in connection with an airport[,];
8
(c) Land used as a golf course[,];
9
(d) Manufactured home parks[,];
10
(e) Bed and breakfast inns in which the owner resides
11
and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for
12
rent[, and];
13
(f) Time-share units as defined in section 407.600,
14
except t o the extent such units are actually rented and
15
subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1
16
of section 144.020[, but]; and

SCS HB 3000 84
17
(g) Any single family home owned by an individual or
18
business that is leased for a term of less than thirty
19
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax
20
under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020,
21
provided that the provisions of this paragraph may not apply
22
to such properties in excess of fifteen such properties
23
owned by the same individual or business. For the purposes
24
of this paragraph, the term "business" sh a ll mean a sole
25
proprietor, partnership, or limited liability company. For
26
the purposes of this paragraph for determining the num b er of
27
single family homes leased for a term of less than thirty
28
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax
29
under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020
30
owned by an individual or business, all single family homes
31
that are such properties owned by the individual or
32
business, or owned by any business entity in which such
33
individual or business holds any ownership, membership, or
34
beneficial interest, direct or indirect, shall be counted.
35
The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to
36
authorize the classification of any real property owned by a
37
corporation as residential property;
38
Residential property shall not include other similar
39
facilities u sed prima rily f or t ransien t hous ing. A s ingle
40
family hom e own ed by a so le p roprietor, individu al,
41
partnership, or limited liability company that is leased for
42
a term of less than thirty consecutive days, in whole or in
43
part, subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of
44
subsection 1 of section 144.020 shall be classified only as
45
residential property. For the purposes of this section,
46
"transient housing" me ans all rooms available for rent or
47
lease for which the receipts from the rent or lease of such

SCS HB 3000 85
48
rooms are subject to state sales tax pursuant to subdivision
49
(6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020; the leasing of a
50
single family home, in whole or in part, for a term of less
51
than thirty consecutive days does not, in itself, constitute
52
"transient housing";
53
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
54
real pro p erty used for agricultural purposes and devoted
55
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
56
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
57
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
58
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
59
and structures customarily associated with farming,
60
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
61
horticultural property shall also inc l ude land devoted to
62
and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
63
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
64
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
65
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
66
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
67
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
68
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and
69
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
70
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
71
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall
72
also include a ny sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
73
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
74
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
75
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
76
inclu d e urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
77
this section, "urban and community g a rdens" shall include
78
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
79
community for the purposes of providing agricultural

SCS HB 3000 86
80
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
81
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
82
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
83
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
84
other re a l property", all real property used directly or
85
indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial,
86
manufacturing, trade, professional, business, or similar
87
purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
88
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks,
89
portions of which are separately owned and the remainder of
90
which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
91
person or business entity owns more than five individual
92
units. All other real property not included in the property
93
listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article
94
X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined
95
in this section, shall be deemed to be included in the term
96
"utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
97
property".
98
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
99
any tax i ng district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
100
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
101
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
102
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
103
classification of structures intended to be used for
104
residential living by human occupants which contain five or
105
more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
106
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
107
tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
108
shall inc l ude the difference between the revenue that would
109
have been collected on such property under its
110
classification prior to enactment of this section and the
111
amount to be collected under its classification under this

SCS HB 3000 87
112
section. The county assessor of each county or city not
113
within a county shall provide information to each taxing
114
district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
115
assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
116
change in classification.
117
3. All reclassification of property as the result of
118
changin g the classification of structures intended to be
119
used for residential living by human occupants which contain
120
five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
121
after December 31, 1994.
122
4. Where real property is used or held for use for
123
more th a n one purpose and such uses result in different
124
classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
125
classification the percentage of the true value in money of
126
the property devoted to each use; except that, where
127
agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this
128
section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
129
dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up
130
to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
131
shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
132
provided that the portion of property used or held for use
133
as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
134
property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
135
airport.
136
5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
137
for fut u re use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-
138
profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
139
service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
140
determination as to its classification cannot be made under
141
the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
142
shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable

SCS HB 3000 88
143
economic use, which use shall be determined after
144
consideration of:
145
(1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
146
(2) Location of such property;
147
(3) Zoning classification of such property; except
148
that, su c h zoning classification shall not be considered
149
conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
150
determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
151
the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
152
(4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
153
property ;
154
(5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
155
street l i ghting, and other public services for such property;
156
(6) Size of such property;
157
(7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
158
and
159
(8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
160
the imme d iate most suitable economic use of such property.
161
6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
162
for tax a tion purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
163
subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
164
are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
165
Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
166
in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
167
of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
168
7. An assessor shall not reclassify any real property
169
from on e subclass of real property to another subclass of
170
real property without first providing written notice to the
171
owner of record of such property and offering an opportunity
172
for an in-person consultation with the owner of record.
1
140.010. 1. All real estate upon which the taxes
2
remain unpaid on t he first day of January, annually, are

SCS HB 3000 89
3
delinquent, and the county collector shall enforce the lien
4
of the state thereon, as required by this chapter. Any
5
failure to properly return the delinquent list, as required
6
by this chapter, in no way affects the validity of the
7
assessment and levy of taxes, nor of the foreclosure and
8
sale by which the collection of the taxes is enforced, nor
9
in any manner affects the lien of the state on the
10
delinquent real estate for the taxes unpaid thereon.
11
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a
12
resolut i on or order of the county commission of such county,
13
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
14
141.810 for any parcel [for which there is an unpaid tax
15
bill for a period of at least two years after the date on
16
which it became delinquent]. Any county electing to operate
17
as such shall be called a "p a rtial opt-in county". No
18
county eligible to establish a land bank agency un d er
19
subsection 1 of section 140.981 shall elect to operate as a
20
partial opt-in county unless the county first elects to
21
establish a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of
22
section 140.981. In accordance with section 141.290, after
23
the adoption of s uch resolution or order by a county
24
commission, the collector of the county shall decide which
25
tax delinquent parcels shall proceed according to the
26
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810. Such parcels
27
shall be exempt from the provisions of sec t ions 140.030 to
28
140.722. The collector shall remove such parcels from any
29
list of p arcels advertised for first, second, third, or post-
30
third sales.
1
140.190. 1. On the day mentioned in the notice, the
2
county collec t or s hall commence the sale of such lands, and
3
shall continue the same from day to day until each parcel
4
assessed or belonging to each person assessed shall be sold

SCS HB 3000 90
5
as will pay the taxes, interest, and charges thereon, or
6
chargeable to such person in said county.
7
2. (1) The person or land bank agency offering at
8
said sa l e to pay the required sum for a tract shall be
9
considered the purchaser of such land; provided, no sale
10
shall be made to any person or designated agent who:
11
(a) Is currently delinquent on any tax payments on any
12
property , other than a delinquency on the property being
13
offered for sale, and who does not sign an affidavit stating
14
such at the time of sale. Failure to sign such affidavit as
15
well as signing a false a f fidavit may invalidate such sale;
16
(b) Is a member of the governing body of a land bank
17
agency;
18
(c) Is an employee of a land bank agency;
19
(d) Is an elected or appointed official of the
20
governin g body, or an employee of such official, of the
21
political subdivision in which a land bank agency is
22
located; or
23
(e) Is related within the second degree of
24
consangu i nity to a person described in paragraphs (b) to (d)
25
of this subdivision.
26
(2) No bid shall be received from any person not a
27
resident of the state of Missouri or a foreign corporation
28
or entity all deemed nonresidents. A nonresident shall file
29
with said collector an agreement i n writing consenting to
30
the jurisdiction of the circuit court of the county in which
31
such sale shall be made, and also filing with such collector
32
an appointment of some citizen of said county as agent of
33
said nonresident, and consenting that service of process on
34
such agent shall give such court jurisdiction to try and
35
determine any suit growing out of or connected with such
36
sale for taxes. After the delinquent auction sale, any

SCS HB 3000 91
37
certificate of purchase shall be issued to the agent. After
38
meeting the requirements of section 140.405, the prop e rty
39
shall be conveyed to the agent on behalf of the nonresident,
40
and the agent shall thereafter convey the property to the
41
nonresident. A collector may preclude a prospective bidder
42
from partici p ating in a sale for failure to comply with any
43
of the provisions of this section.
44
3. All such written consents to jurisdiction and
45
selecti v e appointments shall be preserved by the county
46
collector and shall be binding upon any person or
47
corporation claiming under the person consenting to
48
jurisdiction and making the appointment herein referred to;
49
provided further, that in the event of the death, disability
50
or refusal to act of the person appointed as agent of said
51
nonresident the county clerk shall become the appointee as
52
agent of said nonresident.
53
4. No person residing in any home rule city with more
54
than se v enty-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
55
thousand inhabitants shall be eligible to offer to purchase
56
lands under this section unless such person has, no later
57
than ten days before the sale date, demonstrated to the
58
satisfaction of the official charged by law with conducting
59
the sale that the person is not the owner of any parcel of
60
real property that has two or more violations of the
61
municipality's building or housing codes. A prospective
62
bidder may make such a demonstration by p r esenting
63
statements from the appropriate collection and code
64
enforcement officials of the municipality. This subsection
65
shall not apply to any taxing authority or land bank agency,
66
and entities shall be eligible to bid at any sale conducted
67
under this section without making such a demonstration.

SCS HB 3000 92
1
140.250. 1. Whenever any lands have been or shall
2
hereafter be o ffe r ed for sale for delinquent taxes,
3
interest, penalty, and costs by the collector of the proper
4
county for any two successive years and no person shall have
5
bid therefor a sum equal to the delinquent taxes thereon,
6
interest, penalty and costs provided by law, then such
7
county collector shall at the next regular tax sale of lands
8
for delinquent taxes sell same to the highest bidder, except
9
the highest bid shall not be less than the sum equal to the
10
delinquent taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, and there
11
shall be a ninety-day period of redemption from such sales
12
as specified in section 140.405.
13
2. A certificate of purchase shall be issued as to
14
such sa l es, and the purchaser at such sales shall be
15
entitled to the issuance and delivery of a collector's deed
16
upon completion of title search action as specified in
17
section 140.405.
18
3. If any lands or lots are not sold at such third
19
offerin g , then the collector shall advertise or offer such
20
lands or lots for sale once every thirty days.
21
4. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third
22
offerin g of any land or lots, whether by the collector or a
23
trustee as provided in section 140.260, shall be entitled to
24
the immediate issuance and delivery of a collector's deed
25
and there shall be no period of redemption from such post-
26
third year sales; provided, however, before any purchaser at
27
a sale to which this section is applicable shall be entitled
28
to a collector's deed it shall be the duty of the collector
29
to demand, and the purchaser to pay, in addition to the
30
purchaser's bid, all taxes due and unpaid on such lands or
31
lots that become due and payable on such lands or lots
32
subsequent to the date of the taxes included in such

SCS HB 3000 93
33
advertisement and sale. The collector's deed or trustee's
34
deed shall have priorit y over all other liens or
35
encumbrances on the property sold except for real property
36
taxes.
37
5. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third
38
offerin g of any land or lots, whether by the collector or a
39
trustee as provided in section 140.260, may elect to proceed
40
under subsection 1 of this section and subsection 6 of
41
section 140.405 by giving notice to the collector prior to
42
the issuance of a collector's deed.
43
6. In the event the real purchaser at any sale to
44
which t h is section is applicable shall be the owner of the
45
lands or lots purchased, or shall be obligated to pay the
46
taxes for the nonpayment of which such lands or lots were
47
sold, then no collector's deed shall be issued to such
48
purchaser, or to anyone acting for or on behalf of such
49
purchaser, without payment to the collector of such
50
additional amount as will discharge in full all delinquent
51
taxes, penalty, interest and costs.
1
140.420. If no person shall redeem the lands sold for
2
taxes prior t o the expiration of the right to redeem, at the
3
expiration thereof, and on production of the certificate of
4
purchase and upon proof satisfactory to the collector that a
5
purchaser or the purchaser's heirs, successors, or assigns
6
are authorized to acquire the deed:
7
(1) The collector of the county in which the sale of
8
such lan d s took place shall execute to the purchaser or the
9
purchaser's heirs or assigns, in the name of the state, a
10
conveyance of the real estate so sold, which shall vest in
11
the grantee an absolute estate in fee simple, subject,
12
however, to all claims thereon for unpaid taxes except such
13
unpaid taxes, existing at time of the purchase of said lands

SCS HB 3000 94
14
and the lien for which taxes was inferior to the lien for
15
taxes for which said tract or lot of land was sold; and
16
(2) The state of Missouri or any person, taxing
17
authorit y , tax district, judgment creditor, or lienholder
18
that had a right, title, interest, claim, or equity of
19
redemption on or to the lands or that had a lien upon the
20
lands shall be barred and forever foreclosed of such
21
unclaimed right, title, interest, claim, or equity of
22
redemption in or to the lands and of any lien upon the lands.
1
140.980. 1. Sections 140.980 to 140.1015 shall be
2
known [and ma y be cited] as the "Chapter 140 Land Bank Act".
3
2. As used in sections 140.980 to 140.1015, the
4
followi n g terms mean:
5
(1) "Land bank agency", an agency established by a
6
county o r municipality under the authority of section
7
140.981;
8
(2) "Land taxes", taxes on real property or real
9
estate, i ncluding the taxes both on the land and the
10
improvements thereon;
11
(3) "Municipality", any incorporated city, town, or
12
village i n this state;
13
(4) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town,
14
village, school district, library district, or any other
15
public subdivision or public corporation that has the power
16
to tax;
17
(5) "Reserve period taxes", land taxes assessed
18
against a ny parcel of real estate sold or otherwise disposed
19
of by a land bank agency for the first three tax years
20
following such sale or disposition;
21
(6) "Tax bill", real estate taxes and the lien
22
thereof, whether general or special, levied and assessed by
23
any taxing authority;

SCS HB 3000 95
24
(7) "Taxing authority", any governmental, managing,
25
administ e ring, or other lawful authority, now or hereafter
26
empowered by law to issue tax bills.
1
140.981. 1. Any county with more than one million
2
inhabitants m a y e s tablish a land bank agency for the
3
management, sale, transfer, and other disposition of
4
interests in real estate owned by such land bank agency.
5
Any such county may establish a land bank agency by
6
ordinance, resolution, or rule, as applicable. Such
7
ordinance, resolution, or rule shall specify t h e name of the
8
land bank agency. No county in which a land bank agency has
9
been established u nder the provisions of sections 141.980 to
10
141.1015 shall elect to establish a land bank agency under
11
this section.
12
2. Any municipality with more than one thousand five
13
hundred inhabitants not located within a county with more
14
than one million inhabitants may establish a land bank
15
agency for the management, sale, transfer, and other
16
disposition of interests in real estate owned by such land
17
bank agency. A municipality may establish a land bank
18
agency by or d inance, resolution, or rule, as applicable.
19
3. A land bank agency shall not own any interest in
20
real es t ate located wholly or partially outside the [city]
21
municipality or county that established the land bank.
22
4. A land bank agency shall be established for the
23
purpose of returning land, including land that is in a non-
24
revenue-generating, non-tax-producing status, to use in
25
private ownership, or for public use.
26
5. A land bank agency created under the chapter 140
27
land ba n k act shall be a public body corporate and politic
28
and shall have permanent and perpetual duration until

SCS HB 3000 96
29
terminated and dissolved in accordance with the provisions
30
of section 140.1012.
1
140.982. 1. If a county establishes a land bank
2
agency under s ubs e ction 1 of section 140.981, the members of
3
the first board of directors of a land bank agency shall be
4
appointed within ninety days after the effective date of the
5
ordinance, resolution, or rule passed establishing such land
6
bank agency. [If any appointing authority fails to make any
7
appointment o f a board member within the time the first
8
appointments are required, the appointment shall be made by
9
the county council.] The following requirements shall apply
10
to the board of dire c tors:
11
(1) The board of directors shall consist of seven
12
members a ppointed by the county executive under the
13
authority vested in that office by the county charter:
14
(a) Two of whom shall [be appointed by the county
15
executiv e , one of whom shall] have professional expertise
16
relevant to the land bank agency;
17
(b) One of whom shall [be appointed by the member of
18
the coun t y council representing the] represent the county
19
council of the district with the highest number of tax
20
delinquent parcels. Such board member shall maintain a
21
primary residence w i thin such district;
22
(c) One of whom shall [be appointed by the member of
23
the coun t y council representing the] represent the county
24
council of the district with the second highest number of
25
tax delinquent parcels. Such board member shall maintain a
26
primary residence withi n such district;
27
(d) One of whom shall [be appointed by consensus of
28
the coun t y executive and the president of] represent the
29
municipal league of the county; and

SCS HB 3000 97
30
(e) Two of whom shall be resident representatives.
31
Resident representatives shall be appointed by a majorit y
32
vote of the other board members, and each resident
33
representative shall maintain a primary residence within one
34
of the twenty municipalities containing the highest
35
percentage of tax delinquent parcels;
36
(2) The term of office of a member shall be four
37
years. E a ch member's primary residence shall be in the
38
county that has established the land bank agency. Each
39
member serves at the pleasure of the member's appo inting
40
authority, may be an employee of the appointing authority,
41
and shall serve without compensation;
42
(3) No public officer shall be eligible to serve as a
43
board me m ber. For purposes of this subdivision, "public
44
officer" mean s a person who is holding an elected public
45
office. Any public employee shall be eligible to serve as a
46
board m e mber;
47
(4) The members of the board shall select annually
48
from amo n g themselves a chair, a vice chair, a treasurer,
49
and such other officers as the board may determine and shall
50
establish the officers' duties, as may be regulated by rules
51
adopted by the board;
52
(5) The board shall establish rules and requirements
53
relative to the attendance and participation of members in
54
its meetings, regular or special. Such rules and
55
regulations may prescribe a proce d ure whereby, if any member
56
fails to comply with such rules and regulations, such member
57
may be disqualified and removed automatically from office by
58
no less than a majority vote of the remaining members of the
59
board, and that member's position shall be vacant as of the
60
first day of the next calendar month. Any person removed
61
under the provisions of this subdivis i on shall be ineligible

SCS HB 3000 98
62
for reappointment to the board unless such reappointment is
63
confirmed unanimously by the board;
64
(6) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same
65
manner a s the original appointment[. If any appointing
66
authority fails to make any appointm e nt of a board member
67
within sixty days after any term expires, the appointment
68
shall be made by the county council] within sixty days and
69
shall be done in compliance with the county charter;
70
(7) Board members shall serve without compensation.
71
The board may reimburse any member for expenses actually
72
incurred in the performance of duties on behalf of the land
73
bank agency;
74
(8) The board shall have the power to organize and
75
reorgani z e the executive, administrative, clerical, and
76
other departments of the land bank agency and to fix the
77
duties, powers, and compensation of all employees, agents,
78
and consultants of the land bank agency;
79
(9) The board shall meet in regular session according
80
to a sch e dule adopted by the board and also shall meet in
81
special session as convened by the chair or upon written
82
notice signed by a majority of the members. The presence of
83
a majority of total membership, excluding v a cancies, shall
84
constitute a quorum;
85
(10) All actions of the board shall be approved by the
86
affirmati v e vote of a majority of the members of that board
87
present and voting. However, no action of the board shall
88
be authorized on th e following matters unless approved by a
89
majority of the total board membership:
90
(a) Adoption, amendment, or repeal of bylaws and other
91
rules an d regulations for conduct of the land bank agency's
92
business;

SCS HB 3000 99
93
(b) Hiring or firing of any employee or contractor of
94
the land bank agency. This function may, by majority vote,
95
be delegated by the bo ard to a specified officer or
96
committee of the land bank agency under such terms and
97
conditions and to the extent that the board may specify;
98
(c) Adoption or amendment of the annual budget; and
99
(d) Sale, encumbrance, or alienation of real property,
100
improvem e nts, or personal property;
101
(11) The governing body of the county establishing a
102
land bank agency may incur debt, including, without
103
limitation, borrowing moneys and issuing bonds, notes, or
104
other obligations to provide funding for the land bank
105
agency;
106
(12) Members of a board shall not be liable personally
107
on the bo n ds or other obligations of the land bank agency,
108
and the rights of creditors shall be solely against such
109
land bank agency; and
110
(13) Vote by proxy shall not be permitted. Any member
111
may reque s t a recorded vote on any resolution or action of
112
the land bank agency.
113
2. If a municipality establishes a land bank agency
114
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, the ordinance,
115
resolution, or rule, as applicable, may specify the
116
following:
117
(1) The name of the land bank agency;
118
(2) The number of members of the board of directors,
119
which sh a ll consist of an odd number of members and shall be
120
no fewer than five members nor more than eleven members;
121
(3) The initial individuals to serve as members of the
122
board of directors and the length of terms for which the
123
members are to serve; and

SCS HB 3000 100
124
(4) The qualifications, manner of selection or
125
appointm e nt, powers, and terms of office of members of the
126
board.
127
3. A land bank agency may employ a secretary, an
128
executi v e director, its own counsel and legal staff,
129
technical experts, and other agents and employees, permanent
130
or temporary, as it may require and may determine the
131
qualifications and fix the compensation and benefits of such
132
persons. A land bank agency may also enter into contracts
133
and agre e ments with political subdivisions for staffing
134
services to be provided to the land bank agency by political
135
subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof, or for a
136
land bank agency to provide such staffing services to
137
political subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof.
1
140.983. A land bank agency established under the
2
chapter 140 l a nd bank act shall have all powers necessary or
3
appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes and
4
provisions of the chapter 140 land bank act, including the
5
following powers in addition to those herein otherwise
6
granted:
7
(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws for the
8
regulati o n of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
9
(2) To sue and be sued, in its own name, and plead and
10
be imple a ded in all civil actions including, but not limited
11
to, actions to clear title to property of the land bank
12
agency;
13
(3) To adopt a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;
14
(4) To borrow from the political subdivision
15
establis h ing the land bank agency, as may be necessary for
16
the operation and work of the land bank agency;
17
(5) To procure insurance or guarantees from political
18
subdivis i ons, the state, the federal government, or any

SCS HB 3000 101
19
other public or private sources of the payment of any bond,
20
note, loan, or other obligation, or portion thereof,
21
incurred by the land bank agency and to pay any fees or
22
premiums in connection therewith;
23
(6) To enter into contracts and other instruments
24
necessar y , incidental, or convenient to the performance of
25
its duties and the exercise of its powers including, but not
26
limited to, agreements with other land bank agencies and
27
with political subdivisions for the joint exercise of powers
28
under this chapter;
29
(7) To enter into contracts and other instruments
30
necessar y , incidental, or convenient to:
31
(a) The performance of functions by the land bank
32
agency o n behalf of political subdivisions, or agencies or
33
departments thereof; or
34
(b) The performance by political subdivisions, or
35
agencies or departments thereof, of functions on behalf of
36
the land bank agency;
37
(8) To make and execute contracts and other
38
instrume n ts necessary or convenient to the exercise of the
39
powers of the land bank agency;
40
(9) To procure insurance against losses in connection
41
with the property, assets, or activities of the land bank
42
agency;
43
(10) To invest the [moneys] money of the land bank
44
agency in the same manner as moneys are invested by the
45
state treasurer, including amounts deposited in reserve or
46
sinking funds, at the discretion of the land bank agency in
47
obligations or property determined proper by the land bank
48
agency and to name and use depositories for its moneys;
49
(11) To enter into contracts for the management of or
50
the sale o f the property of the land bank agency;

SCS HB 3000 102
51
(12) To design, develop for public use, construct,
52
demolish, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, relocate,
53
equip, furnish, and otherwise improve real property or
54
rights or interests in real property held by the land bank
55
agency;
56
(13) To acquire property, whether by purchase,
57
exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, except not property not
58
wholly located in the county or municipality that
59
established the land bank agency; to grant or acquire
60
licenses and easements; and to sell, grant an option with
61
respect to, or otherwise dispose of, any property of the
62
land bank agency;
63
(14) To enter into partnerships, joint ventures, and
64
other col l aborative relationships with political
65
subdivisions and other public and private entities for the
66
management, development, and disposition of real property,
67
except not for property not wholly located in the county or
68
municipality that established the land bank agency; and
69
(15) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter
70
and all o t her applicable laws, to do all other things
71
necessary or convenient to achieve the objectives and
72
purposes of the land bank agency or other laws that relate
73
to the purposes and responsibility of the land bank agency.
1
140.984. 1. The income of a land bank agency shall be
2
exempt from a l l t a xation by the state and by any of its
3
political subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real
4
estate, a land bank age n cy shall immediately notify the
5
county assessor and the county collector of such ownership;
6
all taxes, special taxes, fines, and fees on such real
7
estate shall be deemed satisfied by transfer to the land
8
bank agency; and such property shall be exempt from all
9
taxation during the land bank agency's ownership thereof, in

SCS HB 3000 103
10
the same manner and to the same extent as any other publicly
11
owned real estate. Upon the sale or other disposition of
12
any real estate he l d by it, the land bank agency shall
13
immediately notify the county assessor and the county
14
collector of such change of ownership. However, that such
15
tax exemption for improved and occupie d real property held
16
by the land bank agency as a lessor pursuant to a ground
17
lease shall terminate upon the first occupancy[, and]. The
18
land bank agency shall immediately notify the county
19
assessor and the county collector of such occupancy.
20
2. A land bank agency may acquire real property by
21
gift, d e vise, transfer, exchange, foreclosure, purchase, or
22
pursuant to sections 141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819,
23
except a land bank agency shall not acquire property located
24
partially or wholly outside the boundaries of the county or
25
municipality that established such land bank agency.
26
3. A land bank agency may acquire property by purchase
27
contrac t s, lease purchase agreements, installment sales
28
contracts, and land contracts and may accept transfers from
29
political subdivisions upon such terms and conditions as
30
agreed to by the land bank agency and the political
31
subdivision. A land bank agency may bid on any parcel of
32
real estate o ffered for sale, offered at a foreclosure sale
33
under sections 140.220 to 140.250, offered at a sale
34
conducted under section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or
35
offered at a foreclosure sale under section 141.550.
36
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any p o litical
37
subdivision may transfer to the land bank agency real
38
property and interests in real property of the political
39
subdivision on such terms and conditions and according to
40
such procedures as determined by the political subdivision.

SCS HB 3000 104
41
4. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real
42
propert y in accordance with the laws and ordinances of the
43
jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
44
5. Upon issuance of a deed to a parcel of real estate
45
to a la n d bank agency under subsection 4 of section 140.250,
46
subsection 5 of section 140.405, other sale conducted under
47
section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or section 141.550,
48
the land bank agency shall pay only the amount of the land
49
bank agency's bid that exceeds the amount of all tax bills
50
included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's
51
fees, taxes, and costs then due thereon. If the real estate
52
is acquired in a delinquent land tax auc t ion under
53
subsection 4 of section 140.250, subsection 5 of section
54
140.405, or other sale conducted under section 140.190,
55
140.240, or 140.250, such excess shall be applied and
56
distributed in accordance with section 140.230. If the real
57
estate is acquired in a delinquent land tax auct ion under
58
section 141.550, such excess shall be applied and
59
distributed in accordance with subsections 3 and 4 of
60
section 141.580, exclusive of subdivision (3) of subsection
61
3 of section 141.580. Upon issuance of a deed, the county
62
collector shall mark t he tax bills included in the judgment
63
as "cancelled by sale to the land bank" and shall take
64
credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including
65
principal amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and
66
costs, on the county collector's books and in the county
67
collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
68
6. A land bank shall not own real property unless the
69
propert y is wholly located within the boundaries of the
70
county or municipality that established the land bank agency.
71
7. Within one year of the effective date of the
72
ordinan c e, resolution, or rule passed establishing a

SCS HB 3000 105
73
municipal land bank agency under subsection 2 of section
74
140.981, the title to any real property that is located
75
wholly within the municipality that created the land bank
76
agency and that is held by a land trust created under
77
subsection 1 of section 141.819 shall be transferred by deed
78
from the land trust to such land bank agency, at the land
79
bank agency's request.
1
140.985. 1. A land bank agency shall hold in its own
2
name all real pro p erty acquired by such land bank agency,
3
irrespective of the identity of the transferor of such
4
property.
5
2. A land bank agency shall maintain and make
6
availab l e for public review and inspection an inventory and
7
history of all real property the land bank agency holds or
8
formerly held. This inventory and history shall be
9
available on t h e land bank agency's website and include at a
10
minimum:
11
(1) Whether a parcel is available for sale;
12
(2) The address of the parcel if an address has been
13
assigned ;
14
(3) The parcel number if no address has been assigned;
15
(4) The month and year that a parcel entered the land
16
bank age n cy's inventory;
17
(5) Whether a parcel has sold;
18
(6) If a parcel has sold, the name of the person or
19
entity t o which it was sold; and
20
(7) Whether the parcel was acquired by the land bank
21
agency t h rough judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial
22
foreclosure, donation, or some other manner.
23
3. The land bank agency shall determine and set forth
24
in poli c ies and procedures the general terms and conditions
25
for consideration to be received by the land bank agency for

SCS HB 3000 106
26
the transfer of real property and interests in real
27
property. Consideration may take the form of monetary
28
payments a nd secured financial obligations, covenants, and
29
conditions related to the present and future use of the
30
property; contractual commitments of the transferee; and
31
such other forms of consideration as the land bank agency
32
determines to be in the best interest of the land bank
33
agency.
34
4. A land bank agency may convey, exchange, sell,
35
transfe r , grant, release and demise, pledge, and hypothecate
36
any and all interests in, upon, or to property of the land
37
bank agency. A land bank agency may gift any interest in,
38
upon, or to p roperty to the county or municipality that
39
established the land bank agency.
40
5. A county or municipality may, in its resolution,
41
ordinan c e, or rule creating a land bank agency, establish a
42
hierarchical ranking of priorities for the use of real
43
property conveyed by such land bank agency, including, but
44
not limited to:
45
(1) Use for purely public spaces and places;
46
(2) Use as wildlife conservation areas;
47
(3) Use as a green field area; and
48
(4) To return to private use.
49
If a county or municipality, in its resolution, ordinance,
50
or rule creating a land bank agency, establishes priorities
51
for the use of real property conveyed by the land bank
52
agency, such priorities shall be consistent with and no more
53
restrictive than municipal planning and zoning ordinances.
54
6. The land bank agency may delegate to officers and
55
employe e s the authority to enter into and execute
56
agreements, instruments of conveyance, and all other related

SCS HB 3000 107
57
documents pertaining to the conveyance of property by the
58
land bank agency.
59
7. Any property sold by a land bank agency that was
60
acquire d through purchase, transfer, exchange, or gift shall
61
be sold.
62
8. When any parcel of real estate acquired by a land
63
bank ag e ncy is sold or otherwise disposed of by such land
64
bank agency, the proceeds therefrom shall be applied and
65
distributed in the following order:
66
(1) To the payment of the expenses of the sale;
67
(2) To fulfill the requirements of the resolution,
68
indentur e , or other financing documents adopted or entered
69
into in connection with bonds, notes, or other obligations
70
of the land bank agency, to the extent that such
71
requirements may apply with respect to such parcel of real
72
estate;
73
(3) To the land bank agency to pay the salaries and
74
other ex p enses of such land bank agency and of its employees
75
as provided for in its annual budget; and
76
(4) Any funds in excess of those necessary to meet the
77
expenses of the annual budget of the land bank agency in any
78
fiscal year and a reasonable sum to carry over into the next
79
fiscal year to assure that sufficient funds will be
80
available to meet initial expenses for that next fiscal year
81
shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities that, at
82
the time of the distribution, are taxing the real property
83
from which the proceeds are being distributed. The
84
distributions shall be in proportion to the am o unts of the
85
taxes levied on the properties by the taxing authorities.
86
Distribution shall be made on January first and July first
87
of each year, and at such other times as the land bank
88
agency may determine.

SCS HB 3000 108
1
140.986. 1. No later than five years from the date it
2
acquired the p rop e rty, a land bank agency shall either sell,
3
put to a productive use, or show significant progress
4
towards selling or putting the property to a productive use
5
[a parcel of real property]. A productive use may be
6
demolishing all structures o f the property or using the
7
property for a community garden, park, or other open public
8
space. No later than eight years from the date it acquired
9
the pr o perty, a land bank agency shall sell, clear, or put
10
such property to public use.
11
2. The governing body of the county or municipality
12
may gra n t the land bank agency a one-year extension if the
13
body determines by a majority vote that unforeseen
14
circumstances have delayed the sale or productive use of a
15
parcel of property.
16
3. If a land bank agency owns a parcel of real
17
propert y that does not have a productive use after five
18
years, or does not receive an extension under subsection 2
19
of this section, the property shall be offered for public
20
sale using the procedures under sections 140.170 to 140.190.
1
140.987. 1. A land bank agency shall require that any
2
buyer demonst r ate that the buyer is not the owner of any
3
parcel of real estate within the county or municipality that
4
created the land bank agency for which a tax bill has been
5
delinquent for more than one year or is in violation of any
6
municipal building or housing code[, and is not the original
7
owner or relative of such owner within the second degree of
8
consanguinity of the parcel sold, transferred, exchanged, or
9
gifted to the land bank agency].
10
2. No foreign or domestic corporation or limited
11
liabili t y company that has failed to appoint or maintain a
12
registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible

SCS HB 3000 109
13
to buy property from the land bank agency. No foreign
14
corporate entity shall be eligible to buy p roperty from the
15
land bank agency unless it has a certificate of authority to
16
transact business in Missouri under section 351.572.
17
3. As a condition of the sale or other authorized
18
conveya n ce of ownership of any parcel of land owned by the
19
land bank agency to a private owner, such owner may be
20
required to enter into a contract, which may be secured by a
21
deed of trust in favor of the land bank agency, stipulating
22
that such owner or the owner's successor agrees that such
23
owner or the owner's successor make certain improvements to
24
the parcel. If the land bank agency finds by resolution
25
that the ter ms of the contract have not been satisfied, the
26
land bank agency shall be authorized to bring suit to
27
recover damages for the breach and to seek a judicial
28
foreclosure of the parcel under sections 443.190 to 443.260,
29
except that upon final judgment of the court, title shall
30
revert to the land bank agency without necessity of sale.
31
As an alternative to, or in addition to, seeking a judici a l
32
foreclosure, the land bank agency may, only by gift, assign
33
or convey its right to foreclose under sections 443.190 to
34
443.260 to any 501(c)(3) tax-exempt nonprofit organization
35
or exercise the right of reentry under chapter 524, 527, or
36
534. The land bank agency or its assignee shall assume
37
titl e to the land by filing a copy of the judgment with the
38
recorder of deeds in the county where the property is
39
located. Any property redeemed by the land bank agency
40
under th e provisions of this section shall be administered
41
in the same manner as other property sold to the land bank
42
agency.
1
140.988. 1. (1) A land bank agency may receive
2
funding throu g h g r ants and gifts from political

SCS HB 3000 110
3
subdivisions, the state, the federal government, and other
4
public and private sources.
5
(2) A land bank agency may receive funding through
6
gifts fr o m any source, provided that the land bank agency
7
shall not sell or otherwise transfer by any means any real
8
property held by the land bank agency to the entity from
9
which the land bank agency received a gift [pursuant to this
10
subdivision].
11
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of
12
section 140.985, a land bank agency may receive and retain
13
payments for services rendered, for consideration for
14
disposition of real and personal property, for proceeds of
15
insurance coverage for losses incurred, for income from
16
investments, and for any other asset and activity lawfully
17
permitted to a land bank agency under the chapter 140 land
18
bank act.
19
3. If a land bank agency sells or otherwise disposes
20
of a pa r cel of real estate held by it, any land taxes
21
assessed against such parcel for the three tax years
22
following such sale or disposition by such land bank agency
23
that are collected by the county collector in a calendar
24
year and not refunded, less the fees provided under section
25
52.260 and subsection 4 of this section and less the amounts
26
to be deducted under section 137.720, shall be distributed
27
by the county collector to such land bank agency no later
28
than March first of the following calendar year, provided
29
that land taxes impounded under section 139.031 or otherwise
30
paid under protest shall not be subject to distribution
31
under this subsection. Any amount required to be
32
distributed to a land b ank agency under this subsection
33
shall be subject to offset for amounts previously

SCS HB 3000 111
34
distributed to such land bank agency that were assessed,
35
collected, or distributed in error.
36
4. In addition to any other provisions of law related
37
to coll e ction fees, the county collector shall collect on
38
behalf of the county a fee of four percent of reserve period
39
taxes collected and such fees collected shall be deposited
40
in the county general fund.
41
5. If a county has established a land bank agency
42
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, the collector may
43
collect on behalf of the county a fee for the collection of
44
delinquent and back taxes of up to five percent on all sums
45
collected to be added to the face of the tax bill and
46
collected from the party paying the tax. All fees collected
47
under the provisions of this subsection s hall be paid to the
48
land bank agency established under subsection 1 of section
49
140.981.
1
140.991. 1. There shall be an annual audit of the
2
affairs, acco u nts , expenses, and financial transactions of a
3
land bank agency by a certified public accountant before
4
April thirtieth of each year, which accountant shall be
5
employed by the land bank agency on or before March first of
6
each year. Certified copies of the audit shall be furnished
7
to the cou n ty or municipality that established the land bank
8
agency, and the county or municipality shall post the audit
9
on its [public] website. Copies of the audit shall also be
10
available for public ins p ection at the office of the land
11
bank agency.
12
2. The land bank agency may be performance audited at
13
any tim e by the state auditor or by the auditor of the
14
county or municipality that established the land bank
15
agency. The land bank agency shall make copies of such
16
audit a v ailable to the public and shall post a copy of the

SCS HB 3000 112
17
audit on the land bank agency's website within thirty days
18
of the completion of the audit.
1
140.994. 1. A land bank agency shall have power to
2
receive funds fro m bonds issued by the county or
3
municipality that created the land bank agency, for any of
4
its [corporate] purposes. The bonds shall be special,
5
limited obligations of th e county or municipality that
6
created the land bank agency, the principal of and interest
7
on which shall be payable solely from the income and revenue
8
derived from the sale, or other disposition of the assets of
9
the land bank agency, or such portion thereof as may be
10
designated in the resolution, indenture, or other financing
11
documents relating to the issuance of the bonds.
12
2. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be
13
deemed t o be an indebtedness within the meaning of any
14
constitutional or statutory limitation upon the incurring of
15
indebtedness. The bonds shall not constitute a debt,
16
liability, or obligation of the state or a pledge of the
17
full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state and
18
the bonds shall contain a recital to that effect. Neither
19
the members of the board nor any person executing the bonds
20
shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the
21
issuance thereof.
22
3. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be
23
authori z ed by resolution of the governing body of the county
24
or municipality establishing the land bank agency, shall be
25
issued in such form, shall be in such denominations, shall
26
bear interest at such rate or rates, shall mature on such
27
dates and in such manner, shall be subject to redemption at
28
such times and on such terms, and shall be executed by one
29
or more members of the governing body of the county or
30
municipality establishing the land bank agency, as provided

SCS HB 3000 113
31
in the resolution authorizing the issuance thereof or as set
32
out in the indenture or other financing document authorized
33
and approved by such resolution. The governing body of the
34
county or municipality establish i ng the land bank agency may
35
sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or at
36
private sale, and for such price as the governing body of
37
the county or municipality establishing the land bank agency
38
may determine to be in the best interests of the land bank
39
agency.
40
4. A governing body of the county or municipality
41
establi s hing the land bank agency may from time to time, as
42
authorized by resolution of the governing body, issue
43
refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding, extending, and
44
unifying all or any part of its valid outstanding bonds.
45
Such refunding bonds may be payable from any of the sour c es
46
identified in subsection 1 of this section and from the
47
investment of any of the proceeds of the refunding bonds.
48
5. The bonds issued by the governing body of the
49
county o r municipality establishing the land bank agency
50
shall be negotiable instruments under chapter 400.
51
6. Bonds issued under this section and all income or
52
interes t thereon shall be exempt from all state taxes.
53
7. The governing body of the county or municipality
54
establi s hing the land bank agency shall have the power to
55
issue temporary notes upon the same terms and subject to all
56
provisions and restrictions applicable to bonds under this
57
section. Such notes issued by the governing body may be
58
refunded by notes or bonds authorized under this section.
1
140.995. Notwithstanding any provision of sections
2
140.980 to 14 0 .995 to the contrary, a land bank agency may
3
rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for any
4
community, noncommercial, or agricultural uses.

SCS HB 3000 114
1
140.1000. 1. No board member or employee of a land
2
bank agency sh a ll r eceive any compensation, emolument, or
3
other profit directly or indirectly from the rental,
4
management, acquisition, sale, demolition, repair,
5
rehabilitation, use, operation, ownership, or disposition of
6
any [lands] property held by such land bank agency other
7
than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments provided for in
8
the chapter 140 land bank act.
9
2. No member of the board or employee of a land bank
10
agency s hall own, directly or indirectly, any legal or
11
equitable interest in or to any lands held by such land bank
12
agency other than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments
13
provided for in sections 140.980 to 140.1015.
14
3. A violation of this section is a class D felony.
15
4. The land bank agency may adopt supplemental rules
16
and reg u lations addressing potential conflicts of interest
17
and ethical guidelines for board members and land bank
18
agency employees, provided that such rules and regulations
19
are not inconsistent with this chapter or any other
20
applicable law.
21
5. Any person who is related to a board member or
22
employe e of a land bank agency within the second degree of
23
consanguinity or affinity shall be considered a board member
24
or employee of a land bank agency for purposes of this
25
section and subject to its provisions.
1
140.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized
2
to file an act i on t o quiet title under section 527.150 [as
3
to] for any real property in which the land bank agency has
4
an interest. For purposes of any and all such actions, the
5
land bank ag e ncy shall be deemed to be the holder of
6
sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory

SCS HB 3000 115
7
rights, so as to qualify the land bank agency as an adequate
8
petitioner in such action.
9
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title,
10
the lan d bank agency shall conduct an examination of title
11
to determine the identity of any and all persons and
12
entities possessing a claim or interest in or to the real
13
property. Service of the petition to quiet title shall be
14
provided t o all such interested parties by the following
15
methods:
16
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and
17
address a s reasonably ascertainable by an inspection of
18
public records;
19
(2) In the case of occupied real property, by first
20
class ma i l addressed to "Occupant";
21
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real
22
property ;
23
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general
24
circulat i on in the county or municipality in which the
25
property is located; and
26
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as
27
may be r e quired by prevailing motions of due process.
28
3. As part of the petition to quiet title, the land
29
bank ag e ncy shall file an affidavit identifying all parties
30
potentially having an interest in the real property and the
31
form of notice provided.
32
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition
33
within n inety days following filing of the petition and, as
34
to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an
35
interested party, the court shall issue its final judgment
36
within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the petition.

SCS HB 3000 116
37
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a
38
single p etition to quiet title one or more parcels of real
39
property.
1
140.1012. 1. A land bank agency shall be dissolved as
2
a public body c orp o rate and politic no sooner than sixty
3
calendar days, but no later than one hundred eighty calendar
4
days, after an ordinance or resolution for such dissolution
5
is passed by the county or municipality that established the
6
land bank agency.
7
2. [No less than sixty calendar days' advance written
8
notice o f consideration of] If such an ordinance or
9
resolution of dissolution is being considered, no less than
10
sixty calendar days advance written notice shall be given to
11
the land bank agency, shall be published in a local
12
newspaper of general circulation within such county or
13
municipality, and shall be sent certified mail to each
14
trustee of any outstanding bonds of the land bank agency.
15
3. No land bank agency shall be dissolved while there
16
remains any outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations
17
of the land bank agency unless such bonds, notes, or other
18
obligations are paid or defeased pursuant to the resolution,
19
indenture, or other financing document under which such
20
bonds, notes, or other obligations were issued prior to or
21
simultaneously with such dissolution. Once all outstanding
22
bonds, notes, or other obligations ar e satisfied, no new
23
property shall be purchased by, gifted to, traded to, or
24
exchanged with the land bank agency. No further debts or
25
other obligations shall be incurred o ther than that which is
26
necessary to sell or put to public use any remaining
27
property held by the land bank agency. The land bank agency
28
shall be dissolved within thirty days a fter all outstanding
29
bonds, notes, or other obligations are satisfied.

SCS HB 3000 117
30
4. Upon dissolution of a land bank agency pursuant to
31
this se c tion, all real property, personal property, and
32
other assets of the land bank agency shall be transferred by
33
appropriate written instrument to and shall become the
34
assets of the county or municipality that established the
35
land bank agency. Such county or municipality shall act
36
expeditiously to r eturn such real property to the tax rolls
37
and shall market and sell such real property using an open,
38
public method that ensures the best possible prices are
39
realized while ensuring such real property is returned to a
40
suitable, productive use for the betterment of the
41
neighborhood in which such real property is located. Upon
42
the sale or other disposition of any such property by such
43
county or municipality, the proceeds therefrom shall be
44
applied and distributed in the following order:
45
(1) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
46
(2) To the reasonable costs incurred by such county or
47
municipa l ity in maintaining and marketing such property; and
48
(3) The balance shall be paid to the respective taxing
49
authorit i es that, at the time of the distribution, are
50
taxing the real property from which the proceeds are being
51
distributed.
1
141.220. The following words, terms and definitions,
2
when used in s ections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
3
141.980 to 141.1015, shall have the meanings ascribed to
4
them in this section, except where the text clearly
5
indicates a different meaning:
6
(1) "Ancillary parcel" shall mean a parcel of real
7
estate a c quired by a land bank agency other than:
8
(a) Pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of
9
section 1 41.560;

SCS HB 3000 118
10
(b) By deed from a land trust under subsection 1 of
11
section 1 41.984; or
12
(c) Pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of
13
subsecti o n 2 of section 141.550;
14
(2) "Appraiser" shall mean a state licensed or
15
certifie d appraiser licensed or certified pursuant to
16
chapter 339 who is not an employee of the collector or
17
collection authority;
18
(3) "Board" or "board of commissioners" shall mean the
19
board of commissioners of a land bank agency;
20
(4) "Collector" shall mean the collector of the
21
revenue i n any county affected by sections 141.210 to
22
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015;
23
(5) "County" shall mean any county in this state;
24
(6) "Court" shall mean the circuit court of any county
25
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
26
to 141.1015;
27
(7) "Delinquent land tax attorney" shall mean a
28
licensed attorney-at-law, employed or designated by the
29
collector as hereinafter provided;
30
(8) "Interested party", shall mean any person with a
31
legal in t erest in a parcel of land affected by sections
32
141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
33
Interested party shall not include:
34
(a) The holder of the benefit or burden of any
35
easement or right of way;
36
(b) The holder of a benefit or burden of a real
37
covenant ; or
38
(c) A leasehold owner of subsurface mineral, gas, or
39
oil righ t s whose interest is properly recorded and whose
40
interest shall remain unaffected;

SCS HB 3000 119
41
(9) "Land bank agency", shall mean [an] any agency
42
created u nder section 141.980;
43
(10) "Land taxes" shall mean taxes on real property or
44
real esta t e and shall include the taxes both on land and the
45
improvements thereon;
46
(11) "Land trustees" and "land trust" shall mean the
47
land trus t ees and land trust as the same are created by and
48
described in section 141.700;
49
(12) "Municipality" shall include any incorporated
50
city or t o wn, or a part thereof, located in whole or in part
51
within a county;
52
(13) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm,
53
copartner s hip, joint adventure, association, corporation,
54
estate, trust, business trust, receiver or trustee appointed
55
by any state or federal court, trustee otherwise created,
56
syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a
57
unit, and the plural as well as the singular number;
58
(14) "Political subdivision" shall mean any county,
59
city, tow n , village, school district, library district, or
60
any other public subdivision or public corporation having
61
the power to tax;
62
(15) "Reserve period taxes" shall mean land taxes
63
assessed a gainst any parcel of real estate sold or otherwise
64
disposed of by a land bank agency for the first three tax
65
years following such sale or disposition;
66
(16) "School district", "road district", "water
67
district" , "sewer district", "levee district", "drainage
68
district", "special benefit district", "special assessment
69
district", or "park district" shall include those located
70
within a county as such county is described in this section;
71
(17) "Sheriff" and "circuit clerk" shall mean the
72
sheriff a n d circuit clerk, respectively, of any county

SCS HB 3000 120
73
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
74
to 141.1015;
75
(18) "Tax bill" as used in sections 141.210 to 141.810
76
and secti o ns 141.980 to 141.1015 shall represent real estate
77
taxes and the lien thereof, whether general or special,
78
levied and assessed by any taxing authority;
79
(19) "Tax district" shall mean the state of Missouri
80
and any c o unty, municipality, school district, road
81
district, water district, sewer district, levee district,
82
drainage district, special benefit district, special
83
assessment district, or park district, located in any
84
municipality or county as herein described;
85
(20) "Tax lien" shall mean the lien of any tax bill as
86
defined i n this section;
87
(21) "Taxing authority" shall include any
88
governmen t al, managing, administering or other lawful
89
authority, now or hereafter empowered by law to issue tax
90
bills, the state of Missouri or any county, municipality,
91
school district, road district, water district, sewer
92
district, levee district, drainage district, special benefit
93
district, special assessment district, or park district,
94
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
95
to 141.1015.
1
141.230. 1. The land tax collection law shall apply
2
to all counti e s t h at have elected to operate under the
3
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 by adoption of a
4
resolution or order of the county commission of such county.
5
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a
6
resolut i on or order of the county commission of such county,
7
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
8
141.810 as a partial opt-in county. After adoption of any
9
such resolution or order, the colle c tor for such county may

SCS HB 3000 121
10
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
11
141.810 for any parcel [or parcels for which there is an
12
unpaid tax bill for a period of at least two years after the
13
date on which it became delinquent].
14
3. No county eligible to establish a land bank agency
15
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981 shall elect to operate
16
as a partial opt-in county unless having first elected to
17
establish a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of
18
section 140.981.
19
4. Any county commission so adopting such resolution
20
or orde r shall file a certified copy thereof within ten days
21
after the adoption of said resolution or order with the
22
clerk of the county commission and with the collector of
23
revenue for such county, and with the mayor and city
24
collector or chief financial officer of each municipality in
25
such county, as defined by section 141.220.
26
5. After the adoption of such resolution or order by
27
such co u nty commission, each municipality shall cooperate
28
with such county under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
29
141.810. Any such county which shall, in the manner
30
provided herein, have elected to come within the provisions
31
of sections 141.210 to 141.810, in whole or in part, by
32
adoption of such resolution, order or ordinance, may, after
33
a period of one year from the effective date of such
34
resolution, order or ordinance, adopt by similar means a
35
resolution, order or ordinance, rescinding the election to
36
adopt the provisions of the land tax collection law and
37
certified copies of such resolution, order or ordinance
38
shall be filed in the same manner as said original
39
resolution, order or ordinance; provided, that such
40
resolution, order or ordinance rescinding or nullifying the
41
election to adopt the provisions of sections 141.210 to

SCS HB 3000 122
42
141.810 shall not become effective for one year thereafter
43
nor shall it invalidate or in any way affect any proceedings
44
in rem for foreclosure which may have been instituted under
45
the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810, but all such
46
actions and proceedings so instituted while the provisions
47
of said sections were in full force and effect shall be
48
prosecuted to their conclusion and completion; provided
49
further, that any county which may have operated under
50
sections 141.210 to 141. 8 10 prior to the enactment of this
51
section may hereafter elect to terminate any further
52
operation under sections 141.210 to 141.810 by proceeding in
53
manner and form and to the same effect as though it had
54
originally elected to operate under the provisions of
55
sections 141.210 to 141.810.
56
6. Any municipality located partly within a county
57
electin g to operate in whole or in part under the provisions
58
of sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall cooperate with such
59
county under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810;
60
provided, however, that tax bills imposed against real
61
estate located in that part of such municipality outside of
62
the limits of any such county shall be collected under other
63
provisions as may be provided by law.
1
141.250. 1. The respective liens of the tax bills for
2
general taxes of t he state of Missouri, the county, any
3
municipality, and any school district, for the same tax
4
year, shall be equal and first liens upon the real estate
5
described in the respective tax bills thereof; provided,
6
however, that the liens of such tax bills for the latest
7
year for which tax bills are unpaid shall take priority over
8
the liens of tax bills levied and assessed for less recent
9
years, and the lien of such tax bills shall rate in priority
10
in the order of the years for which the tax bills are

SCS HB 3000 123
11
delinquent, the lien of the tax bill longest delinquent
12
being junior in priority to the lien of the tax bill for the
13
next most recent tax year.
14
2. All tax bills for other than general taxes shall
15
constit u te liens junior to the liens for general taxes upon
16
the real estate described therein; provided, however, that a
17
tax bill for other than general taxes, of the more recent
18
issue shall likewise be senior to any such tax bill of less
19
recent date.
20
3. The proceeds derived from the sale of any lands
21
encumbe r ed with a tax lien or liens shall be distributed to
22
the owners of such liens in the order of the seniority of
23
the liens. Those holding liens of equal rank shall share in
24
direct pro p ortion to the amounts of their respective liens.
1
141.270. 1. On or before the fifth day of January in
2
each year, al l ta x ing authorities and any other tax bill
3
owner shall file a list with the collector [a list] on a
4
form approved by the collector of all parcels of real estate
5
affected by tax liens held and owned by such taxing
6
authority or person which have been delinquent for two years
7
or more. Such list shall also include all delinquent tax
8
bills fo r any and all years.
9
2. The taxing authority or person filing such list
10
shall p a y to the collector a filing fee of one dollar and
11
fifty cents for each parcel of real estate described
12
therein, which fee shall be charged against each parcel and
13
collected and accounted for by the collector as other costs.
14
3. No school district nor any other taxing authority
15
whose t a xes are required by law to be collected by the
16
collector shall file any list nor pay the filing fee herein
17
provided.

SCS HB 3000 124
18
4. If the taxes of any taxing authority are two or
19
more ye a rs delinquent, the other taxing authorities and
20
other tax bill owners shall include in the said lis t all
21
tax liens against the said parcel, even though the taxes are
22
not two years delinquent.
1
141.290. 1. The collector shall compile lists of all
2
state, county , sc h ool, and other tax bills collectible by
3
the collector that are delinquent according to the
4
collector's records, and the collector shall combine such
5
lists with the list filed by any taxing authority or tax
6
bill owner.
7
2. For partial opt-in counties, the collector shall
8
decide w hich tax delinquent parcels shall proceed according
9
to the provisions contained [herein] in this chapter. The
10
remaining parcels shall proceed under such other provi sions
11
as may be provided by law.
12
3. The collector shall assign a serial number to each
13
parcel o f real estate in each list and if suit has been
14
filed in the circuit court of the county on any delinquent
15
tax bill included in any list, the collector shall give the
16
court docket number of such suit and some appropriate
17
designation of the place where such suit is pending, and
18
such pending suit so listed in any petition filed pursuant
19
to the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
20
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall, without further
21
procedure or court order, be deemed to be consolidated with
22
the suit brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
23
sections 141.980 to 141.1015, and such pending suit shall
24
thereupon be abated.
25
4. The collector shall deliver such combined lists to
26
the del i nquent land tax attorney from time to time but not
27
later than April first of each year.

SCS HB 3000 125
28
5. The delinquent land tax attorney shall incorporate
29
such li s ts in petitions in the form prescribed in section
30
141.410, and shall file such petitions with the circuit
31
clerk not later than June first of each year.
1
141.300. 1. The collector shall receipt for the
2
aggregate amo u nt o f such delinquent tax bills appearing on
3
the list or lists filed with the collector under the
4
provisions of section 141.290, which receipt shall be held
5
by the owner or holder of the tax bills or by the treasurer
6
or other corresponding financial officer of the taxing
7
authority [so] filing such list with the collector.
8
2. The collector shall, on or before the fifth day of
9
each mo n th, file with the owner or holder of any tax bill or
10
with the treasurer or other corresponding financial officer
11
of any taxing authority, a detailed statement, verified by
12
affidavit, of all taxes collected by the collector during
13
the preceding month which appear on the list or lists
14
received by the collector, and shall, on or before the
15
fifteenth day of the month, pay the same, less the
16
collector's commissions and costs payable to the county, to
17
the tax bill owner or holder or to the treasurer or other
18
corresponding financial officer of any taxing authority;
19
provided, however, that the collector shall be given credit
20
for the full amount of any tax bill where title to the real
21
estate described in such tax bill is taken by a land trust,
22
or which is bid on by a land bank agency and where title to
23
the real estate described in such tax bill is taken by such
24
land bank agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection
25
3 of section 141.560, or which is included in the bid of a
26
land bank agency and where title to the real estate
27
described in such tax bill is taken by such land bank agency

SCS HB 3000 126
28
pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
29
section 141.550.
1
141.320. 1. The collector shall, at the collector's
2
option, appoi n t a delinquent land tax attorney, to be
3
compensated as necessary for the performance of the
4
collector's duties under this chapter, or in counties having
5
a county counselor, the collector shall, at the collector's
6
option, designate the county counselor and such of the
7
counselor's assistants as shall appear necessary to act as
8
the delinquent land tax attorney.
9
2. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not the
10
county c ounselor, with the approval of the collector, may
11
appoint one or more assistant delinquent land tax attorneys
12
and such clerical employees as may be necessary, to be
13
compensated as necessary for the performance of duties under
14
this chapter; and the appointed delinquent tax attorney may
15
incur such reasonable expenses as are necessary for the
16
performance of the attorney's duties.
17
3. The delinquent land tax attorney and the attorney's
18
assista n ts shall perform legal services for the collector
19
and shall act as attorney for the collector in the
20
prosecution of all suits brought for the collection of land
21
taxes; but the attorney and the collector shall not perform
22
legal services for the land trust or any land bank agency.
23
4. Salaries and expenses of a delinquent land tax
24
attorne y who is not also the county counselor, the
25
attorney's assistants, and the attorney's employees shall be
26
paid monthly out of the treasury of the county from the same
27
funds as employees of the collector whenever the funds
28
provided for by sections 141.150, 141.270, and 141.620 are
29
not sufficient for such purpose.

SCS HB 3000 127
30
5. The compensation herein provided shall be the total
31
compens a tion for a delinquent land tax attorney who is not
32
also a county counselor, and the attorney's assistants and
33
employees.
34
6. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not also the
35
county c ounselor shall make a return quarterly to the county
36
commission of such county of all compensation received by
37
the attorney, and of all amounts owing to the attorney by
38
the collector, and of all salaries and expenses of any
39
assistants and employees, stating the same in detail, and
40
verifying such amounts by affidavit.
41
7. The attorney's fees shall be taxed as costs in the
42
suit an d collected as other costs.
1
141.330. The collector [annually] may appoint one
2
delinquent la n d tax clerk in each office lawfully maintained
3
by the collector in the county, to be compensated as
4
necessary for the performance of the clerk's duties under
5
this chapter.
1
141.360. All suits for the foreclosure of tax liens
2
brought by th e collector shall name the collector only by
3
the title of the collector's office, and all such suits
4
shall be brought directly against the real estate subject to
5
the tax lien or liens to be foreclosed.
1
141.410. 1. A suit for the foreclosure of the tax
2
liens herein p rov i ded for shall be instituted by filing in
3
the appropriate office of the circuit clerk a petition[,
4
which]. Such petition shall contain a caption, a copy of
5
the lis t so furnished to the delinquent land tax attorney by
6
the collector, and a prayer. The petition shall name each
7
person with a legal interest in the parcel of land affected
8
by the suit, as reasonably discoverable to the collector

SCS HB 3000 128
9
from publicly available records. Such petition without
10
further allegation shall be deem e d to be sufficient.
11
2. The caption shall be in the following form:
12
In the Circuit Court of ______ County, Missouri,
13
In the Matter of
14
Foreclosure of Liens for Delinquent Land Taxes
15
By Action in Rem.
16
Collector of Revenue of ______ County, Missouri,
17
Plaintiff
18
-vs.-
19
Parcels of Land Encumbered with Delinquent Tax
20
Liens
21
Defendants
22
3. The petition shall contain at least the following
23
informa t ion:
24
(1) The identity of the petitioner and the name and
25
address o f the collector;
26
(2) The parcel's common street address;
27
(3) A full legal description for the parcel;
28
(4) The tax identification number of the parcel;
29
(5) The period of tax delinquency; and
30
(6) The principal amount of delinquent taxes, together
31
with int e rest, penalties, and fees.
32
4. The petition shall conclude with a prayer that all
33
tax lie n s upon such real estate be foreclosed; that the
34
court determine the amounts and priorities of all tax bills,
35
together with interest, penalties, costs, and attorney's

SCS HB 3000 129
36
fees; that the court order such real estate to be sold by
37
the sheriff at public sale as provided by sections 141.210
38
to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015 and that
39
thereafter a report of such sale be made by the sheriff to
40
the court for further proceedings under sections 141.210 to
41
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
42
5. The delinquent land tax attorney within ten days
43
after t h e filing of any such petition shall forward by
44
United States registered mail to each person or taxing
45
authority having filed a list of delinquent tax bills with
46
the collector as provided by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
47
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 a notice of the time and place
48
of the filing of such petition and of the newspaper in which
49
the notice of publication has been or will be published.
50
6. The petition when so filed shall have the same
51
force a n d effect with respect to each parcel of real estate
52
therein described, as a separate suit instituted to
53
foreclose the tax lien or liens against any one of said
54
parcels of real estate.
1
141.440. 1. Within thirty days after the filing of
2
such petition , th e collector shall [also] cause to be
3
prepared and sent by restricted, registered or certified
4
mail with postage prepaid, [within thirty days after the
5
filing of such petition,] a notice of the petition, to the
6
persons named in the petition as being the last known
7
persons in whose names tax bills affecting the respective
8
parcels of real estate described in said petition were last
9
billed or charged on the books of the collector, or the last
10
known owner of record, if different, and to the addresses of
11
said persons upon said records of the collector. The terms
12
"restricted", "registered" or "certified mail" a s used in
13
this section mean mail which carries on the face thereof in

SCS HB 3000 130
14
a conspicuous place, where it will not be obliterated, the
15
endorsement "DELIVER TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also
16
requires a return receipt or a statement by the postal
17
authorities that the addressee refused to receive and
18
receipt for such mail. If the notice is returned to the
19
collector by the posta l authorities as undeliverable for
20
reasons other than the refusal by the addressee to receive
21
and receipt for the notice as shown by the return receipt,
22
then the collector shall make a search of the records
23
maintained by the county, including those kept by the
24
recorder of deeds, to discern the name and address of any
25
person who, from such records, appears as a successor to the
26
person to whom the original notice was addressed, and to
27
cause another notice to be mailed to such person. The
28
collector shall prepare and file with the circuit clerk at
29
least thirty days before judgment is entered by the court on
30
the petition an affidavit reciting to the court any name,
31
address and serial number of the tract of real estate
32
affected by any such notices of suit that are undeliverable
33
because of an addressee's refusal to receive and receipt for
34
the same, or of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail,
35
or in the event that any name or address does not appear on
36
the records of the collector, then of that fact. The
37
affidavit in addition to the recitals set forth a bove shall
38
also state reason for the nondelivery of such notice.
39
2. The collector shall prepare and send, by first-
40
class m a il, a copy of the petition within thirty days after
41
the filing of such a petition to the occupant of such parcel
42
or property.
1
141.500. 1. After the trial of the issues, the court
2
shall, as pro m ptl y as circumstances permit, render judgment.
3
If the court finds that no tax bill upon the land

SCS HB 3000 131
4
collectible by the collector or the relator was delinquent
5
when the suit was instituted or tried, then the judgment of
6
the court shall be that the cause be dismissed as to the
7
parcels of real estate described in the tax bill[; or,]. If
8
the evidence warrant, the judgment may be for the principal
9
amount of the delinquent tax bills upon the real estate upon
10
which suit was brought, together with interest, penalties,
11
attorney's and appraiser's fees and costs computed as of the
12
date of the judgment. The judgment may recite the amount of
13
each tax bill, the dat e when it began to bear interest, and
14
the rate of such interest, together with the rate and amount
15
of penalties, attorney's and appraiser's fees not to exceed
16
fifteen dollars. It may decree that the lien upon the
17
parcels of real e state described in the tax bill be
18
foreclosed and such real estate sold by the sheriff, and the
19
cause shall be continued for further proceedings, as herein
20
provided.
21
2. The collector shall cause to be prepared and sent
22
by rest r icted, registered or certified mail with postage
23
prepaid, within thirty days after the rendering of such
24
judgment, a brief notice of such judgment and the
25
availability of a written redemption contract pursuant to
26
section 141.530 to the persons named in the judgment as
27
being the last known persons in whose names tax bills
28
affecting the respective parcels of real estate described in
29
such judgment were last billed or charged on the books of
30
the collector, or the last known owner of record, if
31
different, and to the addresses of such persons upon the
32
records of the collector. The terms "restricted",
33
"registered" or "certifie d mail" as used in this section
34
mean mail which carries on the face thereof in a conspicuous
35
place, where it will not be obliterated, the endorsement,

SCS HB 3000 132
36
"DELIVER TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also requires a
37
return receipt or a statement by the postal authorities that
38
the addressee refused to receive and receipt for such mail.
39
If the notice is returned to the collector by the postal
40
authorities as undeliverable for reasons other than the
41
refusal by the addressee to receive and receipt for the
42
notice as shown by the return receipt, then the collector
43
shall make a search of the records maintained by the county,
44
including those kept by the recorder of deeds, to discern
45
the name and address of any person who, from such records,
46
appears as a successor to the person to whom the original
47
notice was addressed, and to cause another notice to be
48
mailed to such person. The collector shall prepare and file
49
with the circuit clerk prior to confirmation hearings an
50
affidavit reciting to the court any name, address and serial
51
number of the tract of real estate affected of any such
52
notices of judgment that are undeliverable because of an
53
addressee's refusal to receive and receipt for the same, or
54
of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail, or in the
55
event that any name or address does not appear on the
56
records of the collector, then of that fact. The affidavit
57
in addition to the recitals set forth above s hall also state
58
reason for the nondelivery of such notice.
59
3. The collector shall prepare and send to the
60
occupan t of such parcel or property, by first-class mail, a
61
copy of the judgment of foreclosure within thirty days after
62
the date of such judgment.
1
141.520. 1. After the judgment of foreclosure has
2
been entered, or, after a motion for a new trial has been
3
overruled, or, if an appeal be taken from such judgment and
4
the judgment has been affirmed, after the sheriff shall have
5
been notified by any party to the suit that such judgment

SCS HB 3000 133
6
has been affirmed on appeal and that the mandate of the
7
appellate court is on file with the circuit clerk, there
8
shall be a waiting period of six months before any
9
advertisement of sheriff's sale shall be published.
10
2. If any such parcel of real estate [be] is not
11
redeeme d , or if no written contract providing for redemption
12
[be] is made within six months after the date of the
13
judgment of foreclosure, if no motion for rehearing [be] is
14
filed, and, if filed, within six months after such motion
15
may have been overruled, or, if an appeal [be] is taken from
16
such judgment and the judgment [be] is affirmed, within six
17
months after the sheriff shall have been notified by any
18
party to the suit that such judgment has been affirmed on
19
appeal and that the mandate of the appellate court is on
20
file with the circuit clerk, the sheriff shall commence to
21
advertise the real estate described in the judgment and
22
shall fix the date of sale within thirty days after the date
23
of the first publication of the notice of sheriff's sale as
24
herein provided, and shall at such sale proceed to sell the
25
real estate.
26
3. Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary
27
notwith s tanding, the owner of any parcel of real property
28
against which a judgment has been rendered shall not have
29
the right to redeem such property from said judgment if at
30
the time of judgment such property is assessed as
31
residential property and the judgment finds the property has
32
been vacant for a period of not less than six months prior
33
to the judgment. After a judgment as provided for in this
34
section becomes f inal, the waiting period shall not apply to
35
such judgment and a sale under execution of the judgment
36
shall be immediately held as provided under the applicable
37
provisions of this chapter.

SCS HB 3000 134
38
4. In partial opt-in counties, no later than one
39
hundred twenty days prior to the sheriff's sale, the
40
collector shall obtain from a licensed title company or
41
attorney a title search that includes all conveyances,
42
liens, and charges against the real estate involved in the
43
suit for any parcel of real estate against which the
44
collector has obtained a judgment under section 141.500 and
45
for which it has been decreed that the lien upon the parcel
46
of real estate described in the tax bill be foreclosed and
47
such real estate sold by the sheriff. The charge of such
48
title search may be recovered from th e proceeds of the sale
49
under section 141.580.
50
5. After obtaining or conducting a title search, the
51
collect o r shall initiate a search of the following records
52
to identify and locate interested parties and addresses
53
reasonably calculated to apprise interested parties of the
54
suit:
55
(1) Land title records in the office of the county
56
recorder of deeds;
57
(2) Tax records in the office of the local treasurer;
58
(3) Tax records in the office of the local assessor;
59
(4) A search of court records in Missouri CaseNet; and
60
(5) For a business entity, records filed with the
61
secretar y of state.
62
The collector may also incur reasonable costs for web-based
63
investigatory searches to supplement the search for
64
interested parties and addresses. The reasonable cost of
65
locating interested parties and a d dresses for notice may be
66
recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
67
141.580.

SCS HB 3000 135
68
6. No later than thirty days prior to the sheriff's
69
sale, t h e collector shall send notice of the sale to all
70
interested parties at the address most likely to apprise
71
interested parties of the sale. The notice shall provide
72
the date, time, and place of th e sale and shall also state
73
that the parcel may be redeemed prior to the sale as
74
specified in sections 141.420 and 141.530. The notice
75
required by this subsection shall be maile d first class,
76
postage prepaid. The cost of notice under this subsection
77
may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
78
141.580.
79
7. No later than twenty days prior to the sheriff's
80
sale, t h e sheriff shall enter upon the parcel subject to
81
foreclosure of these tax liens and post a written
82
informational notice in a conspicuous location, attached to
83
a structure, and intended to be visible by the nearest
84
public right-of-way. This notice shall describe the parcel
85
and advise that it i s the subject of delinquent land tax
86
collection proceedings brought under sections 141.210 to
87
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015 and that it may be
88
sold for the payment of delinquent taxes at a sale to be
89
held at a certain time, date, and place and shall also
90
contain the tax identification number and the phone number
91
and address of the collector as well as a prohibition
92
against removal unless the parcel has been redeemed. The
93
notice shall be not less than eight inches by ten inc hes and
94
shall be laminated or otherwise sufficiently weatherproof to
95
withstand normal exposure to rain, snow, and other
96
conditions. The sheriff shall document, by time-stamped
97
photograph, compliance with this section, make such
98
documentation generally available upon request, and provide
99
verification by affidavit of compliance with this section.

SCS HB 3000 136
100
The cost of notice under this subsection may be recovered
101
from the proceeds of the sale under section 141.580.
102
8. In addition to the other notice requirements of
103
this se c tion, no later than twenty days prior to the
104
sheriff's sale, the sheriff shall attempt in-person notice
105
that shall describe the parcel and advise that it is the
106
subject of delinquent land tax collection proceedings
107
brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
108
141.980 to 141.1015; that shall state that it may be sold
109
for the payment of delinquent taxes at a sale to be held at
110
a certain time, date, and place; and that shall also contain
111
the tax identification number and the phone number and
112
address of the collector. In-person notice may be provided
113
to any person found at th e parcel. The sheriff shall note
114
the date and time of attempted noti ce and the name,
115
description, or other identifying information regarding the
116
person to whom notice was attempted. The sheriff shall
117
document compliance with this sectio n , make such
118
documentation generally available upon request, and provide
119
verification by affidavit of compliance with this section.
120
The cost of notice under this subsection may be recovered
121
from the proceeds of the sale under section 141.580.
1
141.535. 1. If a parcel is the subject of an action
2
filed under s e cti o ns 447.620 to 447.640, the court shall
3
stay the sale of any tax parcel to be sold under execution
4
of a tax foreclosure judgment obtained under this chapter,
5
provided that the party which has brought such an action has
6
paid into the circuit court the principal amount of all
7
[land] delinquent taxes then due and owing under the tax
8
foreclosure judgment, exclusive of penalties, interest,
9
attorney fees, and court costs, prior to the date of any
10
proposed sale under execution. The party bringing such

SCS HB 3000 137
11
action shall provide written notice of the filing of the
12
action to the court administrator and file with the circuit
13
court in which the action is pending a certificate that such
14
notice has been provided to the court administrator. If the
15
party that brought the action under sections 447.620 to
16
447.640 dismisses its action prior to gaining temporary
17
possession of the property, it shall recover any amounts
18
paid into the circuit court under this subsection.
19
2. In any order granting a sheriff's deed under
20
section 447.625 or a judicial deed under section 447.640,
21
the court shall also order the permanent extinguishment of
22
liability against the grantee and the grantee's successors
23
in interest for penalties, interest, attorney fees, and
24
court costs arising from actions to collect delinquent land
25
taxes due on the subject property. The funds paid into the
26
court for land taxes under subsecti on 1 of this section
27
shall then be paid to the county collector.
28
3. If an owner of such a property moves the court for
29
restora t ion of possession of the subject property under
30
section 447.638, the owner shall pay into the circuit court
31
all land tax amounts currently due and owing on the
32
property, including all statutory penalties, interest,
33
attorney fees, and court costs retroactive to the date of
34
accrual, and in the event that an owner of the tax parcel
35
regains possession under section 447.638, funds deposited by
36
the owner under this subsection shall be paid to the county
37
collector, and funds paid into the court by a party under
38
subsection 1 of this section shall be paid out in full to
39
the payer.
1
141.540. 1. In any county at a certain front door of
2
whose courtho u se s ales of real estate are customarily made
3
by the sheriff under execution, the sheriff shall advertise

SCS HB 3000 138
4
for sale and sell the respective parcels of real estate
5
ordered sold by the sheriff pursuant to any judgment of
6
foreclosure by any court pursuant to sections 141.210 to
7
141.810 and 141.980 to 141.1015 at any of such courthouses[,
8
but]. The sale of such parcels of real estate shall be held
9
at th e same front door as sales of real estate are
10
customarily made by the sheriff under execution.
11
2. Such advertisements may include more than one
12
parcel o f real estate, and shall be in substantially the
13
following form:
14
NOTICE OF SHERIFF'S
15
SALE UNDER JUDGMENT OF
16
FORECLOSURE OF LIENS FOR
17
DELINQUENT LAND TAXES
18
No. ______
19
In the Circuit Court of ______ County, Missouri.
20
In the Matter of Foreclosure of Liens for Delinquent
21
Land Taxes
22
Collector of Revenue of ______ County, Missouri,
23
Plaintiff,
24
vs.
25
Parcels of Land encumbered with Delinquent Tax Liens,
26
Defendants.
27
WHEREAS, judgment has been rendered against parcels
28
of real estate for taxes, interest, penalties,
29
attorney's fees and costs with the serial numbers of
30
each parcel of real estate, the description thereof,
31
the name of the person appearing in the petition in
32
the suit, and the total amount of the judgment

SCS HB 3000 139
33
against each such parcel for taxes, interest,
34
penalties, attorney's fees and costs, all as set out
35
in said judgment and described in each case,
36
respectively, as follows: (Here set out the
37
respective serial numbers, descriptions, names and
38
total amounts of each judgment, next above referred
39
to.) and,
40
WHEREAS, such judgment orders such real estate sold
41
by the undersigned sheriff, to satisfy the total
42
amount of such judgment, including interest,
43
penalties, attorney's fees and costs,
44
NOW, THEREFORE,
45
Public Notice is hereby given that I ______, Sheriff
46
of ______ County, Missouri, will sell such real
47
estate, parcel by parcel, at public auction, to the
48
highest bidder, for cash, between the hours of nine
49
o'clock A.M. and five o'clock P.M., at the ______
50
front door of the ______ County Courthouse in ______,
51
Missouri, on ______, the ______ day of ______,
52
20______, and continuing from day to day thereafter,
53
to satisfy the judgment as to each respective parcel
54
of real estate sold. If no acceptable bids are
55
received as to any parcel of real estate, said parcel
56
shall be sold to the Land Trust of ______ (insert
57
name of County), Missouri or Land Bank of the City of
58
______ (insert name of municipality), Missouri.
59
Any bid received shall be subject to confirmation by
60
the court.
61
__________________
62
Sheriff of _____ County,
63
Missouri
64
__________________
65
Delinquent Land Tax
66
Attorney

SCS HB 3000 140
67
Address: ______
68
First Publication ______, 20______
69
3. Such advertisement shall be published four times,
70
once a w eek, upon the same day of each week during
71
successive weeks prior to the date of such sale, in a daily
72
newspaper of general circulation regularly published in the
73
county, qualified according to law for the publication of
74
public notices and advertisements.
1
141.550. 1. The sale shall be conducted, the
2
sheriff's ret u rn t hereof made, and the sheriff's deed
3
pursuant to the sale executed, all as provided in the case
4
of sales of real estate taken under execution, except as
5
otherwise provided in sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
6
sections 141.980 to 141.1015, and provided that such sale
7
need not occur during the term of court or while the court
8
is in session.
9
2. The following provisions shall apply to any sale
10
pursuan t to this section:
11
(1) The sale shall be held on the day for which it is
12
advertis e d, between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. and five
13
o'clock p.m. and continued day to day thereafter to satisfy
14
the judgment as to each respective parcel of real estate
15
sold. For partial opt-in counties, the sale shall be held
16
on th e fourth Monday in August of each year between the
17
hours of nine o'clock a.m. and five o'clock p.m. and
18
continued day to day thereafter to satisfy the judgment as
19
to each respective parcel of real estate sold;
20
(2) The sale shall be conducted publicly, by auction,
21
for read y money. The parcel shall be sold to the highest
22
bidder, provided that the highest bid is equal to or greater

SCS HB 3000 141
23
than the full amount of all tax bills due and owing on the
24
parcel, which may differ from the judgment amount; plus
25
interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs; and a
26
nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee. Such bidder
27
fee shall be paid to the land trust or land bank agency for
28
the municipality or county in which the parcel is situated.
29
The bid amount shall not include any amounts for debts owed
30
to any sewer district then due thereon;
31
(3) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of
32
the sale unless such person has, no later than ten days
33
before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of
34
the official charged by law with conducting the sale that he
35
or she is not the owner of any parcel of real estate in the
36
county which is affected by a tax bill which has been
37
delinquent for more than six months. A prospective bidder
38
may make such a demonstration by pre s enting statements from
39
the appropriate collection officials of the county. The
40
official charged with conducting the sale may requi r e
41
prospective bidders to submit an affidavit attesting to the
42
requirements of this subdivision and is expressly authorized
43
to permanently preclude any prospective bidder from
44
participating in the sale for failure to comply with the
45
provisions of this subdivision; and
46
(4) No foreign or domestic corporation or limited
47
liabilit y company that has failed to appoint or maintain a
48
registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible
49
to bid at the time of the sale. No foreign corporate entity
50
shall be eligible to bid at the time of the sale unless it
51
has a certificate of authority to transact business in
52
Missouri under section 351.572. The official charged with
53
conducting the sale may require prospective bidders to
54
submit an affidavit attesting to the requirements of this

SCS HB 3000 142
55
subdivision and is expressly authorized to permanently
56
preclude any prospective bidder from participating in the
57
sale for failure to comply with the provisions of this
58
subdivision.
59
3. The following provisions shall apply to any sale
60
under t h is section of property located within any
61
municipality contained wholly or partially within a county
62
with a population of over six hundred thousand inhabitants
63
and fewer than nine hundred thousand inhabitants:
64
(1) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of
65
the sale unless such person has, no later than ten days
66
before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of
67
the official charged by law with conducting the sale that
68
the person is not the owner of any parcel of real property
69
with two or more violations of the municipality's building
70
or housing codes. A prospective bidder may make such a
71
demonstration by p resenting statements from the appropriate
72
code enforcement officials of the municipality; and
73
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
74
of this s ubsection, any taxing authority or land bank agency
75
shall be eligible to bid at the sale without making the
76
demonstration described in subdivision (1) of this
77
subsection.
78
4. Such sale shall convey the whole interest of every
79
person h aving or claiming any right, title or interest in or
80
lien upon such real estate, whether such person has answered
81
or not, subject to rights-of-way thereon of public utilities
82
upon which tax has been otherwise paid, and subject to the
83
lien thereon, if any, of the United States of America.
84
5. The collector shall advance the sums necessary to
85
pay for the publication of all advertisements required by
86
sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015

SCS HB 3000 143
87
and shall be allowed credit therefor in the collector's
88
accounts with the county. The collector shall give credit
89
in such accounts for all s uch advances recovered by the
90
collector. Such expenses of publication shall be
91
apportione d pro rata among and taxed as costs against the
92
respective parcels of real estate described in the judgment;
93
provided, however, that none of the costs herein enumerated,
94
including the costs of publication, shall constitute any
95
lien upon the real estate after such sale.
1
141.560. 1. If, when the sheriff offers the
2
respective pa r cel s of real estate for sale, there [be] are
3
no bidders for any parcel, or there [be] is insufficient
4
time or opportunity to sell all of the parcels of real
5
estate so advertised, the sheriff shall adjourn such sale
6
from day to day at the same place and commencing at the same
7
hour as when first offered and shall announce that such real
8
estate will be offered or reoffered for sale at such time
9
and place.
10
2. With respect to any parcel of real estate not
11
located wholly within a county or municipality that has
12
established a land bank agency under section 140.981 or
13
141.980, in the event no bid equal to the full amount of all
14
tax bills due and owing on the parcel, which may differ
15
from the j udgment amount; plus interest; penalties;
16
attorney's fees and costs; and a nonreimbursable, two-
17
hundred-dollar bidder fee that shall be received at such
18
sale after any parcel of real estate has been offered for
19
sale on three different days, which need not be successive,
20
the land trust shall be deemed to have bid the full amount
21
of all tax bills included in the judgment, interest,
22
penalties, attorney's fees and costs then due, and if no
23
other bid be then received by the sheriff in excess of the

SCS HB 3000 144
24
bid of the land trust, and the sheriff shall so announce at
25
the sale, then the bid of the land trust shall be announced
26
as accepted. The sheriff shall report any such bid or bids
27
so made by t h e land trust in the same way as the sheriff's
28
report of other bids is made. Upon confirmation by the
29
court of such bid at such sal e by such land trust, the
30
collector shall mark the tax bills so bid by the land trust
31
as "cancelled by sale to the land trust" and shall take
32
credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including
33
principal amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and
34
costs, on the collector's books and in the collector's
35
statements with any other taxing authorities.
36
3. With respect to any parcel of real estate located
37
wholly w ithin a county or municipality that has established
38
a land bank agency under section 140.981 or 141.980, in the
39
event no bid equal to the full amount of all tax bills due
40
and owing on the parcel, which may differ from the judgment
41
amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs;
42
and a nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee that
43
shall be received at such sale after such parcel of real
44
estate has been offered for sale on three different days,
45
which need not be successive, the land bank agency
46
established under section 140.981 or 141.980 shall be deemed
47
to have bid the full amount of all tax bills included in the
48
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
49
then due, and the sheriff shall so announce at the sale,
50
then the bid of the land bank agency shall be announced as
51
accepted. The sheriff shall report any such bid or bids so
52
made by s u ch land bank agency in the same way as the
53
sheriff's report of other bids is made. Upon confirmation
54
by the court of such bid at such sale by such land bank
55
agency, the collector shall mark the tax bills so bid by

SCS HB 3000 145
56
such land bank agency as "cancelled by sale to the land
57
bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax
58
bills, including principal amount, interest, penalties,
59
attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in
60
the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
1
141.570. The title to any real estate which shall vest
2
in any purcha s er[,] upon confirmation of such sale by the
3
court, or in any land bank agency or land trust, shall be an
4
absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way
5
thereon of public utilities on which tax has been otherwise
6
paid, and subject to any lien thereon of the United States
7
of America, if any, and all persons and interested parties,
8
including the state of Missouri, any taxing authority or tax
9
district, as defined herein, judgment creditors,
10
lienholders, infants, incapacitated and disabled persons as
11
defined in chapter 475, and nonresidents who may have had
12
any right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption
13
in or to, or lien upon, such lands, shall be barred and
14
forever foreclosed of all such right, title, interest,
15
claim, lien or equity of redemption, and the court shall
16
order immediate possession of such real estate be given to
17
such purchaser; provided, however, that such title shall
18
also be subject to the liens of any tax bills which may have
19
attached after the sheriff's sale, but if such parcel of
20
real estate is deemed sold to the land trust pursuant to
21
subsection 2 of section 141.560, or deemed sold to a land
22
bank agency pursuant to subsection 3 of section 141.560, or
23
sold to a land bank agency pursuant to subdivision (2) of
24
subsection 2 of section 141.550, the title thereto shall be
25
free of any such liens to the extent of the interest of any
26
taxing authority in such real estate; provided further, that
27
the lien of special tax bills shall attach to the proceeds

SCS HB 3000 146
28
of the sheriff's sale, if any, or shall otherwise be forever
29
barred and foreclosed.
1
141.580. 1. Within six months after the sheriff sells
2
any parcel of rea l estate, the court shall, upon its own
3
motion or upon motion of any interested party, set the cause
4
[down] for hearing to confirm or set aside the foreclosure
5
sale thereof, even though such parcels are not all of the
6
parcels of real estate described in the notice of sheriff's
7
foreclosure sale. Notice of the hearing, or of the court
8
moving to confirm the foreclosure sale, shall be sent by any
9
interested party to each person who was sent notice of the
10
sale and to any interested parties as required by prevailing
11
notions of due process. At the time of such hearing, the
12
sheriff shall make repo r t of the sale, and the court shall
13
hear evidence of the value of the property offered on behalf
14
of any interested party to the suit, and shall forthwith
15
determine whether an adequate consideration has been paid
16
for each such parcel. The court's judgment shall include a
17
specific finding that adequate notice was provided to all
18
interested parties under prevailing notions of due process
19
and sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to
20
141.1015, reciting the notice efforts of the collector,
21
sheriff, and tax sale purchaser. Nothing in this section
22
shall be interpreted to preclude a successful tax sale
23
purchaser from asserting a claim to quiet title to the bid-
24
upon parcel under section 527.150.
25
2. For this purpose the court shall have power to
26
summon a ny city or county official or any private person to
27
testify as to the reasonable value of the property, and if
28
the court finds that adequate consideration has been paid,
29
the court shall confirm the sale and order the sheriff to
30
issue a deed to the purchaser. If the court finds that the

SCS HB 3000 147
31
consideration paid is inadequate, the court shall confirm
32
the sale if the purchaser increases the purchaser's bid to
33
such amount as the court deems to be adequate and makes such
34
additional payment, or if all tax bills included in the
35
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
36
then due thereon are not paid in full by one or more
37
interested parties to the suit. If the court finds that the
38
consideration is inadequate, bu t the purchaser declines to
39
increase the purchaser's bid to such amount as the court
40
deems adequate and make such additional payment, then the
41
sale shall be disapproved if all tax bills included in the
42
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
43
then due thereon are paid in full by one or more interested
44
parties to the suit, the lien of the judgment continued, and
45
such parcel of real estate shall be again advertised and
46
offered for sale by the sheriff to the highest bidder at
47
public auction for cash at any subsequent sheriff's
48
foreclosure sale. Unless the court requires evidence of the
49
value of the prope rty conveyed to land trust or a land bank
50
agency, none shall be required, and the amount bid by the
51
land trust or such land bank agency shall be deemed adequate
52
consideration.
53
3. If the sale is confirmed, the court shall order the
54
proceed s [of] from the sale applied in the following order:
55
(1) To the payment of the costs of the publication of
56
the noti c e of foreclosure and of the sheriff's foreclosure
57
sale;
58
(2) To the payment of all of the collector's and
59
sheriff' s costs including appraiser's fee and attorney's
60
fees;
61
(3) To the payment of all tax bills adjudged to be due
62
in the o r der of their priority, including principal,

SCS HB 3000 148
63
interest and penalties thereon, except in the event of a
64
sale to any land bank agency, for which this subdivision
65
shall not apply.
66
If, after such payment, there is any sum remaining of the
67
proceeds of the sheriff's foreclosure sale, the court shall
68
thereupon try and determine the other issues in the suit in
69
accordance with section 141.480. If any answering parties
70
have specially appealed as provi d ed in section 141.570, the
71
court shall retain the custody of such funds pending
72
disposition of such appeal, and upon disposition of such
73
appeal shall make such distribution. If there are not
74
sufficient proceeds of the sale to p a y all claims in any
75
class described, the court shall order the same to be paid
76
pro rata in accordance with the priorities.
77
4. If there are any funds remaining of the proceeds
78
after t h e sheriff's sale and after the distribution of such
79
funds as herein set out and no person entitled to any such
80
funds, whether or not a party to the suit, shall, within two
81
years after such sale, appear and claim the funds, the funds
82
shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authorities,
83
except in partial opt-in counties, where the funds shall be
84
distributed to the school fund for the county.
85
5. Any county operating under the provisions of
86
section s 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015
87
may elect to allocate a portion of its share of the proceeds
88
toward a fund for the purpose of defending against claims
89
challenging the sufficiency of notice provisions under this
90
section.
91
6. Any interested party, other than the sheriff's sale
92
purchas e r, who moves the court to set aside a sheriff's sale
93
after the issuance of a sheriff's deed made under the

SCS HB 3000 149
94
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
95
141.980 to 141.1015 shall be required to pay into the court
96
the redemption amount otherwise necessary under sections
97
141.420 and 141.530 prior to the court hearing any such
98
motion to set aside.
1
141.610. Each court administrator's or sheriff's deed
2
given pursuan t to the provisions of the land tax collection
3
law shall be prima facie evidence that the suit and all
4
proceedings therein and all proceedings prior thereto [from
5
and], including assessment of the lands affected thereby and
6
all notices required by law were regular and in accordance
7
with all provisions of the law relating thereto. The court
8
administrator or sheriff shall record its deed a n d shall
9
collect said recording fee at the time of sale.
1
141.620. 1. In addition to all amounts due on any tax
2
bill, includi n g p r incipal, interest, penalties, attorney's
3
fees, and costs, as now fixed by law, there shall be imposed
4
and charged as a part of the costs on each such tax bill a
5
suit penalty of five percent of the principal amount of the
6
tax bill to be due to the collector upon the filing of the
7
petition with the circuit clerk.
8
2. The collector shall set up a separate fund in the
9
collect o r's accounts to which the collector shall credit
10
such five percent suit penalties when paid, together with
11
all other penalties and costs recovered under this action,
12
and shall retain such portion thereof as may be needed for
13
the purpose of paying the expenses and costs required to be
14
advanced under sections 141.210 to 141.810, including
15
compensation to the delinquent land tax attorney, the
16
attorney's assistants, and stenographic and clerical help,
17
and funds for the costs of publication, notices, for court
18
costs, sheriff's expenses and other costs hereunder, and

SCS HB 3000 150
19
shall transfer the remainder of such funds annually, on
20
January first of each year, to the land trust for the use
21
and expenses of the land trust. Where n o land trust exists,
22
the collector shall retain the r emainder of such funds.
1
141.680. 1. Except for partial opt-in counties, the
2
remedies and p roc e dures set forth in sections 141.210 to
3
141.810 shall be the exclusive remedies and procedures
4
available for the collection of delinquent and back land
5
taxes in a county [electing] that elects to come under or
6
[which] that has come under their authority. Sections
7
141.210 to 141.810 shall not be affected nor infringed upon
8
by any other laws or parts of law in conflict herewith.
9
2. Any taxing authority or owner of any tax bill is
10
hereby p rohibited from advertising for sale or selling any
11
parcel of real estate for the collection of delinquent land
12
taxes due thereon, except after judgment of a court having
13
jurisdiction ordering such advertising or sale, when such
14
parcel is at such time included in any petition filed
15
pursuant to the provisions of this law.
16
3. At the option of the taxing authority or tax bill
17
owner, a ll claims for land taxes against any parcel of real
18
estate, which has been included in any petition filed under
19
this law, where such taxes have become due and payable after
20
any tax list or petition thereon has been filed, may be
21
asserted by amended petition or by answer filed before
22
judgment, and, if allowed by the court, shall be included in
23
the judgment against such parcel of real estate.
1
141.700. In all counties electing to operate under
2
sections 141. 2 10 to 141.810 prior to January 1, 2025, there
3
is hereby created a commission for the management, sale, and
4
other disposition of tax delinquent lands, which commission
5
shall be known as "The Land Trust of ______ County,

SCS HB 3000 151
6
Missouri", and the members thereof shall be known as land
7
trustees. Such land trust shall have and exercise all the
8
powers th a t are conferred by sections 141.210 to 141.810
9
necessary and incidental to the effective management, sale
10
or other disposition of real estate acquired under and by
11
virtue of the foreclosure of the lien for delinquent real
12
estate taxes, as provided in said sections, and in the
13
exercise of such powers, the land trust shall be deemed to
14
be a public corporation acting in a governmental capacity.
15
Where a county has elected to establish a land bank agency
16
under subsection 1 of section 140.981, no such land trust
17
shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.810.
1
141.819. 1. In all partial opt-in counties, prior to
2
a confirmatio n by a court of a deemed bid under subsection 2
3
of section 141.560, a land trust shall be created for the
4
management, sale, and other disposition of tax delinquent
5
lands, which shall be known as "The Land Trust of ______
6
County, Missouri", and the board of which shall be known as
7
land trustees. The county commission of such county shall
8
appoint by res o lution or order one or three land trustees.
9
The first appointed land trustee shall serve for a term of
10
two years and the remaining land trustees shall serve for
11
terms of three years respectively, as applicable.
12
Thereafter, land trustees shall be appointed by th e county
13
commission for a term of office of two years, except that
14
all vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term.
15
2. If a county elected to establish a land bank agency
16
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, no such land trust
17
shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.819.
18
3. Such land trust, by majority vote of the land
19
trustee s , shall have the power and duty to sell, exchange,
20
or otherwise dispose of real estate, provided, however, that

SCS HB 3000 152
21
any such sale, exchange, or disposal shall be for
22
consideration equal to or in excess of two-thirds of the
23
appraised value of such real estate so sold or conveyed, and
24
if such consideration is less than two-thirds of the
25
appraised value of such real estate, the land trust shall
26
first procure a majority vote of the county commission.
27
4. (1) The land trust shall set up accounts relating
28
to the o pera t ion and management of the land trust.
29
(2) When any parcel of real estate is sold or
30
otherwis e disposed of by the land trust, the proceeds
31
therefrom shall be applied and distributed in the following
32
order:
33
(a) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
34
(b) To the costs of the care, improvement, operation,
35
acquisit i on, demolition, management, and administration of
36
parcels of real estate owned by the land trust; and
37
(c) To the county's general fund.
38
5. N o land trustee shall receive any compensation,
39
emolume n t, or other profit directly or indirectly from the
40
rental, management, acquisition, sale, demolition, repair,
41
rehabilitation, use, operation, ownership, or disposition of
42
any lands held by such land trust.
1
141.980. 1. (1) Sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall
2
be known [and may be c i ted] as the "Chapter 141 Municipal
3
Land Bank Act".
4
(2) Any municipality located wholly or partially
5
within a county electing to operate wholly under the
6
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 may establish a
7
land bank agency for the management, sale, transfer, and
8
other disposition of interests in real estate owned by such
9
land bank agency. Any such land bank agency created shall
10
be created to fos t er the public purpose of returning land,

SCS HB 3000 153
11
including land that is in a nonrevenue-generating, nontax-
12
producing status to use in private ownership or for public
13
use. Such land bank agency shall be established by
14
ordi n ance or resolution as applicable. Such land bank
15
agency shall not own any interest in r e al estate that is
16
located wholly or partially outside such establishing
17
municipality. No municipality in a partial opt-in county is
18
eligible to e s tablish a land bank agency under this section.
19
2. The beneficiaries of the land bank agency shall be
20
the tax i ng authorities that held or owned tax bills against
21
the respective parcels of real estate acquired by such land
22
bank agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of
23
section 141.560, by deed from a land trust under subsection
24
1 of section 141.984, or pursuant to a sale under
25
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 141.550 included
26
in the judgment of the court, and the beneficiaries'
27
respective interests in each parcel of real estate shall be
28
to the extent and in the proportion and according to the
29
priorities determined by the court on the basis that the
30
principal amount of the beneficiaries' respective tax bills
31
bore to the total principal amount of all of the tax bills
32
described in the judgment.
33
3. Each land bank agency created pursuant to this
34
chapter shall be a public body corporate and politic, and
35
shall have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated
36
and dissolved in accordance with the provisions of section
37
141.1012.
1
141.984. 1. Within one year of the effective date of
2
the ordinance or r esolution passed establishing a land bank
3
agency under this chapter, title to any real property held
4
by a land trust created pursuant to section 141.700 that is
5
located wholly within the municipality that created the land

SCS HB 3000 154
6
bank agency shall be transferred by deed to such land bank
7
agency.
8
2. The income of a land bank agency shall be exempt
9
from al l taxation by the state and by any of its political
10
subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real estate, a
11
land bank age n cy shall immediately notify the county
12
assessor and the collector of such ownership, and such real
13
estate shall be exempt from all taxation during the land
14
bank agency's ownership thereof, in the same manner and to
15
the same extent as any other publicly owned real estate, and
16
upon the sale or other disposition of any real estate held
17
by it, such land bank agency shall immediately notify the
18
county assessor and the collector of such change of
19
ownership; provided however, that such tax exemption for
20
improved and occupied real property held by such land bank
21
agency as lessor pursuant to a ground lease shall terminate
22
upon the first such occupancy, and such land bank agency
23
shall immediately notify the county assessor and the
24
collector of such occupancy.
25
3. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1
26
of sect i on 141.980, a land bank agency may acquire real
27
property or interests in property by gift, devise, transfer,
28
exchange, foreclosure, purchase, or [pursuant to sections
29
141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819. A land bank agency
30
may only purchase real property for th e purpose of adding to
31
a parcel already owned by the land bank agency] otherwise on
32
terms and conditions and in a manner the land bank agency
33
considers proper.
34
4. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1
35
of sect i on 141.980, a land bank agency may acquire property
36
by purchase contracts, installment sales contracts, and land
37
contacts, and may accept transfers from political

SCS HB 3000 155
38
subdivisions upon such terms and conditions as agreed to by
39
the land bank agency and the political subdivision. Subject
40
to the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of sect i on
41
141.980, a land bank agency may bid on any parcel of real
42
estate offered for sale at a sheriff's foreclosure sale held
43
in accordance with section 141.550. Notwithstanding any
44
other law to the contrary, but subj e ct to the limitation set
45
forth in subsection 1 of section 141.980, any political
46
subdivision may transfer to the land bank agency real
47
property and interests in real property of the political
48
subdivision on such terms and conditions and according to
49
such procedures as determined by the political subdivision.
50
5. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real
51
propert y in accordance with the laws and ordinances of the
52
jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
53
6. Upon confirmation under section 141.580 of a
54
sheriff ' s foreclosure sale of a parcel of real estate to a
55
land bank agency under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
56
section 141.550, said land bank agency shall pay the amount
57
of the land bank agency's bid that exceeds the amount of all
58
tax bills included in the judgment, interest, penalties,
59
attorney's fees and costs then due thereon. Such excess
60
shall be applied and distributed in accorda n ce with
61
subsections 3 and 4 of section 141.580, exclusive of
62
subdivision (3) of subsection 3 thereof. Upon such
63
confirmation by the court, the collector shall mark the tax
64
bills included in the judgment as "cancelled by sale to the
65
land bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such
66
tax bills, including principal amount, interest, penalties,
67
attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in
68
the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.

SCS HB 3000 156
1
141.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized
2
to file an act i on t o quiet title pursuant to section 527.150
3
as to any real property in which the land bank agency has an
4
interest. For purposes of any and all such actions, the
5
land bank agency shall be deemed to be the holder of
6
sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory
7
rights, so as to qualify the land bank agency as adequate
8
petitioner in such action.
9
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title the
10
land ba n k agency shall conduct an examination of title to
11
determine the identity of any and all persons and entities
12
possessing a claim or interest in or to the real property.
13
Service of the petition to quiet title shall be provided to
14
all such interested parties by the following methods:
15
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and
16
address a s reasonably ascertainable by an inspection of
17
public records;
18
(2) In the case of occupied real property by first
19
class ma i l, addressed to "Occupant";
20
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real
21
property ;
22
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general
23
circulat i on in the municipality in which the property is
24
located; and
25
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as
26
may be r e quired by prevailing notions of due process.
27
3. As part of the petition to quiet title the land
28
bank ag e ncy shall file an affidavit identifying all parties
29
potentially having an interest in the real property, and the
30
form of notice provided.
31
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition
32
within n inety days following filing of the petition, and as

SCS HB 3000 157
33
to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an
34
interested party the court shall issue its final judgment
35
within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the petition.
36
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a
37
single p etition to quiet title one or more parcels of real
38
property.
1
141.1020. Notwithstanding any provision of sections
2
141.980 to 141 . 1020 to the contrary, a land bank agency may
3
rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for
4
community, noncommercial, and agricultural uses.
1
182.711. 1. The fiscal year for each urban public
2
library distr i ct s hall be July first to June thirtieth,
3
unless otherwise set by the board of trustees, and each year
4
the librarian shall submit to the board of trustees a budget
5
for the forthcoming fiscal year. The board of trustees
6
shall approve the budget after m a king any changes therein
7
that it deems necessary. The budget shall be approved on or
8
before [June thirtieth] t he last day of the fiscal year
9
preceding the fiscal year for which the budget was
10
prepared. The board of trustees on its own motion or at the
11
request o f the librarian, from time to time, may amend or
12
modify the approved budget. A copy of the approved budget
13
shall be filed with the sta t e auditor.
14
2. The treasurer of the board of trustees of an urban
15
public l ibrary district shall receive and be the custodian
16
of all money belonging to the district from whatever source
17
derived. All funds of the urban public library district
18
derived f rom local taxation to be used for normal operations
19
of the district shall be kept in a library operating fund.
20
All funds belonging to the district which are to be used fo r
21
building purposes shall be kept in a library building fund;
22
all funds derived from state aid or federal grants, other

SCS HB 3000 158
23
than land, building and furnishing grants, shall be kept in
24
the library operating fund; and the board of trustees may
25
establish any other funds that it deems necessary. The
26
treasurer shall deposit all moneys belonging to th e urban
27
public library district in the depositaries that are
28
selected by the board of trustees. The treasurer shall also
29
be the custodian of all bonds or o t her securities belonging
30
to the urban public library district.
31
3. Urban public library district moneys shall be
32
disburs e d by the treasurer by appropriate instrument of
33
payment only upon due authorization of the board of trustees
34
and duly certified for payment by the president. The
35
certification shall specify the amount to be pai d , to whom
36
payment is to be made and the purpose for which payment is
37
being made. The board of trustees by resolution may direct
38
that the sig nature of the president or treasurer be a
39
facsimile signature in the manner provided by sections
40
105.272 to 105.278.
41
4. No authorization or certification shall be made,
42
and no i nstrument of payment shall be issued for the payment
43
of any urban public library district indebtedness unless
44
there is sufficient money in the treasury and the proper
45
fund for the payment of the indebtedness and the
46
indebtedness is in the proper form.
47
5. The treasurer of the board of trustees shall submit
48
to the b oard of trustees, at each regularly scheduled
49
meeting thereof, an accounting reflecting receipt and
50
disbursement of funds belonging to the urban public library
51
district.
1
182.802. 1. (1) Any public library district located
2
in any of the fol l owin g counties may impose a tax as
3
provided in this section:

SCS HB 3000 159
4
(a) At least partially within any county of the third
5
classifi c ation without a township form of government and
6
with more than forty thousand eight hundred but fewer than
7
forty thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
8
(b) Any county of the third classification without a
9
township form of government and with more than thirteen
10
thousand five hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand six
11
hundred inhabitants;
12
(c) Any county of the third classification without a
13
township form of government and with more than thirteen
14
thousand two hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand three
15
hundred inhabitants;
16
(d) Any county of the third classification with a
17
township form of government and with more than twenty-nine
18
thousand seven hundred but fewer than twenty-nine thousand
19
eight hundred inhabitants;
20
(e) Any county of the second classification with more
21
than nin e teen thousand seven hundred but fewer than nineteen
22
thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
23
(f) Any county of the third classification with a
24
township form of government and with more than thirty-three
25
thousand one hundred but fewer than thirty-three thousand
26
two hundred inhabitants;
27
(g) Any county of the third classification without a
28
township form of government and with more than eighteen
29
thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with
30
a city of the third classification with more than six
31
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants as the
32
county seat;
33
(h) Any county of the fourth classification with more
34
than twe n ty thousand but fewer than thirty thousand
35
inhabitants; [or]

SCS HB 3000 160
36
(i) Any county of the third classification with more
37
than thi r teen thousand nine hundred but fewer than fourteen
38
thousand inhabitants;
39
(j) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but
40
fewer th a n one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with
41
a county seat with more than twelve thousand but fewer than
42
fourteen thousand inhabitants;
43
(k) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
44
fewer th a n forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
45
with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten thousand
46
inhabitants;
47
(l) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
48
fewer th a n fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
49
with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer
50
than three thousand inhabitants;
51
(m) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
52
fewer th a n twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
53
county seat with more than one thousand four hundred but
54
fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
55
(n) Any county with more than eighty thousand but
56
fewer th a n one hundred thousand inhabitants and with a
57
county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer than
58
eighty thousand inhabitants;
59
(o) Any county with more than eight thousand nine
60
hundred b ut fewer than nine thousand nine hundred
61
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one
62
thousand but fewer than two thousand inhabitants;
63
(p) Any county with more than twelve thousand five
64
hundred b ut fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
65
with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
66
than five thousand inhabitants;

SCS HB 3000 161
67
(q) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
68
than eig h t thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a
69
county seat with more than three hundred but fewer than six
70
hundred inhabitants;
71
(r) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
72
fewer th a n twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
73
county seat with more than one hundred but fewer than five
74
hundred inhabitants;
75
(s) Any county with more than two hundred sixty
76
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants;
77
(t) Any county with more than two hundred thousand but
78
fewer th a n two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants;
79
(u) Any county with more than one hundred twenty
80
thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand
81
inhabitants;
82
(v) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
83
than six t y thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
84
more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand six
85
hundred inhabitants;
86
(w) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but
87
fewer th a n one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with
88
a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
89
eleven thousand inhabitants;
90
(x) Any county with more than thirty thousand but
91
fewer th a n thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
92
county seat with more than three thousand eight hundred but
93
fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
94
(y) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
95
than six t y thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
96
more than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one
97
thousand inhabitants;

SCS HB 3000 162
98
(z) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
99
fewer th a n forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
100
with more than five thousand but fewer than eight thousand
101
inhabitants;
102
(aa) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand
103
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county
104
seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen
105
thousand inhabitants;
106
(bb) Any county with more than forty thousand but
107
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
108
with more than twenty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-one
109
thousand inhabitants;
110
(cc) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
111
fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
112
seat with more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand
113
two hundred twenty inhabitants;
114
(dd) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
115
hundred bu t fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
116
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seven
117
thousand but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
118
(ee) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
119
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
120
county seat with more than nine hundred but fewer than one
121
thousand four hundred inhabitants;
122
(ff) Any county with more than eight thousand but
123
fewer than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with
124
a county seat with more than eight hundred but fewer than
125
one thousand three hundred inhabitants;
126
(gg) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
127
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
128
county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
129
twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants;

SCS HB 3000 163
130
(hh) Any county with more than eighty thousand but
131
fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and with a
132
county seat with more than thirteen thousand but fewer than
133
seventeen thousand inhabitants;
134
(ii) Any county with more than eight thousand nine
135
hundred bu t fewer than nine thousand nine hundred
136
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
137
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
138
(jj) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
139
fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
140
with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
141
than ten thousand inhabitants;
142
(kk) Any county with more than fifty thousand but
143
fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
144
with more than four thousand but fewer than seven thousand
145
inhabitants;
146
(ll) Any county with more than twelve thousand five
147
hundred bu t fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
148
with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer
149
than two thousand inhabitants;
150
(mm) Any county with more than seventy thousand but
151
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants;
152
(nn) Any county with more than forty thousand but
153
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
154
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one
155
thousand inhabitants;
156
(oo) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six
157
hundred bu t fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
158
with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
159
than five thousand fifty inhabitants;
160
(pp) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
161
fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county

SCS HB 3000 164
162
seat with more than two thousand five hundred but fewer than
163
four thousand inhabitants;
164
(qq) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six
165
hundred bu t fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
166
with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
167
than ten thousand inhabitants;
168
(rr) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand
169
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county
170
seat with more than five hundred but fewer than two thousand
171
inhabitants;
172
(ss) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
173
hundred bu t fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
174
a county seat with more than six hundred but fewer than one
175
thousand inhabitants;
176
(tt) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand
177
but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
178
seat with more than two thousand five hundred but fewer than
179
six thousand inhabitants;
180
(uu) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand
181
but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
182
seat with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty
183
thousand inhabitants;
184
(vv) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
185
fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
186
with a county seat with more than four thousand five hundred
187
fifty but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
188
(ww) Any county with more than four hundred thousand
189
but fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants;
190
(xx) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
191
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
192
county seat with more than twelve thousand five hundred but
193
fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants that was formerly

SCS HB 3000 165
194
described by paragraph (h) of this subdivision where the
195
question to impose the sales tax pursuant to this section
196
was approved by a majority of the qualified voters of said
197
public library district voting thereon prior to the issuance
198
of the notice of change of classification by the state
199
auditor pursuant to section 48.030.
200
(2) Any public library district listed in subdivision
201
(1) of t h is subsection may, by a majority vote of its board
202
of directors, impose a tax not to exceed one-half of one
203
cent, or for any county with more than one hundred thousand
204
but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and
205
with a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer
206
than eleven thousand inhabitants or any county with more
207
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
208
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seventeen
209
thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand inhabitants, not
210
to exceed one-third of one cent, on all retail sales subject
211
to taxation under sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the
212
purpose of funding the operation and maintenance of public
213
libraries within the boundaries of such library district.
214
If the library board approves placing the sales tax
215
authorized by this section on the ballot, then the county
216
commission shall comply and place the measure before the
217
voters. The tax authorized by this subsection shall be in
218
additio n to all other taxes allowed by law. No tax under
219
this subsection shall become effective unle s s the board of
220
directors submits to the voters of the district, at a county
221
or state general, primary or special election, a proposal to
222
authorize the tax, and such tax shall become effective only
223
after the majority of the voters voting on such tax approve
224
such tax.

SCS HB 3000 166
225
2. (1) In the event the district seeks to impose a
226
sales t a x un d er this subsection, the question shall be
227
submitted in substantially the following form:
228
Shall a ______ cent sales tax be levied on all
229
retail sales within the district for the purpose
230
of providing funding for ______ library district?
231
□ YES □ NO
232
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
233
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
234
proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a
235
majority of the votes cast by the qualified vo t ers voting
236
are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors
237
shall have no power to impose the tax unless and until
238
another proposal to authorize the tax is submitted to the
239
voters of the district and such proposal is approved by a
240
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. The
241
provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall a p ply to any
242
tax approved under this subsection.
243
(2) (a) For any district located in a county with
244
more tha n fou r hundred thousand but fewer than five hundred
245
thousand inhabitants, any sales tax imposed pursuant to this
246
section shall be in conjunction with a real and personal
247
property tax reduction for each year in which the sales tax
248
is imposed. The ballot of submission for such district
249
shall contai n, but need not be limited to, the following
250
language:
251
Shall the ______ library district impose a district-
252
wide sales tax of ______ (insert amount) and reduce
253
its total real and personal property tax levy

SCS HB 3000 167
254
annually by one hundred percent of the total amount
255
of sales tax revenue collected in the same tax year
256
for the purpose of providing funding for _____
257
library district?
258
□ YES □ NO
259
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in
260
the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the
261
question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
262
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
263
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
264
proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments
265
thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast
266
by the qualified voters voti ng are opposed to the proposal,
267
then the board of directors shall have no power to impose
268
the sales tax and reduce the property tax as herein
269
authorized unless and until the board of directors shall
270
again have submitted another proposal to authorize the board
271
of directors to impose the sales tax and reduce the property
272
tax under the provisions of this section and such proposal
273
is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting
274
thereon.
275
(b) Each year in which a sales tax is imposed pursuant
276
to this s ection, the board of directors shall, after
277
determining its budget, within the limits set by the
278
constitution and laws of this state for the following
279
calendar year and the total property tax levy needed to
280
raise the revenues required by such budget, reduce that
281
total real and personal property tax levy in an amount
282
sufficient to decrease the total property taxes it will
283
collect by an amount equal to one hundred percent of the

SCS HB 3000 168
284
sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
285
property taxes are being levied, provided that for the first
286
three years following the adoption of the sales tax pursuant
287
to this section, the reduction made pursuant to this
288
subdivision shall be equal to thirty-three percent, sixty-
289
six percent, and one hundred percent, respectively, of the
290
sales tax revenue collected.
291
(3) For any district located in a county with more
292
than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty
293
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
294
nine thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants or
295
any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
296
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
297
than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
298
inhabitants, any sales tax imposed pursuant to this section
299
shall be in conjunction with the elimination of all real and
300
personal property tax levies imposed by the district for
301
each year in which the sales tax is imposed. The ballot of
302
submission for such district shall contain, b ut need not be
303
limited to, the following language:
304
Shall the ______ library district impose a district-
305
wide sales tax of ______ (insert amount) and
306
eliminate its total real and personal property tax
307
levy for the purpose of providing funding for _____
308
library district?
309
□ YES □ NO
310
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in
311
the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the
312
question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".

SCS HB 3000 169
313
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
314
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
315
proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments
316
thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast
317
by the qualified voters voti ng are opposed to the proposal,
318
then the board of directors shall have no power to impose
319
the sales tax and eliminate the property tax as herein
320
authorized unless and until the board of directors shall
321
again have submitted another proposal to authorize the board
322
of directors to impose the sales tax and eliminate the
323
property tax under the provisions of this section and such
324
proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
325
voting thereon.
326
3. As used in this section, "qualified voters" or
327
"voters " means any individuals residing within the district
328
who are eligible to be registered voters and who have
329
registered to vote under chapter 115, or, if no individuals
330
are eligible and registered to vote reside within the
331
proposed district, all of the owners of real property
332
located within the proposed district who have unanimously
333
petitioned for or consented to the adoption of an ordinance
334
by the governing body imposing a tax authorized in this
335
section. If the owner of the property within the proposed
336
district is a political subdivision or corporation of the
337
state, the governing body of such political subdivision or
338
corporation shall be considered the owner for purposes of
339
this section.
340
4. For purposes of this section the term "public
341
library district" shall mean any city library district,
342
county library district, city-county library district,

SCS HB 3000 170
343
municipal library district, consolidated library district,
344
or urban library district.
345
5. The provisions of section 1.100 shall apply to any
346
sales t a x approved by the voters of a public library
347
district located in a county described in subsection 1 of
348
this section. Once a library district located in such
349
county has co m e under the operation of this section, a
350
subsequent change in population or classification shall not
351
remove that county from the operation of this section
352
regardless of whether the county comes under the operation
353
of this section after the effective date of this section.
1
190.050. 1. After the ambulance district has been
2
declared orga n ize d , the declaring county commission[, except
3
in counties of the second class having more than one hundred
4
five thousand inhabitants located adjacent to a county of
5
the first class having a charter form of government which
6
has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
7
shall divide the district into six election districts as
8
equal in population as possible, and shall by lot number the
9
districts from one to six inclusive. The county commission
10
shall cause an election to be held i n the ambulance district
11
within ninety days after the order establishing the
12
ambulance district to elect ambulance district directors.
13
Each voter shall vote for one director from the ambulance
14
election district in which the voter resides. The directors
15
elected from districts one and four shall ser v e for a term
16
of one year, the directors elected from districts two and
17
five shall serve for a term of two years, and the directors
18
from districts three and six shall serve for a term of three
19
years; thereafter, the terms of all directors shall be three
20
years. All directors shall serve the term to which they
21
were e l ected or appointed, and until their successors are

SCS HB 3000 171
22
elected and qualified, except in cases of resignation or
23
disqualification. The county commission shall reapportion
24
the ambulance dis t ricts within sixty days after the
25
population of the county is reported to the governor for
26
each decennial census of the United States. Notwithstanding
27
any other provision of law, if the number o f candidates for
28
the office of director is no greater than the number of
29
directors to be elected, no election shall be held, and the
30
candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their
31
offices at the same time and in the same manner as if they
32
have been elected.
33
2. In all counties of the second class having more
34
than on e hundred five thousand inhabitants located adjacent
35
to a county of the first class having a charter form of
36
government which has a population of over nine hundred
37
thousand inhabitants,] shall order an election be held on
38
the next regularly scheduled election date and the voters
39
shall vote for six directors elected at large from within
40
the district for a term of three years. [Those directors
41
holding office in any district in such a county on August
42
13, 1976, shall continue to hold office until the expiration
43
of their terms, and their successors shall be elected from
44
the district at large for a term of three years. In any
45
district formed in such counties after August 13 , 1976, the
46
governing body of the county shall cause an election to be
47
held in that district within ninety days after the order
48
establishing the ambulance district to elect ambulance
49
district directors.] Each voter shall vote for six
50
directors. The two c a ndidates receiving the highest number
51
of votes at such election shall be elected for a term of
52
three years, the two candidates receiving the third and
53
fourth highest number of votes shall be elected for a term

SCS HB 3000 172
54
of two years, the two candidates receiving the fifth and
55
sixth highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of
56
one year; thereafter, the term of all directors shall be
57
three years. A director holding office as of August 28,
58
2026, shall c ontinue as an at-large director for the
59
remainder of such director's existing term.
60
[3.] 2. A candidate for director of the ambulance
61
district sha l l, at the time of filing, be a citizen of the
62
United States, [a qualified voter of the election district
63
as provided in subsection 1 of this section,] a resident of
64
the district for two years next preceding the election, and
65
shall be at least twenty-four years of age. In an
66
established district which is located withi n the
67
jurisdiction of more than one election authority, the
68
candidate shall file his or her declaration of candidacy
69
with the secretary of the board. In all other districts, a
70
candidate shall file a declarati o n of candidacy with the
71
county clerk of the county in which he or she resides. A
72
candidate shall file a statement under oath that he or she
73
possesses the required qualifications. No candidate's name
74
shall be printed on any official ballo t unless the candidate
75
has filed a written declaration of candidacy pursuant to
76
subsection 5 of section 115.127. If the time between the
77
county commission's call for a special election and the date
78
of the election is not sufficient to allow compliance with
79
subsection 5 of section 115.127, the county commission
80
shall, at the time it calls the special election, set the
81
closing date for filing declarations of candidacy.
82
3. Any ambulance district may adopt and establish
83
electio n subdistricts by ordinance, providing that each
84
election subdistrict shall be composed of contiguous
85
territory as compact and as nearly equal in population as

SCS HB 3000 173
86
may be, and that each board member shall be a resident of
87
the election subdistrict that they represent at the time of
88
their election and for the duration of their term. Such
89
ordinance shall only be adopted, amended, or repea l ed by a
90
two-thirds majority vote of the board of directors.
91
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
92
contrar y , if the number of candidates for the office of
93
director is less than the number of directors to be elected,
94
no election shall be held, and the candidates shall assume
95
the responsibilities of their offices at the same time and
96
in the same manner as if they were elected.
1
190.051. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of
2
sections 190. 0 50 a nd 190.052 to the contrary, upon a
3
[motion] resolution adopted by the board of directors in
4
districts where there are six-member boards, and upon
5
approval by the voters in the district, the number of
6
directors may be increased to seven [with one board member
7
running district wide,] or decreased to five or three board
8
members. The resolution shall state the names of the
9
existing directors who will fill the positions on the board
10
if such measure is approved by the voters, as well as any
11
vacancies to be filled by subsequent election, and shall
12
state the dates on which those terms shall conclude.
13
2. The ballot to be used for the approval of the
14
voters t o increase or decrease the number of members on the
15
board of directors of the ambulance district shall be
16
substantially in the following form:
17
Shall the number of members of the board of
18
directors of the ______ (Insert name of district)
19
Ambulance District be (increased to seven

SCS HB 3000 174
20
members/decreased to five members/decreased to
21
three members)?
22
□ YES □ NO
23
[2.] 3. If a majority of the voters voting on a
24
propositi on t o increase the number of board members [to
25
seven] vote in favor of the proposition, then at the next
26
election of board members after the voters vote to increase
27
the number of directors, the voters shall select [one person
28
to serve in addition to the existing six directors as the
29
member who shall run district wide] additional persons to
30
fill any such vacancies.
31
[3.] 4. If a majority of the voters voting on a
32
propositi on t o decrease the number of board members vote in
33
favor of the proposition, then the [county clerk shall
34
redraw the district into the resulting number of
35
subdistricts with equal population bases and hold elections
36
by subdistricts pursuant to section 190.050] existing board
37
members stated in the board resolution shall complete the
38
terms specified therein. Thereafter, members of the board
39
shall be elected to serve terms of three years and until
40
their successors are duly elected and qualified.
41
[4. Members of the board of directors in office on the
42
date of a n election pursuant to this section to increase or
43
decrease the number of members of the board of directors
44
shall serve the term to which they were elected or appointed
45
and until their successors are elected and qualified.]
1
190.052. Any member of the board of directors who
2
moves residen c y from the district [from which the member was
3
elected] shall be disqualified as a member of the board. If
4
one or two vacancies occur in the membership of the boar d as

SCS HB 3000 175
5
a result of death, resignation, or disqualification, the
6
remaining members shall appoint one or two qualified
7
persons, as provided in section 190.050, to fill the
8
vacancies until the end of the unexpired term. Such
9
appointment shall be made with the consent of a majority of
10
the remaining members of the board. If the board is unable
11
to agree in filling a vacancy [withi n sixty days or if there
12
are more than two vacancies at any one time], the county
13
commission, upon [notice from the board of failure to agree
14
in filling the vacancies] the written request of a majority
15
of the remaining board members or the ambulance service
16
administrator, as described in section 190.112, shall within
17
[ten] thirty calendar days fill them by appointment of
18
qualified persons, as provided in section 190.050, and shall
19
notify the persons in writing of their appointment. The
20
persons appointed shall serve for the unexpired ter m .
1
190.070. 1. A petition for annexation of land to an
2
ambulance dist ric t shall be signed by not less than ten
3
percent or fifty voters, whichever is fewer, residing within
4
the territory therein described proposed for annexation and
5
shall be [filed with the county clerk of the county in which
6
the district or the greater portion thereof is situated, and
7
shall be addressed to the commissioners of the county
8
commission] presented to the board of directors of the
9
ambulance district. A hearing shall be held thereon as
10
nearly as possible a s in the case of a formation petition.
11
If upon the hearing the [commissioners of the county
12
commission find] board of directors finds that the petition
13
is in compliance with the provisions of sections 190.005 to
14
190.085, they shall order the question to be submitted to
15
the voters within the territory and within the district.

SCS HB 3000 176
16
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially
17
the fol l owing form to all of the voters in the existing
18
ambulance district and the area proposed to be annexed:
19
Shall ______ (description of territory) be
20
annexed to the ______ ambulance district, and a
21
tax imposed within such annexed area equal to
22
the existing rate of the _____ ambulance
23
district?
24
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question [in
25
the dis t rict and in the territory described in the petition,
26
respectively,] are in favor of the annexation, the
27
[commissioners of the county commission shall by order
28
declare] board of directors shall enact an ordinance
29
incorporating the territory annexed and shall describe the
30
altered boundaries of the district. A copy of the same
31
shall be filed with the county cler k .
1
190.090. 1. Two or more organized ambulance districts
2
may consolida t e i n to one ambulance district by following the
3
procedures set forth in this section.
4
2. If the consolidation of existing ambulance
5
distric t s is desired, a number of voters residing in an
6
existing ambulance district equal to ten percent of the vote
7
cast for governor in the existing district in the next
8
preceding gubernatorial election may file with the county
9
clerk in which the territory or greater part of the proposed
10
consolidated district is situated a petition requesting the
11
consolidation of two or more existing ambulance districts.
12
3. The petition shall be in the following form:
13
We, the undersigned voters of the ______
14
ambulance district do hereby petition that
15
______ existing ambulance districts be
16
consolidated into one consolidated ambulance

SCS HB 3000 177
17
district to be known as the _____ Ambulance
18
District, subject to the attached consolidation
19
plan.
20
4. An alternative procedure of consolidation may be
21
followe d , if the board of directors of the existing
22
ambulance districts pass a resolution in the following form:
23
Be it resolved by the board of directors of
24
the ambulance district that the ______ ambulance
25
districts be consolidated into one consolidated
26
ambulance district to be known as the _____
27
Ambulance District, subject to the attached
28
consolidation plan.
29
5. Every petition or resolution shall be accompanied
30
by a co n solidation plan outlining the process for the
31
proposed consolidation. At a minimum, the consolidation
32
plan shall include the f ollowing:
33
(1) The name of the proposed consolidated district, a
34
legal de s cription of the boundaries of such consolidated
35
district, and the proposed tax levy to be imposed by the
36
consolidated district. In the event that the proposed plan
37
is for the consolidatio n into an existing district, the
38
consolidation plan shall clearly state that the existing
39
district shall continue as the legal entity into which the
40
other districts are consolidated;
41
(2) The names of the districts to be consolidated,
42
accompan i ed by a list of all real property owned and
43
financial assets currently held by the district, all
44
outstanding bonds or debts of each of said districts, and
45
the current tax levies imposed by each of said districts;
46
(3) The name of the district which shall be
47
responsi b le for maintaining ambulance service during the
48
consolidation, including continuing operations,

SCS HB 3000 178
49
administration, and governance of the consolidated district,
50
provided that there shall be a presumption that the district
51
with the largest operating budget in the preceding fiscal
52
year shall assume such responsibility;
53
(4) The proposed number of board members and specific
54
individu a ls who will serve as the initial directors,
55
provided that such directors shall be chosen from among the
56
existing board members of the districts to be consolidated
57
such that there is at least one director from each of the
58
districts to be consolidated; and
59
(5) A proposed time line for consolidation, which
60
shall no t exceed one hundred eighty days, provided that such
61
time line shall be subject to modification by the board of
62
the consolidated district for good cause.
63
6. Upon the filing of a petition, or a resolution, and
64
a conso l idation plan with the county clerk from each of the
65
ambulance districts proposed to be consolidated, the county
66
clerk shall present the petition or resolution and
67
consolidation plan to the commissioners of the county
68
commission [having jurisdiction who shall thereupon order
69
the submission of the question to the voters of the
70
districts. The filing of each of the petitions in the
71
ambulance d istricts shall have occurred within a continuous
72
twelve-month period.
73
6. The notice shall set forth the names of the
74
existin g ambulance districts to be included in the
75
consolidated district.
76
7. The question shall be submitted in substantially
77
the fol l owing form:
78
Shall the existing ______ ambulance
79
districts be consolidated into one ambulance
80
district?

SCS HB 3000 179
81
8. If the county commission having jurisdiction finds
82
that th e question to consolidate the districts received a
83
majority of the votes cast, the commission shall make and
84
enter its order declaring that the proposition passed.
85
9. Within thirty days after the district has been
86
declare d consolidated, the county commission shall divide
87
the district into six election districts and shall order an
88
election to be held and conducted as provided in section
89
190.050 for the election of directors.
90
10. Within thirty days after the election of the
91
initial b oard of directors of the district, the directors
92
shall meet and the time and place of the first meeting of
93
the board shall be designated by the county commission. At
94
the first meeting the newly elected board of directors s hall
95
choose a name for the consolidated district and shall notify
96
the clerk of the county commission of each county within
97
which the consolidated district is located of the name of
98
the consolidated district.
99
11. On the thirtieth day following the election of the
100
board of directors, the existing ambulance districts shall
101
cease to exist and the consolidated district shall assume
102
all of the powers and duties exercised by those districts.
103
All assets and obligations of the existing ambulance
104
districts shall become assets and obligations of the
105
consolidated district], who shall record such documents in
106
the records of the county. A petition or resolution for a
107
proposed consolidation shal l be received from all ambulance
108
districts within the same calendar year or shall be
109
considered null and void.
110
7. Each of the ambulance districts seeking to
111
consoli d ate shall post the notice of the intent to
112
consolidate in the same manner as district public meetings

SCS HB 3000 180
113
are posted. In addition, publication of such notice of
114
intent shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation
115
in every county in which the proposed consolidated ambulance
116
district shall be located, with publication to be made once
117
per week for two consecutive weeks. A public hearing shall
118
be held jointly by all ambulance di s tricts seeking to
119
consolidate at a location within the boundaries of the
120
proposed consolidated ambulance district, provided that such
121
hearing shall be no more than ten days after the date of the
122
second publication. The notice of intent shall be in
123
substantially the fo llowing form:
124
NOTICE OF THE FILING OF A PETITION/RESOLUTION
125
FOR CONSOLIDATION OF THE ______ AMBULANCE
126
DISTRICTS
127
To all voters, residents, and interested
128
persons within the boundaries of the above-
129
described ambulance districts: You are
130
hereby notified that a petition/resolution
131
has been filed for the consolidation of the
132
above-named ambulance districts into one
133
consolidated ambulance district to be known
134
as _____ Ambulance District. A proposed
135
consolidation plan is available for
136
inspection at the office of the County Clerk
137
of _____ County.
138
A public hearing will be held on ______
139
(date) at ________ (time) at the following
140
location: ________. The purpose of this
141
public hearing shall be to explain the
142
reasons for the consolidation and answer
143
questions from the public.
144
Objections to this consolidation may be filed
145
with the County Clerk of _____ County,
146
provided such objections are filed in writing

SCS HB 3000 181
147
not less than thirty days after the public
148
hearing. Any such objection must be signed
149
by a number of voters not less than five
150
percent of the votes cast for governor in the
151
most recent gubernatorial election.
152
8. If no objections are filed with the county clerk
153
within t hirty days after the public hearing, then within
154
forty-five days following the date of the public hearing,
155
the county commission shall order the districts consolidated
156
pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan and shall
157
further appoint as directors those individuals identified in
158
the consolidation plan. The county commission shall further
159
set a date, time, and lo cation for the first meeting of the
160
directors of the newly consolidated district.
161
9. Upon receipt of any objections filed, the county
162
clerk s h all verify that such objections are signed by the
163
necessary number of voters of the district. If said
164
objections are signed by an appropriate num b er of voters,
165
the county commission of each county in which the proposed
166
consolidated district is to be located shall thereupon order
167
the submission of the question to the voters of the
168
districts. The question shall be submitted in substantially
169
the followi ng form:
170
Shall the existing ______ ambulance districts
171
be consolidated into one ambulance district to
172
be known as the _________ Ambulance District,
173
with such consolidated district authorized to
174
levy a property tax not to exceed the annual
175
rate of ______ cents on the hundred dollars
176
assessed valuation or a sales tax in an amount
177
not to exceed ______ percent, or a combination
178
of both?

SCS HB 3000 182
179
If the county commission having jurisdiction finds that the
180
question to consolidate the districts received a majority of
181
the votes cast, the commission shall make and enter its
182
order declaring that the proposition passed. The county
183
commission shall further order the districts consolidated
184
pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan and shall
185
further appoint as directors those individuals identified in
186
the consolidation plan. The county commission shall further
187
set a date, time, and lo cation for the first meeting of the
188
directors of the newly consolidated district.
189
10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
190
contrary , the consolidated district may impose an initial
191
tax levy up to the highest tax levy of the consolidating
192
districts, provided such tax levy is specifically set forth
193
in the ballot language submitted to and approved by the
194
voters of the consolidating district.
195
11. Without a vote of the residents of the
196
consolid a ted district as provided in this section, no
197
consolidated ambulance district shall be permitted to impose
198
a property tax greater than the lowest of any existing
199
property tax rate of the districts to be consolidated, nor
200
shall the consolidated ambulance district be permitted to
201
impose any sales tax greater than the lowest of any existing
202
sales tax rate of the districts to be consolidated.
203
12. Upon written certification by the board of
204
director s of the consolidated district to the prior district
205
that the consolidated district has obtained the necessary
206
licenses and permits to operate an ambulance service and all
207
directors of such consolidated district have completed the
208
training required by section 190.053, the existing ambulance
209
districts shall cease to exist and the consolidated district

SCS HB 3000 183
210
shall assume all of the powers and duties exercised by those
211
districts. All assets and obligations of the existing
212
ambulance d istricts shall become assets and obligations of
213
the consolidated district.
214
13. Any ambulance district that has contracted for
215
ambulanc e service with another ambulance district for more
216
than five consecutive years may submit a joint resolution
217
executed by the boards of both ambulance districts to the
218
county clerk of the county in which the larger area of the
219
proposed consolidated district is located, requesting
220
consolidation of said districts by consolidating the smaller
221
districts into the larger district. Such resolution shall
222
be accompanied by a consolidation p l an as provided in this
223
section. Upon the receipt of such joint resolution, the
224
county c o mmission shall promptly order the smaller districts
225
consolidated into the larger district pursuant to the terms
226
of the consolidation plan without the necessity of providing
227
notice or public hearing.
1
249.255. 1. Should a public sewer district created
2
and organized pur s uant to constitutional or statutory
3
authority place a lien upon a customer's property for unpaid
4
sewer charges, the lien, once properly recorded, shall have
5
priority above all liens except for those taxes levied for
6
state and county purposes.
7
2. Should the sewer charges of a public sewer district
8
created and organized pursuant to constitutional or
9
statutory authority remain unpaid for a period in excess of
10
three months, the district, after notice to the customer by
11
certified mail, shall have the authority at its discretion,
12
to disconnect the customer's sewer line from the district's
13
line or request any private water company, public water
14
supply district, or any municipality supplying water to the

SCS HB 3000 184
15
premises to discontinue service to the customer until such
16
time as the sewer charges and all related costs of this
17
section are paid.
1
251.034. Payments made under sections 251.032 to
2
251.038 to th e various regional planning commissions shall
3
be distributed on a matching basis of one-half state funds
4
for one-half of local funds. No local unit shall receive
5
any payment without providin g the matching funds required.
6
The state funds so allocated shall not exceed the sum of
7
[sixty-five] one hundred thirty thousand dollars for the
8
East-West Gateway Coordinating Council and for the Mid-
9
America Regional Council. The remaining allocated state
10
funds shall not exceed th e sum of [twenty-five] fifty
11
thousand dollars for each of the following regional planning
12
commissions: South Central Ozark, Ozark Foothills, Green
13
Hills, [Show - Me,] Bootheel, [Missouri Valley, Ozark
14
Gateway,] Mark Twain, [ABCD,] Southeast Missouri, Boonslick,
15
Northwest Missouri, Mid-Missouri, Kaysinger Basin, Lake of
16
the Ozarks, Meramec, Northeast Missouri, Harry S Truman, MO-
17
Kan, Pioneer Trails, and [Lakes Country] Southwest
18
Missouri. Beginning July 1, 2027, and each year after, the
19
maximum g r ant amount for each regional planning commission
20
shall be adjusted with the consumer price index.
1
311.083. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "Common area", any public area within an
4
entertai n ment district and any area of a public right-of-way
5
that is within the entertainment district. "Common area"
6
shall not include areas open to the public that are located
7
within an establishment licensed under this chapter;
8
(2) "Entertainment district", any area in any county
9
that:

SCS HB 3000 185
10
(a) a. Borders on or that contains part of a lake
11
with no l ess than one thousand miles of shoreline and that
12
is located in any city with more than four thousand four
13
hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
14
inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than
15
forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants; or
16
b. Borders the Missouri river, and that is located in
17
any cit y with more than forty-six thousand but fewer than
18
fifty-one thousand inhabitants;
19
(b) Contains a combination of entertainment venues,
20
bars, ni g htclubs, restaurants, and other licensed
21
establishments and common areas; and
22
(c) Is designated as such by an ordinance of the
23
governin g body of the city;
24
(3) "Portable bar", any bar, table, kiosk, cart, or
25
stand th a t is not a permanent fixture and can be moved from
26
place to place.
27
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
28
chapter to the contrary, any person who possesses the
29
qualifications required under this chapter, and who meets
30
the requirements of and complies with the provisions of this
31
chapter, may apply for, and the supervisor of alcohol and
32
tobacco control may issue, an entertainment district special
33
license to sell intoxicating liquor by the drink for retail
34
for consumption dispensed from one or more licensed
35
establishments including, but not limited to, portable bars
36
within the entertainment district, until 1:30 a.m. on
37
Mondays through Saturdays and from 6:00 a.m. on Sundays and
38
until 1:30 a.m. on Mondays.
39
3. An applicant granted an entertainment district
40
special license under this section shall pay a license fee
41
of three hundred dollars per year.

SCS HB 3000 186
42
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
43
to the c ontrary, on such days and at such times during the
44
hours a licensee is allowed under this chapter to sell
45
alcoholic beverages, licensed establishments holding an
46
entertainment district special license under this section,
47
may allow persons to leave the licensed premises located in
48
portions of the entertainment district with an alcoholic
49
beverage and enter upon and consume the alcoholic beverage
50
within other licensed establishments and common areas
51
located in portions of the entertainment district. No
52
person shall take any alcoholic beverage or alcoholic
53
beverages outside the boundaries of the entertainment
54
district.
55
5. Every licensee within the entertainment district
56
shall s e rve alcoholic beverages in containers that display
57
and contain the licensee's trade name or logo or some other
58
mark that is unique to that license and licensee.
59
6. The holder of an entertainment district special
60
license is solely responsible for alcohol violations
61
occurring on its premises, including any portable bar, and
62
in any common area.
63
7. The governing body of the city in which the
64
enterta i nment district is located shall be authorized to
65
adopt by ordinance procedures for approval or rejection of
66
such entertainment districts as well as rules and
67
regulations for conduct and enforcement thereof consistent
68
with this section.
1
321.220. For the purpose of providing fire protection
2
to the proper t y within the district, the district and, on
3
its behalf, the board shall have the following powers,
4
authority and privileges:
5
(1) To have perpetual existence;

SCS HB 3000 187
6
(2) To have and use a corporate seal;
7
(3) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits,
8
actions a nd proceedings;
9
(4) To enter into contracts, franchises and agreements
10
with any person, partnership, association or corporation,
11
public or private, affecting the affairs of the district,
12
including contracts with any municipality, district or
13
state, or the United States of America, and any of their
14
agencies, political subdivisions or instrumentalities, for
15
the planning, development, construction, acquisition or
16
operation of any public improvement or facility, or for a
17
common service relating to the control or prevention of
18
fires, including the installation, operation and maintenance
19
of water supply distribution, fire hydrant and fire alarm
20
systems; provided, that a notice shall be published for bids
21
on all construction or purchase contracts for work or
22
material or both, outside the authority contained in
23
subdivision (9) of this section, involving an expense of
24
[ten] fifty thousand dollars or more;
25
(5) Upon approval of the voters as herein provided, to
26
borrow m o ney and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by
27
certificates, notes or debentures, and to issue bonds, in
28
accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
29
(6) To acquire, construct, purchase, maintain, dispose
30
of and e n cumber real and personal property, fire stations,
31
fire protection and fire-fighting apparatus and auxiliary
32
equipment therefor, and any interest therein, including
33
leases and easements;
34
(7) To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district
35
without a n election. The terms and conditions of refunding
36
bonds shall be subst a ntially the same as those of the
37
original issue of bonds, and the board shall provide for the

SCS HB 3000 188
38
payment of interest, at not to exceed the legal rate, and
39
the principal of such refunding bonds in the same manner as
40
is provided for the payment of interest and principal of
41
bonds refunded;
42
(8) To have the management, control and supervision of
43
all the b usiness and affairs of the district, and the
44
construction, installation, operation and maintenance of
45
district improvements therein;
46
(9) To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers
47
and atto r neys, including part-time or volunteer firemen;
48
(10) To have and exercise the power of eminent domain
49
and in th e manner provided by law for the condemnation of
50
private property for public use to take any property within
51
the district necessary to the exercise of the powers herein
52
granted;
53
(11) To receive and accept by bequest, gift or
54
donation a ny kind of property. Notwithstanding any other
55
provision of law to the contra r y, any property received by
56
the fire protection district as a gift or any property
57
purchased by the fire protection district at a price below
58
the actual market value of the property may be returned to
59
the donor or resold to the seller if such property is not
60
used for the specific purpose for which it was acquired;
61
(12) To adopt and amend bylaws, fire protection and
62
fire prev e ntion ordinances, and any other rules and
63
regulations not in conflict with the constitution and laws
64
of this state, necessary for the carrying on of the
65
business, objects and affairs of the board and of the
66
district, and refer to the proper authorities for
67
prosecution any infraction thereof detrimental to the
68
district. However, fire protection and fire prevention
69
ordinance s shall not be exercised so as to impose

SCS HB 3000 189
70
regulations or to require permits with respect to the
71
erection, maintenance, repair, alteration, or extension of
72
farm buildings or farm structures. Any person violating any
73
such ordinance is hereby declared t o be guilty of a
74
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished
75
as is provided by law therefor. The prosecuting attorney
76
for the county in which the vio l ation occurs shall prosecute
77
such violations in the circuit court of that county. The
78
legal officer or attorney for the fire district may b e
79
appointed by the prosecuting attorney as special assistant
80
prosecuting attorney for the prosecution of any such
81
violation. The enactments of the fire district in
82
delegating administrative authority to officials of the
83
district may provide standards of action for the
84
administrative officials, which standards are declared as
85
industrial codes adopted by nationally organized and
86
recognized trade bodies. The board shall have the power to
87
adopt an ordinance, rule , or regulation allowing the
88
district to charge individuals who reside outside of the
89
district, but who receive emergency services within the
90
boundaries of the district, for the actual and reasonable
91
cost of such services. However, such actual and reasonable
92
costs shall not exceed one hundred dollars for responding to
93
each fire call or alarm and two hundred fifty dollars for
94
each hour or a proportional sum for each quarter hour spent
95
in combating a fire or emergency;
96
(13) To pay all court costs and expenses connected
97
with the f irst election or any subsequent election in the
98
district;
99
(14) To have and exercise all rights and powers
100
necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific
101
powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be

SCS HB 3000 190
102
considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or
103
appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this
104
chapter;
105
(15) To provide for health, accident, disability and
106
pension b e nefits for the salaried members of its organized
107
fire department of the district and such other benefits for
108
their spouses and eligible unemancipated children, through
109
either or both a contributory or noncontributory plan. For
110
purposes of this section, "eligible unemancipated child "
111
means a natural or adopted child of an insured, or a
112
stepchild of an insured who is domiciled with the insured,
113
who is less than twenty-three years of age, who is not
114
married, not employed on a full-time basis, not maintaining
115
a separate residence except for full-time students in an
116
accredited school or institution of higher learning, and who
117
is dependent on parents or guardians for at least fifty
118
percent of his or her support. The type and amount of such
119
benefits shall be determined b y the board of directors of
120
the fire protection district within the level of available
121
revenues of the pension program and other available revenues
122
of the district. If an employee contributory plan is
123
adopted, then at least one voting member of the board of
124
trustees shall be a member of the fire district elected by
125
the contributing members, which shall not be the same as the
126
board of directors;
127
(16) To contract with any municipality that is
128
contiguou s to a fire protection district for the fire
129
protection district to provide fire protection to the
130
municipality for a fee as hereinafter provided;
131
(17) To provide for life insurance, accident,
132
sickness, health, disability, annuity, length of service,
133
pension, retirement and other employee-type fringe benefits,

SCS HB 3000 191
134
subject to the provisions of section 70.615, for the
135
volunteer members of any organized fire department of the
136
district and such other benefits for their spouses and
137
eligible unemancipated children, through either a
138
contributory or noncontributory plan, or both. For purposes
139
of this section, "eligible unemancipated child " means a
140
natural or adopted child of an insured, or a stepchild of an
141
insured who is domiciled with the insured, who is less than
142
twenty-three years of age, who is not married, not employed
143
on a full-time basis, not maintaining a separate residence
144
except for full-time students in an accredited school or
145
institution of higher learning, and who is dependent on
146
parents or guardians for at least fifty percent of his or
147
her support. The type and amount of such benefits shall be
148
determined b y the board of directors of the fire protection
149
district within available revenues of the district,
150
including the pension program of the district. The
151
provision and receipt of such benefits shall n o t make the
152
recipient an employee of the district. Directors who are
153
also volunteer members may receive suc h benefits while
154
serving as a director of the district;
155
(18) To contract for services with any rural,
156
volunteer or subscription fire department or organization,
157
or volunteer fire protection association, as defined in
158
section 320.300, for the purpose of providing the benefits
159
described in subdivision (17) of this section.
1
347.048. 1. (1) Any limited liability company that
2
owns and rent s or leas e s real property, or owns unoccupied
3
real property, located within:

SCS HB 3000 192
4
(a) Any home rule city with a population of more than
5
four hun d red thousand inhabitants which is located in more
6
than one county;
7
(b) Any home rule city with more than one hundred
8
sixteen t housand but fewer than one hundred fifty-five
9
thousand inhabitants; [or]
10
(c) Any home rule city with more than seventy-one
11
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants; or
12
(d) Any county with more than one million inhabitants
13
shall file with that city's or county's clerk an affidavit
14
listing the name and street address of at least one natural
15
person who has management control and responsibility for the
16
real property owned and leased or rented by the limited
17
liability company, or owned by the limited liability company
18
and unoccupied.
19
(2) Within thirty days following the cessation of
20
manageme n t control and responsibility of any natural person
21
named in an affidavit described in this section, the limited
22
liability company shall file a successor affidavit listing
23
the name and street address of a natural person successor.
24
2. No limited liability company shall be charged a fee
25
for fil i ng an affidavit or successor affidavit required
26
under this section.
27
3. If a limited liability company required by this
28
section to file an affidavit or a successor affidavit fails
29
or refuses to file such completed affidavit with the
30
appropriate clerk, any person who is adversely affected by
31
the failure or refusal, the county, or the home rule city
32
may petition the circuit court in the county where the

SCS HB 3000 193
33
property is located to direct the execution and filing of
34
such document.
1
473.742. 1. Each public administrator in counties of
2
the second, t h ird or fourth classification and in the City
3
of St. Louis shall make a determination within thirty days
4
after taking office whether such public administrator shall
5
elect to receive a salary as defined herein or receive fees
6
as may be allowed by law to executors, administrators and
7
personal representatives. The election by the public
8
administrator shall be ma d e in writing to the county clerk.
9
Should the public administrator elect to receive a salary,
10
the public administrator's office may not then elect to
11
change at any future time to receive fees in lieu of
12
salary. Every public administrator who begins his or her
13
first t e rm on or after January 1, 2024, shall be deemed to
14
have elected to receive a salary as provided in this section.
15
2. If a public administrator elects to be placed on
16
salary, the salary shall be based upon the average number of
17
open letters in the two years preceding the term when the
18
salary is elected, based upon the following schedule:
19
(1) Zero to five letters: salary shall be a minimum
20
of seven thousand five hundred d ollars;
21
(2) Six to fifteen letters: salary shall be a minimum
22
of fifte e n thousand dollars;
23
(3) Sixteen to twenty-five letters: salary shall be a
24
minimum o f twenty thousand dollars;
25
(4) Twenty-six to thirty-nine letters: salary shall
26
be a min i mum of twenty-five thousand dollars ;
27
(5) Public administrators with forty or more letters
28
shall be considered full-time county officials and shall be

SCS HB 3000 194
29
paid according to the assessed valuation schedule set forth
30
below:
31
Assessed Valuation Salary
32
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
33
$ 41,000,000 to 53,999,999 $30,000
34
$ 54,000,000 to 65,999,999 $32,000
35
$ 66,000,000 to 85,999,999 $34,000
36
$ 86,000,000 to 99,999,999 $36,000
37
$ 100,000,000 to 130,999,999 $38,000
38
$ 131,000,000 to 159,999,999 $40,000
39
$ 160,000,000 to 189,999,999 $41,000
40
$ 190,000,000 to 249,999,999 $41,500
41
$ 250,000,000 to 299,999,999 $43,000
42
$ 300,000,000 to 449,999,999 $45,000
43
$ 450,000,000 to 599,999,999 $47,000
44
$ 600,000,000 to 749,999,999 $49,000
45
$ 750,000,000 to 899,999,999 $51,000
46
$ 900,000,000 to 1,049,999,999 $53,000
47
$ 1,050,000,000 to 1,199,999,999 $55,000
48
$ 1,200,000,000 to 1,349,999,999 $57,000
49
$ 1,350,000,000 and over $59,000

SCS HB 3000 195
50
(6) A public administrator with forty or more letters
51
who begi n s a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
52
annual salary computed as set forth in the following
53
schedule:
54
Assessed Valuation Salary
55
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
56
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
57
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
58
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
59
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
60
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
61
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
62
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
63
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
64
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
65
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
66
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
67
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
68
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
69
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
70
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100

SCS HB 3000 196
71
(7) The public administrator in the City of St. Louis
72
shall re c eive a salary not less than sixty-five thousand
73
dollars;
74
[(7)] (8) Two thousand dollars of the compensation
75
authorized in t his section shall be payable to the public
76
administrator only if he or she has completed at least
77
twenty hours of instruction each calendar year relating to
78
the operations of the public administrator's office when
79
approved by a professional association of the county public
80
administrators of Missouri unless exempted from the training
81
by the professional association. The professional
82
association approving the progra m shall provide a
83
certificate of completion to each public administrator who
84
completes the training program and shall send a list of
85
certified public administrators to the treasurer of each
86
county. Expenses incurred for attending the training
87
session shall be reimbursed to the county public
88
administrator in the same manner as other expenses as may be
89
appropriated for that purpose.
90
3. If a public administrator is appointed by the court
91
as both a guardian and a conservator to the same ward or
92
protectee, it shall be considered two letters.
93
4. Notwithstanding subsection 2 or 5 of this section
94
to the c ontrary, upon majority approval by the salary
95
commission, a public administrator may be paid according to
96
the assessed valuation schedule set forth in subdivision (5)
97
of subsection 2 of this section. If the salary commission
98
elects to pay a public administr a tor according to the
99
assessed valuation schedule, the salary commission shall not
100
elect to change at any future time to pay the public
101
administrator's office according to the average number of

SCS HB 3000 197
102
open letters in lieu of paying them according to the
103
assessed valuation schedule.
104
5. The initial compensation of the public
105
adminis t rator who elects to be put on salary shall be
106
determined by the average number of letters for the two
107
years preceding the term when the salary is elected. Salary
108
increases or decreases according to the minimum sched ule set
109
forth in this section shall be adjusted only after the
110
number o f open letters places the workload in a different
111
subdivision for two consecutive years. Minimum salary
112
increases or decreases shall only take effect upon a new
113
term of office of the public administrator. The number of
114
letters each year shall be determined in ac c ordance with the
115
reporting requirements set forth in law.
116
6. All fees collected by a public administrator who
117
elects t o be salaried shall be deposited in the county
118
treasury or with the treasurer for the City of St. Louis.
119
7. Any public administrator in a county of the first
120
classif i cation without a charter form of government with a
121
population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants who
122
elects to receive fees in lieu of a salary pursuant to this
123
section may elect to join the Missouri local government
124
employees' retirement system created pursuant to sections
125
70.600 to 70.755.
126
8. (1) A letter of guardianship and a letter of
127
conserv a tors h ip shall be counted as separate letters.
128
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the following
129
terms me a n:
130
(a) "Letter of conservatorship", the appointment of a
131
conserva t orship of an estate by the court to a protectee
132
adjudged to be disabled;

SCS HB 3000 198
133
(b) "Letter of guardianship", the appointment of a
134
guardian s hip by the court to a ward adjudged to be
135
incapacitated.
1
486.735. 1. A vendor or manufacturer shall register
2
with the secr e tar y prior to selling or manufacturing notary
3
seals. The secretary shall maintain an internet site for
4
the pu r pose of allowing vendors and manufacturers to confirm
5
the current standing of any notary in the state.
6
2. A vendor or manufacturer shall not provide a notary
7
seal to a purchaser claiming to be a notary, unless the
8
purchaser presents a notary commission issued by the
9
secretary, and unless:
10
(1) In the case of a purchaser appearing in person,
11
the vend o r or manufacturer identifies this individual as the
12
person named in the commission, through either personal
13
knowledge or satisfactory evidence of identity; or
14
(2) In the case of a purchaser ordering a seal by mail
15
or deliv e ry service, the vendor or manufacturer confirms the
16
notary's standing as a commissioned notary through the
17
internet site.
18
3. For each commission, a vendor or manufacturer shall
19
make or sell only one seal and, if requested by the person
20
presenting the commission, only one embossing seal.
21
4. After manufacturing or providing a notary seal, the
22
vendor s hall affix an image of all seals on a form as
23
prescribed by the secretary and, within seven business days,
24
send the completed form to the secretary, retaining a copy
25
of the form and the commission for a period of five years.
26
5. A notary obtaining a seal as a result of a name
27
change s hall present a copy of the confirmation of notary's
28
name or address change from the secretary in accordance with
29
sections 486.780 and 486.785.

SCS HB 3000 199
30
6. A vendor or manufacturer who fails to comply with
31
this se c tion shall be subject to a fine of [one] ten
32
thousand dollars for each violation. For multiple
33
violations, a vendor's permission to sell or manufacture
34
notary seals may be withdrawn by the secretary. Such
35
violation shall not preclude the civil liability of the
36
vendor to parties injured by the vendor's failure to comply
37
with this section.
1
488.426. 1. The judges of the circuit court, en banc,
2
in any circui t in this state may require any party filing a
3
civil case in the circuit court, at the time of filing the
4
suit, to deposit with the clerk of the court a surcharge in
5
addition to all other deposits required by law or court
6
rule. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
7
proce e dings when costs are waived or are to be paid by the
8
county or state or any city.
9
2. The surcharge in effect on August 28, 2001, shall
10
remain i n effect until changed by the circuit court. The
11
circuit court in any circuit, except the circuit cou r t in
12
Jackson County, the circuit court in the city of St. Louis,
13
or the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the
14
state for the salaries of family court commissioners under
15
and pursuant to section 487.020, may change the fee to any
16
amount not to exceed fifteen dollars. The circuit court in
17
Jackson County, the circuit court in t he city of St. Louis,
18
or the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the
19
state for the salaries of family court commissioners under
20
and pursuant to section 487.020 may change the fee to any
21
amount not to exceed twenty dollars. A change in the fee
22
shall become effective and remain in effect until further
23
changed.

SCS HB 3000 200
24
3. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
25
proceed i ngs when costs are waived or are paid by the county
26
or state or any city.
27
[4. In addition to any fee authorized by subsection 1
28
of this s ection, any county of the first classification with
29
more than one hundred one thousand but fewer than one
30
hundred fifteen thousand inhabitants may impose an
31
additional fee of ten dollars excluding cases concerning
32
adoption and those in small claims court. The provisions of
33
this subsection shall expire on December 3 1, 2019.]
1
570.095. 1. A person commits the offense of filing
2
false documen t s i f :
3
(1) With the intent to defraud, deceive, harass,
4
alarm, o r negatively impact financially, or in such a manner
5
reasonably calculated to deceive, defraud, harass, alarm, or
6
negatively impact financially, he or she files, causes to be
7
filed or recorded, or attempts to file or record, creates,
8
uses as genuine, transfers or has transferred, presents, or
9
prepares with knowledge or belief that it will be filed,
10
presented, recorded, or transferred to the secretary of
11
state or the secretary's designee, to the recorder of deeds
12
of any county or city not within a county or the recorder's
13
designee, to any municipal, county, district, or state
14
government entity, division, agency, or office, or to any
15
credit bureau or financial institution any of the following
16
types of documents:
17
(a) Common law lien;
18
(b) Uniform commercial code filing or record;
19
(c) Real property recording;
20
(d) Financing statement;
21
(e) Contract;
22
(f) Warranty, special, or quitclaim deed;

SCS HB 3000 201
23
(g) Quiet title claim or action;
24
(h) Deed in lieu of foreclosure;
25
(i) Legal affidavit;
26
(j) Legal process;
27
(k) Legal summons;
28
(l) Bills and due bills;
29
(m) Criminal charging documents or materially false
30
criminal charging documents;
31
(n) Any other document not stated in this subdivision
32
that is r elated to real property; or
33
(o) Any state, county, district, federal, municipal,
34
credit b u reau, or financial institution form or document; and
35
(2) Such document listed under subdivision (1) of this
36
subsecti o n contains materially false information; is
37
fraudulent; is a forgery, as [defined] described under
38
section 570.090; lacks the consent of all parties listed in
39
a document that requires mutual consent; or is invalid under
40
Missouri law.
41
2. Filing false documents under this section is a
42
class [ D ] C felony for the first offense except the
43
following circumstances shall be a class [C] B felony:
44
(1) The defendant has been previously found guilty or
45
pleaded g uilty to a violation of this section;
46
(2) The victim or named party in the matter:
47
(a) Is an official elected to municipal, county,
48
district , federal, or statewide office;
49
(b) Is an official appointed to municipal, county,
50
district , federal, or statewide office; or
51
(c) Is an employee of an official elected or appointed
52
to munic i pal, county, district, federal, or statewide office;
53
(3) The victim or named party in the matter is a judge
54
or magis t rate of:

SCS HB 3000 202
55
(a) Any court or division of the court in this or any
56
other st a te or an employee thereof; or
57
(b) Any court system of the United States or is an
58
employee thereof;
59
(4) The victim or named party in the matter is a full-
60
time, pa r t-time, or reserve or auxiliary peace officer, as
61
defined under section 590.010, who is licensed in this state
62
or any other state;
63
(5) The victim or named party in the matter is a full-
64
time, pa r t-time, or volunteer firefighter in this state or
65
any other state;
66
(6) The victim or named party in the matter is an
67
officer o f federal job class 1811 who is empowered to
68
enforce United States laws;
69
(7) The victim or named party in the matter is a law
70
enforcem e nt officer of the United States as defined under 5
71
U.S.C. Section 8401(17)(A) or (D);
72
(8) The victim or named party in the matter is an
73
employee of any law enforcement or legal prosecution agency
74
in this state, any other state, or the United States;
75
(9) The victim or named party in the matter is an
76
employee of a federal agency that has agents or officers of
77
job class 1811 who are empowered to enforce United States
78
laws or is an employee of a federal agency that has law
79
enforcement officers as defined under 5 U.S.C. Section
80
8401(17)(A) or (D); or
81
(10) The victim or named party in the matter is an
82
officer o f the railroad police as [defined] authorized under
83
section 388.600.
84
3. For a penalty enhancement as described under
85
subsect i on 2 of this section to apply, the occupation of the
86
victim or named party shall be material to the subject

SCS HB 3000 203
87
matter of the document or documents filed or the relief
88
sought by the document or documents filed, and the
89
occupation of the victim or named party shall be materially
90
connected to the apparent reason that the victim has been
91
named, victimized, or involved. For purposes of subsection
92
2 of this section and this subs e ction, a person who has
93
retired or resigned from any agency, institution, or
94
occupation listed under subsection 2 of this section shall
95
be considered the same as a person who remains in employment
96
and shall also include the following family members of a
97
person listed under subdivisions (2) to (9) of subsection 2
98
of this section:
99
(1) Such person's spouse;
100
(2) Such person or such person's spouse's ancestor or
101
descenda n t by blood or adoption; or
102
(3) Such person's stepchild while the marriage
103
creating that relationship exists.
104
4. Any person who pleads guilty or is found guilty
105
under s u bsections 1 to 3 of this section shall be ordered by
106
the court to make full restitution to any person or entity
107
that has sustained actual losses or costs as a result of the
108
actions of the defendants. Such restitution shall not be
109
paid in lieu of jail or pr i son time but rather in addition
110
to any jail or prison time imposed by the court.
111
5. (1) Nothing in this section shall limit the power
112
of the s tate to investigate, charge, or punish any person
113
for any conduct that constitutes a crime by any other
114
statute of this state or the United States.
115
(2) No receiving entity shall be required under this
116
section t o retain the filing or record for prosecution under
117
this section. A filing or record being rejected by the
118
receiving ent i ty shall not be used as an affirmative defense.

SCS HB 3000 204
119
6. (1) Any agency of the state, a county, or a city
120
not wit h in a county that is responsible for or receives
121
document filings or records, including county recorders of
122
deeds and the secretary of state's office, shall, by January
123
1, 2019, impose a system in which the documents that have
124
been submitted to the receiving agency, or those filings
125
rejected by the secretary of state under its legal
126
authority, are logged or noted in a ledger, spreadsheet, or
127
similar recording method if the filing or recording officer
128
or employee believes the filings or records appear to be
129
fraudulent or contain suspicious language. The receiving
130
agency shall make noted documents availabl e for review by:
131
(a) The jurisdictional prosecuting or circuit attorney
132
or such a ttorney's designee;
133
(b) The county sheriff or the sheriff's designee;
134
(c) The police chief of a county or city not within a
135
county o r such chief's designee; or
136
(d) A commissioned peace officer as defined under
137
section 5 90.010.
138
Review of such documents is permissible for the agent or
139
agencies under this subdivision without the need of a grand
140
jury subpoena or court order. No fees or monetary charges
141
shall be levied on the invest i gative agents or agencies for
142
review of documents noted in the ledger or spreadsheet. The
143
ledger or spreadsheet and its contents shall be retaine d by
144
the agency that controls entries into such ledger or
145
spreadsheet for a minimum of three years from the earliest
146
entry listed in the ledger or spreadsheet.
147
(2) The receiving entity shall, upon receipt of a
148
filing o r record that has been noted as a suspicious filing
149
or record, notify the chief law enforcement officer or such

SCS HB 3000 205
150
officer's designee of the county and the prosecutor or the
151
prosecutor's designee of the county of the filing's or
152
record's existence. Such notification shall be made within
153
two business days o f the filing or record having been
154
received. Notification may be accomplished via email or via
155
paper mem o randum.
156
(3) No agency receiving the filing or record shall be
157
required under this section to notify the person conducting
158
the filing or record that the filing or record is entered as
159
a logged or noted filing or record.
160
(4) Reviews to ensure compliance with the provisions
161
of this s ection shall be the responsibility of any
162
commissioned peace officer. Findings of noncompliance shall
163
be reported to the jurisdic t ional prosecuting or circuit
164
attorney or such attorney's designee by any commissioned
165
peace officer who has probable cause to believe that the
166
noncompliance has taken place purposely, knowingly,
167
recklessly, or with criminal negligence, as described under
168
section 562.016.
169
7. To petition for a judicial review of a filing or
170
record t hat is believed to be fraudulent, false, misleading,
171
forged, or contains materially false information, a
172
petitioner may file a probable cause statement that
173
delineates the basis for the belief that the filing or
174
record is materially false, contains materially false
175
information, is a forgery, is fraudulent, or is misleading.
176
This probable cause statement shall be filed in the
177
associate or circuit court of the county in which the
178
original filing or record was transferred, received, or
179
recorded.
180
8. A filed petition under this section shall have an
181
initial hearing date within twenty business days of the date

SCS HB 3000 206
182
the petition is filed with the court. A court ruling of
183
invalid shall be evidence that the or i ginal filing or record
184
was not accurate, true, or correct. A court ruling of
185
invalid shall be retained or record e d at the original
186
receiving entity. The receiving entity shall waive all
187
filing or recordi n g fees associated with the filing or
188
recording of the court ruling document in this subsection.
189
Such ruling may be forwarded to credit bureaus or other
190
institutions at the request of the petitioner via motion to
191
the applicable court at no additional cost to the petitioner.
192
9. If a filing or record is deemed invalid, court
193
costs a n d fees are the responsibility of the party who
194
originally initiated the filing or record. If the filing or
195
record is deemed valid, no court costs or f ees, in addition
196
to standard filing fees, shall be assessed.
197
10. (1) An owner of an interest in real property that
198
has been subj e ct to a filing or record that is believed to
199
be fraudulent, false, misleading, or forged or that contains
200
materially false information may petition for a judicial
201
review under subsections 7, 8, and 9 of this section.
202
(2) A county recorder of deeds may post information on
203
such pet i tion process in the recorder's office and online.
1
578.700. 1. For purposes of this section, all
2
definitions f r om s ection 486.600 shall apply.
3
2. In performing a notarial act, a notary shall be
4
guilty o f:
5
(1) A class E felony for executing a false notarial
6
certific a te under subsection 1 of section 486.660; or
7
(2) A misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction by a
8
fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or imprisonment for
9
not more than six months, or both, for knowingly:

SCS HB 3000 207
10
[(1)] (a) Failing to require the presence of a
11
principal at t h e time of a notarial act; or
12
[(2)] (b) Failing to identify a principal through
13
personal k nowl e dge or satisfactory evidence[; or
14
(3) Executing a false notarial certificate under
15
subsecti o n 1 of section 486.660].
16
3. A notary who knowingly performs any other act
17
prohibi t ed by chapter 486 or fails to perform any other act
18
required by chapter 486 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor,
19
punishable upon conviction by a fine not exceeding five
20
hundred dollars or imprisonment for not more than six
21
months, or both.
22
4. Any person who is not a notary and who knowingly
23
acts as or otherwise impersonates a notary shall be guilty
24
of a [misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction by a fine not
25
exceeding five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not more
26
than six months, or both] class E felony.
27
5. Any person who knowingly obtains, conceals,
28
defaces , or destroys the seal, journal, or official records
29
of a notary shall be guilty of a [misdemeanor, punishable
30
upon conviction by a fine not exceeding five hundred
31
dollars] class E felony.
32
6. Any person who knowingly solicits, coerces, or in
33
any way influences a notary to commit official misconduct
34
shall be guilty of a [misdemeanor, punishable upon
35
conviction by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars]
36
class E felony.
37
7. Any person who knowingly obtains, conceals,
38
damages , or destroys the coding, disk, certificate, card,
39
token, program, software, or hardware that is intended
40
exclusively to enable an electronic notary public to produce
41
a registered electronic signature, notary seal, or single

SCS HB 3000 208
42
element combining the required features of an electronic
43
signature and notary seal, shall be guilty of a
44
[misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction by a fine not
45
exceeding five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not more
46
than six months, or both] class E felony.
47
8. Any person who is not a notary and knowingly
48
present s false information to obtain or attempt to obtain a
49
notary public's seal from a manufacturer under chapter 486
50
shall be guilty of a class E felony.
51
9. The penalties of this section shall not preclude
52
other sa ncti ons and re med ies p rovided by law .
1
6 40.144. 1 . A ll commun ity wate r s ystems shall be
2
required to c r eat e a valve inspection program that includes:
3
(1) Inspection of all valves every ten years;
4
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken valves;
5
and
6
(3) Within five years of August 28, 2020,
7
identifi c ation of each shut-off valve location using a
8
geographic information system or an alternative physical
9
mapping system that accurately identifies the location of
10
each valve.
11
2. All community water systems shall be required to
12
create a hydrant inspection program that includes:
13
(1) Scheduled testing of every hydrant in the
14
communit y water system;
15
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken hydrants;
16
(3) A plan to flush every hydrant and dead-end main;
17
(4) Maintenance of records of inspections, tests, and
18
flushing s for six years; and
19
(5) Within five years of August 28, 2020,
20
identifi c ation of each hydrant location using a geographic

SCS HB 3000 209
21
information system or an alternative physical mapping system
22
that accurately identifies the location of each hydrant.
23
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
24
any sta t e parks, cities with a population of more than
25
thirty thousand inhabitants, [a] any county with a charter
26
form of government and with more than six hundred thousand
27
but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants, [a] any
28
county with a charter form of government and with more than
29
nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or [a] any public
30
service commission regulated utility with more than thirty
31
thousand customers.
1
[68.259. Notwithstanding the provisions of
2
section 1.140 to the contrary, the provisions of
3
sections 68.025, 68.035, 68.040, 68.057, 68.070,
4
68.200, 68.205, 68.210, 68.215, 68.220, 68.225,
5
68.230, 68.235, 68.240, 68.245, 68.250, 68.255,
6
and 68.260 as contained in this act shall be
7
severable, and if any provision is for any
8
reason held to be invalid, such decision shall
9
not invalidate any of the remaining provisions
10
of sections 68.025, 68.035, 68.040, 68.057,
11
68.070, 68.200, 68.205, 68.210, 68.215, 68.220,
12
68.225, 68.230, 68.235, 68.240, 68.245, 68.250,
13
68.255, and 68.260 as contained in this act.]
1
[71.014. 1. Notwithstanding the
2
provisions of section 71.015, the governing body
3
of any city, town, or village which is located
4
within a county which borders a county of the
5
first classification with a charter form of
6
government with a population in excess of six
7
hundred fifty thousand, proceeding as otherwise
8
authorized by law or charter, may annex
9
unincorporated areas which are contiguous and
10
compact to the existing corporate limits upon
11
notarized petition requesting such annexation
12
signed by the owners of all fee interests of
13
record in all tracts located within the area to
14
be annexed. That a petition requesting
15
annexation is not or was not verified or

SCS HB 3000 210
16
notarized shall not affect the validity of an
17
annexation heretofore or hereafter undertaken in
18
accordance with this section.
19
2. Any action of any kind seeking to
20
deannex from any city, town, or village any area
21
annexed under this section, or seeking in any
22
way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or
23
otherwise challenge such annexation or oust such
24
city, town, or village from jurisdiction over
25
such annexed area shall be brought within five
26
years of the date of adoption of the annexation
27
ordinance.]
1
Section B. In the event that any section, provision,
2
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
3
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
4
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
5
it is the intent of the general assembly that the remaining
6
sections of this act remain in force and effect as far as
7
they are capable of being carried into execution as intended
8
by the general assembly. The general assembly hereby
9
declares that it would h a ve passed each section, provision,
10
clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact
11
that any one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases,
12
or words of this act or the application of this act would be
13
declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
